[Diagnostic significance of alpha-amylase determination in the serum and urine in acute and chronic pancreatitis].[The amylase and creatinine clearance coefficient in acute and chronic pancreatitis and diabetes mellitus].[Amylase-creatinine ratio in the diagnosis of acute pancreatic and biliary pathology].[VALUE OF AMYLASE TESTS IN ACUTE PANCREATITIS].[The diagnosis of acute pancreatitis (author's transl)].[Acute pancreatitis (etiology, pathogenesis and pathobiochemistry)].Clinical value of routine isoamylase analysis of hyperamylasemia.To study incidence and cause of hyperamylasemia in various diseases, serum amylase was determined in 1371 consecutive patients and subsequent isoamylase analysis was carried out in 91 hyperamylasemic sera. Hyperamylasemia was observed in various diseases: acute pancreatitis (5/5), chronic pancreatitis (0/3), mumps (3/3), cerebrovascular diseases (2/39), respiratory diseases (6/69), heart diseases (5/89), liver diseases (16/101), cholelithiasis (0/13), diabetes mellitus (2/66), peptic ulcer (0/46), other digestive diseases (0/33), malignant tumor (9/249), renal failure (21/25), intraabdominal surgery (9/35), extraabdominal surgery (2/20), trauma (1/23), and miscellaneous (10/552). Salivary type hyperamylasemia due to dominant increase of salivary type isoamylase occurred in over half of the hyperamylasemic patients. Knowledge of hyperamylasemia in various diseases and routine isoamylase analysis of hyperamylasemic sera would enhance diagnostic accuracy and exclude unnecessary treatment of pancreatitis solely because of the presence of hyperamylasemia.[Diagnostic value of the determination of amylase in the urine in diagnosis of postoperative pancreatic necrosis].Elastase-1 vs trypsin, lipase and amylase serum levels in pancreatic diseases.Serum levels of elastase-1 were measured in 174 patients with pancreatic diseases and in 131 controls and were compared with the circulating levels of trypsin, lipase and amylase and with clinical data. In 48 patients with chronic pancreatitis serum enzyme levels were also compared with the pancreatic exocrine capacity. About 50% of the patients with chronic pancreatic disease showed increased levels of serum elastase, sometimes even in the face of long lasting pain-free periods, and/or of severe pancreatic impairment. On the contrary, serum trypsin and lipase were almost always either normal or below the normal range in the absence of painful relapses and/or in the presence of an impairment of the exocrine pancreatic function. A strict correlation was found between elastase-1 and trypsin (r = 0.778) and lipase (r = 0.834). However, controls and patients with chronic pancreatic diseases behaved differently, an increase in trypsin and in lipase levels being associated in the patients with chronic pancreatitis with an increase in elastase-1 values significantly larger than that observed in controls. These findings raise the hypothesis, at present unproven, that trypsin and lipase serum assays are more reliable indices of pancreatic exocrine function, whereas serum elastase-1 levels may indicate the presence of acute pancreatic episodes, even if subclinical, the importance of which, in the natural history of the disease, remains unknown.CLINICAL ENZYMOLOGY. 3. SERUM AND URINARY AMYLASE AND LIPASE IN ACUTE PANCREATITIS.[Pancreatic lymph flow and lipase activity in acute pancreatitis. (Preliminary report)].The frequency of marcroamylasemia and the diagnostic value of the amylase to creatinine clearance ratio in patients with elevated serum amylase activity.190 patients with elevated serum amylase levels were tested for macroamylasemia and the amylase to creatinine clearance ratio. Macroamylasemia was found in 3 patients. In these patients macroamylasemia persisted after the total activity of serum amylase had fallen to nearly normal levels. The Cam/Ccr-ratios were determined 14 times in the 3 macroamylasemic patients. Only one of the 14 values was clearly less than 1%. Cam/Ccr-ratios above 4% were found in 83 patients. In 56 of them the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis could not be confirmed. 19 out of 46 patients with the established diagnosis of acute pancreatitis had Cam/Ccr-ratios below 4%. Cam/Ccr-ratios below 1% were also found in patients without macroamylasemia. It is concluded that high and low Cam/Ccr-ratios are not specific for acute pancreatitis and macroamylasemia, respectively, and--moreover--that a normal Cam/Ccr-ratio excludes neither acute pancreatitis nor macroamylesemia.[Amylase in blood and urine in diagnosis of acute pancreatitis; importance and clinical significance of excess amylase in the blood in acute abdominal disorders of extra-pancreatic origin].Laboratory tests in the differential diagnosis of hyperamylasemia.We evaluated the clinical utility of some recently developed laboratory methods, including total amylase by three methods; isoamylase by inhibition and isoelectric focusing; lipase by pH-Stat and turbidimetry; and immunoreactive trypsin. All methods correlated highly positively with hyperamylasemia due to primary acute pancreatitis. Pancreatic-type isoamylase determinations have the greatest clinical usefulness, because total amylase, lipase, and immunoreactive trypsin are increased in a relatively high percentage of other abdominal diseases. Increases in the last-mentioned enzymes in nonpancreatic abdominal disease may be the result of injuries to the pancreas secondary to the primary disease, which are being detected with these highly sensitive methods. Because of the high clinical sensitivity of lipase and immunoreactive trypsin determinations, a normal result tends to exclude acute pancreatitis. Hyperamylasemia seen in lung carcinoma is due to increase in an amylase isoenzyme similar to the salivary-type amylase. The method for pancreatic-type isoamylase based on selective inhibition is satisfactory for routine clinical laboratory use.Trypsinogen-2 and trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP) in urine of patients with acute pancreatitis.There is an obvious clinical need for a simple test that can identify patients at risk of developing severe acute pancreatitis. In this work we compared urinary trypsinogen-2 with urinary trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP) and serum C-reactive protein (CRP) for early differentiation between mild and severe acute pancreatitis.The study population consisted of 127 consecutive patients with acute pancreatitis of whom 29 had severe disease. Urinary trypsinogen-2 was measured by a quantitative immunofluorometric assay and TAP by a competitive immunoassay. Serum CRP was determined by immunoturbidimetry.The sensitivity and specificity to identify severe acute pancreatitis on admission was 72% and 81% for urinary trypsinogen-2, 64% and 82% for urinary TAP, and 29% and 93% for serum CRP, respectively. At 24 h after admission, the values were 82% and 78% for urinary trypsinogen-2, 52% and 92% for urinary TAP, and 84% and 72% for serum CRP, respectively. Receiver-operating characteristics curve analysis showed that the area under the curve was larger for urinary trypsinogen-2 than for urinary TAP and serum CRP on admission and 24 h after admission. On admission the positive likelihood ration for urinary trypsiongen-2 was 3.7, for urinary TAP 3.6, and 4.3 for serum CRP, respectively. The corresponding negative likelihood ratios were 0.34, 0.43, and 0.76, respectively.Urinary trypsinogen-2 was superior to serum CRP and as god as or even better than urinary TAP and in the early prediction of disease severity in acute pancreatitis. These results suggest that it could be a valuable adjunct in the early assessment of the severity of acute pancreatitis.[Amylase test in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].The determination of serum and urinary amylase are methods used in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, however there are many abdominal problems that can cause hyperamylasemia, in the absence of pancreatic disease, for this reason in 1969 Levitt and col. signaled the possible advantages of amylase/creatinine clearence ratio, in the clinical diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. This test was used in cases with acute pancreatitis, as in other diseases, in correlation with levels in normal subjects, with the objective of evaluating its clinica utility, in relation to the formentioned paragraph. Results concluded that the amylase/creatinine ratio is not of greater diagnostic utility than the determination of urinary amylase, in acute pancreatitis.Lipase latex test for acute abdominal pain: comparison with serum lipase, trypsin, elastase and amylase.The diagnostic capacity of a semiquantitative latex test for lipase measurement was compared with the measurement of other pancreatic enzymes in 100 consecutive patients admitted to a general hospital for recent onset of severe abdominal pain. Positive results of the test were found in two patients with acute pancreatitis, and in one out of three chronic pancreatitis relapses. The test yielded false-positive results only in two patients who had no apparent pancreatic involvement. A marginal increase in other pancreatic enzymes was found in a few patients with acute biliary or appendicular problems. In conclusion, the lipase latex test can be suggested in an emergency setting as a quick and reliable alternative to serum amylase to rule out a diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.[Acute pancreatitis: new diagnostic possibilities].A rapid assay for serum immunoreactive lipase as a screening test for acute pancreatitis.In 134 consecutive patients with acute abdominal pain, we evaluated the clinical role of a new rapid test for serum lipase based on latex agglutination. The results were compared with those obtained with a widely used lipase immunoassay as well as with serum amylase and pancreatic isoamylase measurements. Fifty-five healthy subjects were studied as controls. In 174 cases (121 patients and 53 controls) the results of the two lipase assays were in agreement. A positive lipase latex test was found in 10 of 12 patients with acute pancreatitis, in eight of 24 patients with other pancreatic diseases, and in 14 of 98 with nonpancreatic diseases. The sensitivity and specificity of this test were similar to those of the other pancreatic enzyme assays performed. The results indicate that the lipase latex agglutination test is useful for emergency screening for acute pancreatitis in patients with acute abdominal pain.The P3 iso-enzyme of serum amylase in the management of patients with acute pancreatitis.The concept of the P3 index and its use in separating acute pancreatitis from other causes of hyperamylasaemia is described. The mean P3 index of 12 healthy volunteers was 94.8 per cent. All 69 patients with acute pancreatitis had a P3 index below 80 per cent with a mean value of 67.9 per cent. The P3 index is abnormal longer than the raised serum amylase, which increases diagnostic accuracy. Causes of hyperamylasaemia other than acute pancreatitis have been studied and most patients have a P3 index above 80 per cent, although certain false positive values have been obtained. No patient with acute pancreatitis has had a P3 index above 80 per cent on admission. Five cases of acute pancreatitis have been studied in whom the P3 index remained abnormal; all had continuing pancreatic disease, usually with pseudocyst formation. The test has proved most valuable in identifying those patients at risk of developing subsequent problems. To date, the test cannot be relied upon to help in deciding upon the severity of an attack of acute pancreatitis.[Diagnostic value of amylase determination and early laparotomy in acute pancreatitis].Rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip in the diagnosis of pancreatitis after endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.The aim of this prospective study was to evaluate the diagnostic value of the rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip in post-endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) pancreatitis.A total of 150 patients were tested with the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip and serum levels of amylase and lipase before ERCP and 3 hours after ERCP. The diagnostic value of urinary trypsinogen-2 strip test compared with that of serum amylase and lipase was analyzed.Post-ERCP pancreatitis was diagnosed in 13 (8.7%) of 150 patients. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test at 3 hours after ERCP are 84.6%, 97.1%, 73.3%, 98.5%, and 96%, respectively. At the cutoff level of 3 times the upper reference limit, the negative predictive values of amylase and lipase were comparable to that urinary trypsinogen-2 strip test; however, their positive predictive values (42.9% and 36.4%, respectively) were markedly lower than that of urinary trypsinogen-2 test (73.3%).The urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test is a useful test for early diagnosis of post-ERCP pancreatitis. A negative urinary dipstick test at 3 hours after the procedure rules out post-ERCP pancreatitis with a high probability and allows of early discharge plan.Twenty-four-hour serum amylase predicting pancreatic reaction after endoscopic sphincterotomy.Acute pancreatitis is still the most common complication after endoscopic sphincterotomy (ES) and cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). The aim of this study was to detect the time when the peak of serum amylase was predictive for postprocedure pancreatitis or long-lasting severe hyperamylasemia, in order to plan the follow-up of patients.Serum amylase activity was measured in a prospective series of 409 consecutive patients after ES, immediately before ES and two, four, eight and 24 hours thereafter; the two, four and eight-hour data were compared with those at 24 hours and with the outcome. Evaluation was done separately for the 198 cases with pancreatic duct opacification and for the 202 cases at high risk for postprocedure pancreatitis.Twenty-four hours after ES, amylase was still more than five times the upper normal limit in 26 patients, associated with pancreatic-like pain in 19 of them (mild/moderate pancreatitis) and asymptomatic in the remaining seven (long-lasting severe hyperamylasemia). There was a significant difference at all sampling times between the 26 patients with 24-hour severe hyperamylasemia and those with the lower level. Although the sensitivity of amylase measurement in detecting pancreatitis was highest at eight hours, in practice the four-hour assessment appears a reliable predictor. Almost all patients with serum amylase levels more than five times the upper normal limit at four, eight and 24 hours had had pancreatic duct opacification. In contrast, patient-related risk factors for postprocedure pancreatitis did not play a significant role in the present series.Serum amylase assessment four hours after ES is a reliable, cost-effective follow-up and minimizes the likelihood of underestimating the risk of post-procedure pancreatic reaction. It should be recommended particularly in out-patients and when pancreatic duct opacification has occurred.[Significance of diastase and amylase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Detection of colipase in serum and urine of pancreatitis patients.Colipase, like other pancreatic proteins, is liberated into the circulation in acute pancreatitis. Its concentration was measured in serum by a turbidimetric and in urine by a titrimetric method. The principle of both assays is based on the reactivation of bile acid inhibited, pure human pancreatic lipase by colipase. Whereas in healthy individuals colipase was found neither in serum nor urine (detection limit approximately 6.5 micrograms/1), a wide concentration range was observed in 29 patients with acute pancreatitis. Urine values varied between 3.8 and 7121 micrograms colipase/g creatinine; in serum levels up to 664 micrograms/1 were found. There was no correlation with serum lipase activity: On a molar basis, the ratio of serum colipase to serum lipase ranged between less than 0.04 and 2.14, but was below 1 in most sera. Colipase is rapidly removed from the circulation by glomerular filtration, its elimination rate from serum being more than twice as fast as that of lipase. This results in a constant decrease of the colipase/lipase ratio during the course of the disease. Probably determination of colipase is of no direct diagnostic value in pancreatic disorders, but our findings are of considerable significance for the measurement of serum lipase in the presence of bile acids, particularly with regard to turbidimetric assays. We conclude that lipase activity values obtained by these methods are mainly dependent on the degree of saturation of the enzyme with its cofactor and not on the true lipase concentration.The role of routine assays of serum amylase and lipase for the diagnosis of acute abdominal pain.We aimed to evaluate the role of routine measurements of serum amylase and lipase in the diagnosis of acute abdominal pain.We identified all patients who had serum amylase and lipase assays over a 62-day period at a single university teaching hospital and reviewed their case notes.We excluded 58 of the 1598 patients on grounds of ineligibility (< 18 years of age and those transferred from other hospitals). A complete data set was obtained for 1520 (98.7%) of the remaining 1540 patients. Only 9.1% of requests were based on a clinical suspicion of acute pancreatitis. Of the 44 (2.9%) patients who had acute pancreatitis, only 28 (63.6%) had an associated rise in serum amylase and/or lipase 3 times above the maximum reference range, the remainder being diagnosed radiologically. At this cut-off range, the sensitivity and specificity for serum amylase were 50% and 99%, and those for serum lipase 64% and 97%, respectively.Routine measurements of serum amylase and lipase are unhelpful in the diagnosis of acute abdominal pain unless there is clinical suspicion of acute pancreatitis. In these patients, assay of lipase alone is preferable to assay of amylase alone or both enzymes.Increased serum trypsinogen 2 and trypsin 2-1 antitrypsin complex values identify endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP)-induced pancreatitis with high accuracy.Pancreatic leakage and acute postoperative pancreatitis after proximal pancreatoduodenectomy.Acute postoperative pancreatitis (APP) after proximal pancreatoduodenectomy (PDE) is a major and serious complication. The purpose of the the study is early diagnosis of APP, differentiation from pancreatic stump leak and possibilities of surgical treatment.Of all patients who underwent PDE for ductal adenocarcinoma of the pancreatic head complicated by type C pancreatic leak, who died during primary hospitalization, we used autopsy findings to find patients with histologically confirmed APP. We compared this group to patients with only a pancreatic leak and patients with an uncomplicated clinical course. We retrospectively evaluated the postoperative clinical course, and radiological and laboratory data of all patients. These parameters were statistically compared between the individual groups using Fisher LSD test. We considered p = 0.05 to be statistically significant. Data were analysed using software STATISTICA 10.0 (StatSoft CR s.r.o.).One hundred sixty patients underwent PDE for ductal adenocarcinoma at our institution between 20072011 and were retrospectivaly reviewed. APP with postoperative type C pancreatic leak was observed in 4 (2.5%) patients; none of these patients survived. We found significantly higher levels of serum pancreatic amylase (AMS) on the 1. postoperative day in 3 of these patients compared to the other groups. Significantly increasing levels of CRP during the the first 5 postoperative days were observed in 75% of these patients. Retrospectively analysed contrast CT scans up to the 5th POD did not show APP. Only 1 patient had findings of APP type E according to Balthazar on CT scan performed on the 9th POD.The most significant factor in early diagnosis of APP after PDE is an abrupt change in clinical status. We also observed significantly higher levels of serum concentrations of CRP and AMS. Based on our findings, CT scan is not beneficial in the early diagnosis of APP. In cases of early diagnosed APP after PDE, the question of performing a completion pancreatectomy and its timing remains.Reliable screening for acute pancreatitis with rapid urine trypsinogen-2 test strip.This study was designed to evaluate the validity of a new rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip (Actim Pancreatitis) for detection of acute pancreatitis in patients with acute abdominal pain.A total of 525 consecutive patients presenting with abdominal pain at two emergency units was included prospectively and tested with the Actim Pancreatitis test strip. Urine trypsinogen-2 concentrations were also determined by a quantitative method. The diagnosis and assessment of severity of acute pancreatitis was based on raised serum and urinary amylase levels, clinical features and findings on dynamic contrast-enhanced computed tomography.In 45 patients the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis could be established. The Actim Pancreatitis test strip result was positive in 43 of them resulting in a sensitivity of 96 per cent. Thirty-seven false-positive Actim Pancreatitis test strips were obtained in patients with non-pancreatic abdominal pain resulting in a specificity of 92 per cent. Nine patients with severe acute pancreatitis were all detected by the dipstick.A negative Actim Pancreatitis strip result excludes acute pancreatitis with high probability. Positive results indicate the need for further evaluation, i.e. other enzyme measurements and/or radiological examinations. The test is easy and rapid to perform, unequivocal in its interpretation and can be used in healthcare units lacking laboratory facilities.Lipase isoforms and amylase isoenzymes: assays and application in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Pancreatic juice and serum from patients with acute pancreatitis contain three enzymes that have lipolytic activity: L1 and L2, which are pancreatic isoenzymes or isoforms of lipase (EC 3.1.1.3), and L3, which is probably pancreatic carboxyl ester lipase, also known as cholesterol esterase (EC 3.1.1.13). These enzymes are readily separated electrophoretically on agarose and can be developed with an overlay of Kodak Ektachem lipase slide material. The latter acts as a dry-reagent developing substrate, with the enzymes producing blue bands in the slide material. We found L1 in about one-half of normal persons, L2 in none, and L3 in all. We assayed for amylase (EC 3.2.1.1), amylase isoenzymes, lipase, and lipase isoforms in the sera of 100 patients with suspected acute pancreatitis. L2 lipase has the greatest diagnostic efficiency for the diagnosis of pancreatitis, compared with total amylase, P3 amylase, and total lipase. Lipase and L2 could replace amylase, an inefficient test, for the diagnosis of patients with suspected acute pancreatitis. In patients receiving organ transplants, a serum amylase value of greater than 300 U/L or a lipase of greater than 1000 U/L discriminated well between patients with and without complications and (or) acute rejection.Serum lipase activity is increased in disease states other than acute pancreatitis: amylase revisited.Pankrin: a new parameter for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in cases of late clinical presentation.Specificity of increased amylase to creatinine clearance ratio in acute pancreatitis.The amylase to creatinine clearance ratio was found to be normal in 11 of 33 patients with acute pancreatitis. The ratio was elevated in 10 of 19 patients with renal insufficiency. Thus, it does not seem to be a specific index in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Renal handling of beta-2-microglobulin, amylase and albumin in acute pancreatitis.The renal handling of beta-2-microglobulin, amylase and albumin was studied in patients with acute pancreatitis. The data were compared with results obtained from patients with glomerular proteinuria and from patients with tubular proteinuria. Initially during acute pancreatitis, the clearance ratio (clearance protein/clearance creatinine) for beta-2-microglobulin was increased dramatically (77-fold) compared to normals. After four to seven days this ratio had fallen and was elevated only 7-fold. The corresponding figures for amylase were 3.3 and 1.8 times and for albumin 9 and 5 times respectively. In glomerular disease, the clearance ratios for beta-2-microglobulin, amylase and albumin were increased 6, 1.1, and 154 times and in tubular disease 448, 1.1, and 28 times, respectively. The electrophoretic pattern of the urinary proteins during pancreatitis was mostly normal. In a few cases, slight tubular proteinuria was noticed. Amylase activity in serum and urine from patients with pancreatitis was found to sediment, (S20,W = 4.6) in a sucrose gradient, identical to amylase from normal serum and urine. The marked increase in the excretion of beta-2-microglobulin probably reflects interference of the kidney function at the proximal tubular level. Determinations of this protein in urine may be of value in studies of kidney dysfunction that can accompany pancreatitis.The value of routine pancreatic iso-amylase measurements in the diagnosis of pancreatitis.The value of serum pancreatic iso-amylase (Pi) measurements in the clinica diagnosis of pancreatitiss was assessed using a wheat inhibitor kit (Phadebas) and cellulose acetate membrane (CAM) electrophoresis. Wheat inhibition totally suppressed Pi activity in the sera of 3 healthy subjects with substantial Pi bands on electrophoresis. Reference intervals for Pi, salivary iso-amylase (Si) and total alpha-amylase were established from the sera of 61 healthy subjects using CAM electrophoresis. Sera from 47 patients were assayed. Twenty-three had proven acute pancreatitis (AP) and 24 had established chronic pancreatitis (CP). All patients with AP had elevated serum Pi levels. Fifteen of these patients had a low P3 index, which ranged between 55.8% and 82.6% with a mean of 67.1%. An index of less than 100% indicates the presence of P3 isoamylase. P3 iso-amylase only occurred in patients with AP. Thirteen of these 15 patients did not have Si in their serum. In 20 of 24 patients with CP, serum Pi was reduced and in 4 it was at the lower limit of the reference interval. Ten of these patients had raised Si levels. In 13 of these patients the total amylase level was normal; in 4 it was increased and in 7 it was reduced. It is concluded that raised Pi and the P3 index are useful in the diagnosis and monitoring of AP; reduced Pi is highly suggestive of CP, and the use of total alpha-amylase levels alone can be misleading.[Comparative studies with a rapid lipase test and quantitative determination of serum lipase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Specificity of increased renal clearance of amylase in diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.[On possibilities and limitations of the diagnosis of acute and chronic pancreas diseases on the basis of diastase, lipase and trypsin determinations].Association of acute pancreatitis or high level of serum pancreatic enzymes in patients with acute spinal cord injury: a prospective study.[Usefulness of determining alpha-amylase thermolability in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].The role of serum isoamylase and lipase determinations in clinical practice.To determine the clinical utility of routine determination of serum isoamylase (pancreatic/salivary) and/or lipase activity, sera were tested from 109 consecutive patients with elevated total serum amylase. Without knowledge of the isoamylase and lipase results, an assessment was made of the confidence with which the attending medical staff had made or excluded a diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. The attending staff had considered acute pancreatitis to be probable in 78, possible in 12 and unlikely in 19 patients. The confidence of the clinical diagnosis of acute pancreatitis was directly related to the degree of elevation of the serum total amylase: (mean IU/l +/- s.e.m.) probable pancreatitis 1807 +/- 313, possible pancreatitis 680 +/- 74, pancreatitis unlikely 493 +/- 50. Pancreatic isoamylase was elevated in 97% of patients with probable pancreatitis, 92% with possible pancreatitis and 68% in whom pancreatitis had been considered unlikely. Lipase elevations generally parallelled these results. Although gall-stones were usually sought among patients with probable pancreatitis, they were rarely sought in patients in the other categories. In conclusion, amylase isoenzyme or lipase determinations add little information in cases of clinically suspected acute pancreatitis with marked hyperamylasemia. The tests may have a role in the evaluation of patients with clinically unexplained hyperamylasemia by defining more precisely the origin of the amylase.The early identification of patients with gallstone associated pancreatitis using clinical and biochemical factors only.Early differentiation of gallstone from nongallstone associated acute pancreatitis by imaging methods is often difficult. Timing of surgery in gallstone pancreatitis is controversial, but early surgery requires early demonstration of gallstones. This study assesses the value of easily available clinical and laboratory data in establishing gallstones as the etiology of pancreatitis. In 405 consecutive episodes of acute pancreatitis, data were collected prospectively on 14 clinical and laboratory variables. Gallstones caused 177 episodes and alcohol 135, 93 were due to other or unknown causes. Age, sex, and within 48 hours of admission, serum alkaline phosphatase, aminotransferases, amylase, and bilirubin were all significantly different (all p less than 0.001, chi square) in gallstone and alcohol groups. Multivariate analysis based on five of these variables enabled correct prediction of the presence or absence of gallstones in 50 of a further 56 episodes. This method may help in planning early interventional treatment of gallstone associated acute pancreatitis.[Clinico-biological correlations of the amylase/creatinine clearance quotients in acute pancreatitis].[Diagnosis of acute and chronic pancreatitis].Carboxyl ester lipase in human tissues and in acute pancreatitis.Carboxyl ester lipase was purified from human pancreatic juice. Antisera were raised in rabbits and the monospecificity of the antibody was verified by immunoblotting. The enzyme was present in zymogen granules of acinar cells, in occasional duct cells, and in secretory material in normal pancreas in immunohistochemistry. Also, occasional cells in the epithelium of small intestinal villi but not the granules of Paneth cells, were stained. Decreased and evenly dispersed staining was observed in necrotic acinar cells in acute pancreatitis, whereas the reaction was intensive in plugs in acinar lumina. Interstitial staining was seen around necrotic pancreatic lobules and in areas of fat necrosis. This staining pattern is similar to that obtained with antisera against other lipolytic pancreatic proteins, but differed from that with antisera against trypsin and pancreatic secretory trypsin inhibitor. We conclude that carboxyl ester lipase behaves similarly to the other lipolytic enzymes during acute pancreatitis and that interstitial localization of secretory lipolytic enzymes is characteristic of the necrotizing inflammatory process in pancreas.Increased serum trypsinogen 2 and trypsin 2-alpha 1 antitrypsin complex values identify endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography induced pancreatitis with high accuracy.To evaluate the clinical utility of two new tests for serum trypsinogen 2 and trypsin 2-alpha 1 antitrypsin complex (trypsin 2-AAT) in diagnosing and assessing the severity of acute pancreatitis (AP) induced by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Three hundred and eight consecutive patients undergoing ERCP at Helsinki University Central Hospital in 1994 and 1995.Patients were followed prospectively for pancreatitis and clinical outcome. They were tested for serum trypsinogen 2, trypsin 2-AAT, and amylase in samples obtained before and one, six, and 24 hours after ERCP.Pancreatitis developed in 31 patients (10%). Their median serum trypsinogen 2 increased 26-fold to 1401 micrograms/l at six hours after the procedure and trypsin 2-AAT showed an 11-fold increase to 88 micrograms/l at 24 hours. The increase in both markers was stronger in severe than in mild pancreatitis, and in patients without pancreatitis there was no significant increase. Baseline trypsinogen 2 and trypsin 2-AAT concentrations were elevated in 29% and 32% of patients, respectively. The diagnostic accuracy of a threefold elevation over the baseline value was therefore analysed. The sensitivity and specificity of these parameters in the diagnosis of post-ERCP pancreatitis was 93% and 91%, respectively, for serum trypsinogen 2 at six hours after the examination, and 93% and 90%, for trypsin 2-AAT at 24 hours.Serum trypsinogen 2 and trypsin 2-AAT reflect pancreatic injury after ERCP. High concentrations are associated with severe pancreatic damage. The delayed increase in trypsin 2-AAT compared with trypsinogen 2 appears to reflect the pathophysiology of AP. A greater than threefold increase in trypsinogen 2 six hours after ERCP is an accurate indicator of pancreatitis.[Hyperamylasemia: it is not always acute pancreatitis].[Clinical usefulness of the determination of the lipase/elastase ratio and of the polymorphonuclear elastase in the hospital admission of the patient with acute pancreatitis].The clinical usefulness of the determination of polymorphonuclear elastase in serum, in patients with acute pancreatitis as a predictive value of severity.A prospective study was made of 60 patients who at admission in the hospital showed high rates not only of lipase but also of polymorphonuclear elastase. High rates of this enzyme have been statistically related with the severity of pancreatitis. This severity is expressed by multifactorial Glasgow prognostic factors and by Ranson's CT degree. The predictive value in the evolution of the disease has been related to the need for surgery and related to the number of hospitalization days in non-operated patients. All these factors have been analysed taking into account such variables as age, sex, and biliary origin of the acute pancreatitis.Our study shows no statistically significant correlation between high polymorphonuclear (pmn) elastase serum levels in patients with acute pancreatitis (AP) and their evolution (as evaluated by means of clinical signs and CT images). In other words, determination of high pmn elastase serum levels has no predictive value to indicate the degree of severity in AP. Finally, we have found no clinical use in the lipase/ amylase ratio, neither as a predictive value in the evolution of our AP patients nor as a diagnostic tool to aid in the distinction among AP of biliary origin and AP due to other causes.The severity of acute pancreatitis must be evaluated according to clinical parameters and CAT scan imaging.Acute pancreatitis with hyperlipemia: the incidence of lipid abnormalities in acute pancreatitis.High, not low, amylase and lipase levels indicate severe acute pancreatitis!Serum amylase, lipase and C-reactive protein (CRP) levels upon and CRP again within 72 hours after admission were estimated in 115 consecutive patients with acute pancreatitis and correlated with contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) results performed within 72 hours after admission and scored for morphological changes and necroses. Serum enzyme levels > or = 3 times the upper limit of normal and CRP levels > or = 10 times on admission and maximal CRP levels > or = 10 times within 72 hours after admission significantly correlated with severe pancreatic morphological changes. Thus, contrary to previous belief, high, not low, enzyme levels indicate severe acute pancreatitis. Furthermore, maximal CRP levels > or = 10 times the upper limit of normal within 72 hours in all patients and amylase admission levels of > or = 3 times the upper limit of normal in alcoholics were significantly indicative of pancreatic necroses. Thus, serum enzyme estimation upon, and maximal CRP levels within 72 hours after, admission may help the clinician to evaluate the severity of acute pancreatitis when imaging procedures are not immediately available.[Alpha-amylase determination in acute pancreatitis: selection of a reference standard].It has been investigated which of the amylase determinations agrees most closely with the clinical diagnosis in a group of patients with acute pancreatitis and in a group with other diseases producing amylase elevation. By measuring the amylase in a urine specimen related to its creatinine concentration fewer values within the range of reference in patients with pancreatitis and also fewer falsely elevated values in the second group were observed when compared to amylase in plasma, urinary amylase activity per volume or the amylase/creatinine clearance ratio.[The dextrination method of determining amylase activity in the urine of healthy persons and patients with acute pancreatitis].[Value of simultaneous determinations of alpha-amylase and pancreatic lipase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[Macroamylasemia in the differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].The presence of macroamylasemia should be considered in the differential diagnosis of hyperamylasemia associated with acute abdominal pain, with suspect of pancreatitis. This uncommon and poorly known abnormality is defined as a blinding of serum amylase to certain proteins forming a circulating macrocomplex which prevents renal clearance of serum amylase. Two clinical cases as well as a review of this rare entity are here reported.Simultaneous serum assays of lipase and interleukin-6 for early diagnosis and prognosis of acute pancreatitis.There are no systems for the rapid diagnosis and prognosis of acute pancreatitis in the Emergency Department. Our aim was to evaluate whether the combined use of serum lipase and interleukin-6 or serum lipase and C-reactive protein is able to simultaneously establish both the diagnosis and the prognosis of acute pancreatitis.Eighty patients with acute abdomen were studied on admission to the Emergency Room. Forty patients had nonpancreatic acute abdomen, and 40 had acute pancreatitis (25 had mild acute pancreatitis and 15 had severe pancreatitis). Forty healthy subjects comparable for sex and age were also studied as controls. Lipase, interleukin-6, and C-reactive protein were determined on serum in all subjects.Using lipase to discriminate between patients with nonpancreatic acute abdomen and patients with acute pancreatitis (cutoff values ranging from 419 to 520 U/L), one patient with acute pancreatitis was not identified correctly. To discriminate between patients with severe acute pancreatitis and those with mild pancreatitis in the remaining 39 patients, interleukin-6 (cutoff value, <3.7 microgram/L) had a sensitivity of 100% (15 of 15) and a specificity of 83% (20 of 24); 75 of 80 (94%) patients were classified correctly. C-reactive protein (cutoff values ranging from 6 to 7 mg/L) showed a lower prognostic efficiency than interleukin-6: sensitivity of 87% (13 of 15) and specificity of 46% (11 of 24). Sixty-four of 80 patients (80%) were classified correctly. The area under the ROC curve for interleukin-6 (0.911 +/- 0.049) was significantly (P = 0.013) greater than that for C-reactive protein (0.685 +/- 0.090).The combined use of serum lipase and interleukin-6 is useful in simultaneously establishing both the diagnosis and the prognosis of acute pancreatitis.A cause of misleading serum amylase concentrations in acute pancreatitis.The operative discovery of acute pancreatitis associated with gross hyperlipidaemia but a normal or high elevated serum amylase concentration has been described. We report a case of acute pancreatitis in which serial dilutions of serum resulted in a 338% rise in the serum amylase concentrations. The importance of appreciating this effect of hyperlipidaemia on the serum level measurements in patients with acute pancreatitis is re-emphasised.[The clinical utility of the quotient of lipase-amylase and polymorphonuclear elastase in acute pancreatitis].Is the association of serum lipase with beta2-microglobulin or C-reactive protein useful for establishing the diagnosis and prognosis of patients with acute pancreatitis?In the Emergency Department it is mandatory to establish the diagnosis and the prognosis of acute pancreatitis as soon as possible. To evaluate whether the association of serum lipase either with serum beta2-microglobulin or with C-reactive protein allows simultaneously to establish the diagnosis and the prognosis of acute pancreatitis, 96 patients with acute abdomen were studied. Fifty-eight patients had non-pancreatic acute abdomen and the remaining 38 had acute pancreatitis: 23 mild acute pancreatitis, and 15 severe acute pancreatitis. Forty healthy subjects were studied as controls. Lipase, beta2-microglobulin and C-reactive protein were determined in the serum of all subjects, using commercial kits. One patient with acute pancreatitis was not correctly classified when lipase was used to discriminate between patients with non-pancreatic acute abdomen and those with acute pancreatitis. For the discrimination of patients with severe acute pancreatitis from those with the mild form of the disease in the remaining 37 acute pancreatitis patients, beta2-microglobulin had a sensitivity of 53.3 %, specificity of 81.8%, and prognostic accuracy of 70.3 % (27 of the 37 patients correctly classified); 87.5 % of the 96 cases were correctly classified. C-reactive protein showed a lower prognostic accuracy than beta2-microglobulin: sensitivity 86.7%, specificity 45.5%, accuracy 62.2 %; 84.4 % of the cases were correctly classified. Using the polychotomous logistic regression analysis we found the same accuracy in discriminating between patients with acute pancreatitis and those with non-pancreatic acute abdomen (99.0%) but a lower accuracy (54.1%) between patients with severe acute pancreatitis and those with the mild form of the disease. Our study shows that the association of serum lipase with beta2-microglobulin or with C-reactive protein is not useful in simultaneously establishing the diagnosis and prognosis of acute pancreatitis.Diagnostic value of measuring pancreatic isoamylase with a double-monoclonal antibody immunoassay in serum of hospitalized hyperamylasemic patients.We evaluated the diagnostic utility of measuring pancreatic isoamylase (P-AMY) with a double-monoclonal antibody technique in a population of 43 consecutive hospitalized hyperamylasemic patients in comparison with serum pancreatic lipase (LPS) activity. In 27 cases (62.8%), the final diagnosis was acute pancreatitis. Predictive values were calculated for P-AMY and LPS activities, and a P-AMY percentage was calculated for selected decision levels. The maximal diagnostic efficiency was 0.930, 0.814, and 0.767 for LPS, P-AMY activity, and P-AMY percentage, respectively, indicating that serum LPS measurement was clinically superior to P-AMY for distinguishing patients with or without pancreatitis. Measurement of both P-AMY activity and percentage in serum did not significantly improve diagnostic accuracy.Amylase isoenzymes in the acute abdomen: an adjunct in those patients with elevated total amylase.The role of routine isoamylase determinations in differentiating acute pancreatitis from other causes of an acute abdomen with hyperamylasemia and/or hyperamylasuria was evaluated. Values were analyzed from a control group of 21 patients with acute pancreatitis (group I) and from 100 consecutive patients diagnosed in our emergency department as having an acute abdomen (group II). In group I, 100% of patients had hyperamylasemia, hyperamylasuria, and a P isoamylase fraction greater than 0.75 of the total amylase value. In group II, 50% of patients had hyperamylasemia and/or hyperamylasuria. Of these patients, 44% had a P isoamylase fraction less than 0.75 of the total amylase value, a finding apparently incompatible with a diagnosis of acute pancreatitis as identified by our control group. We conclude that routine isoamylase determinations in patients with an acute abdomen and hyperamylasemia and/or hyperamylasuria allows the differentiation from acute pancreatitis in 44% of cases.[Increased lipase levels].[The diagnostic value of determining the amylase content in blood in acute pancreatitis].Diagnosis and management of acute pancreatitis.Specificity of serum amylase and amylase creatinine clearance ratio in the diagnosis of acute and chronic pancreatitis.In 31 patients with pancreatitis, the amylase to creatinine clearance ratio (CACR) was significantly greater than for controls (10.7 +/- 1.7 vs. 2.6 +/- 0.3, P less than .001). Sixteen pancreatitis patients with serum amylase (SAm) within the normal range had a mean CACR significantly greater than that of 19 hospital control patients with normal SAm (9.2 +/- 1.5 vs. 3.0 +/- 0.4, P less than .001). For control patients a highly significant inverse correlation between SAm and CACR was observed. No relationship was detected between these parameters for pancreatitis patients. The results suggest that the CACR may be of aid in establishing the diagnosis of pancreatitis even in patients without hyperamylasemia.Comparison of urine trypsinogen-2 test strip with serum lipase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.The accuracy of a new rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip (actim Pancreatitis) was compared with that of serum lipase for detection of acute pancreatitis in patients with acute abdominal pain.A prospective study was conducted which consisted of 237 consecutive patients with acute abdominal pain admitted to the emergency unit at Helsinki University Central Hospital. The patients were tested on admission with the actim Pancreatitis test strip. Serum amylase, serum lipase, and urine trypsinogen-2 concentrations were also determined quantitatively.The actim Pancreatitis test strip result was positive in 27 out of 29 patients with acute pancreatitis (sensitivity 93%) and in 16 of 208 patients with non-pancreatic abdominal pain (specificity 92%). This was superior to that of serum lipase (sensitivity 79% and specificity 88%). With a cut-off > 3x the upper reference limit, the sensitivity of serum lipase was only 55% while the specificity was 99%. The high sensitivity for the actim Pancreatitis test strip resulted in a very high negative predictive value of 99%. All six patients with severe acute pancreatitis were detected by the dipstick. With a higher cut-off value (> 3x upper reference limit) for lipase, two patients with severe acute pancreatitis remained undetected. Combining the actim Pancreatitis dipstick with serum lipase a positive predictive value of 94% was obtained.Acute pancreatitis can be excluded with a higher probability with the actim Pancreatitis strip than with serum lipase determination, and therefore appears to be more suitable for screening of acute pancreatitis. With its high specificity with a cut-off > 3x the upper reference limit, serum lipase is suitable as a confirmatory test for pancreatitis when a positive dipstick result is obtained.[Value of the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[Validity of serum amylase and lipase in the differential diagnosis between acute/acutized chronic pancreatitis and other causes of acute abdominal pain].Raised serum amylase and lipase levels are observed in several abdominal diseases.Assessing the validity of serum amylase and lipase for the differential diagnosis between acute pancreatitis/acutized chronic pancreatitis, biliary tract disease, perforated gastroduodenal ulcer and acute appendicitis. PATIENTS E METHODS: Prospective study including 134 individuals: 38 with acute pancreatitis/acutized chronic pancreatitis, 35 with biliary tract disease, 17 with perforated gastroduodenal ulcer and 44 with acute appendicitis, mean age (standard deviation) of 42.4 +/- 17.7, 46.7 +/- 18.3, 47.8 +/- 12 and 33.7 +/- 17.8 years, respectively. Serum amylase and lipase were determined at admission to the emergency department.For the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis/acutized chronic pancreatitis, when the cutt-off levels of serum amylase were set at the upper normal range level or up to 5-fold as high, the sensitivity decreased from 92% to 74%, the specificity increased from 85% to 99%, the positive predictive value increased from 71% to 97%, and the negative predictive value decreased from 96% to 91%. For serum lipase levels similar figures were obtained for sensitivity and negative predictive value, but the specificity and positive predictive value were lower. When the combination of raised serum amylase or lipase were analyzed, a minor increase was observed in sensitivity and negative predictive value.For the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis/acutized chronic pancreatitis: 1) the best cut-off level for both tests was 2-times the upper normal range; 2) the sensitivities of serum amylase and lipase were similar; 3) the specificity and positive predictive value of serum amylase were slightly higher than observed for serum lipase; 4) the sensitivity but not the specificity increased when at least one between amylase or lipase was raised.[Differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and myocardial infarct].Serum amylase measured four hours after endoscopic sphincterotomy is a reliable predictor of postprocedure pancreatitis.Acute pancreatitis is a common complication after endoscopic sphincterotomy (ES) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). The aim of this study was to detect the time when the peak of serum amylase was predictive for pancreatitis or severe hyperamylasemia, to plan a prolonged follow-up in the hospital and for outpatients.In a prospective series of 409 consecutive patients undergoing ES, serum amylase activity was measured immediately before the procedure and 2, 4, 8, and 24 h thereafter; the data obtained at 2, 4, and 8 h were compared with those at 24 h and with the outcome. Sensitivity for long-lasting severe hyperamylasemia (more than five times the upper normal limit) and pancreatitis were also defined for all sampling times.At 24 h after ES, amylase was still more than five times the upper normal limit in 26 patients, 19 of whom had mild/moderate acute pancreatitis. There was a significant difference (p < 0.01 at all sampling times) between the 26 patients with 24-h severe hyperamylasemia and those with lower levels. The sensitivity of amylase measurement in detecting pancreatitis or long-lasting severe hyperamylasemia was highest at 8 h. However, the 4-h assessment appears to be a reliable predictor in practice, as more than two-thirds of cases of pancreatitis (all but one with computed tomography-confirmed pancreatitis) occurred among patients whose 4-h amylasemia was higher than five times the upper normal limit.Serum amylase assessment 4 h after ES minimizes the likelihood of underestimating the risk of postprocedure pancreatitis. It is therefore a reliable, cost-effective follow-up, particularly in outpatients.[Experiences with the determination in the serum for the diagnosis of acute and chronic pancreatic diseases].Towards evidence based emergency medicine: best BETs from the Manchester Royal Infirmary. Urinary trypsinogen to rule out acute pancreatitis in patients with abdominal pain.Evaluation of prognostic factors in patients with acute pancreatitis.The severity of acute pancreatitis is variable and does not always correlate with structural and functional changes in the pancreas. More precise predictors of severity are necessary to enable intensive therapy to be targeted at patients with severe attacks, and to judge efficacy of treatment, to help in the early detection of complications, and to facilitate comparison of patients from different centers.On admission, clinical criteria, biochemical and hematological parameters and multiple prognostic scores (Ranson, Imrie and APACHE-II scores) were collected from patients with acute pancreatitis.Two hundred and twenty-seven patients were seen during the study period. The overall mortality rate was 11.4%. A significantly higher mortality was found in patients with severe pancreatitis (25.8%) than in those with mild disease (1.5%, p=0.00001). Mortality was related to the presence of fever at admission (16.5% vs. 5.0%, p=0.006), and not to age, sex, etiological associations, or concomitant medical or surgical diseases. Of the biochemical and hematological parameters tested, ten factors (plasma glucose, BUN, serum creatinine, serum calcium, serum lactate dehydrogenase, serum albumin, red cell count, white cell count, hematocrit, and lymphocytes count) were found to be statistically significant, and four factors (serum potassium, alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, and hemoglobin) were marginally significant. In high-risk patients (Ranson and Imrie scores > or = 3, APACHE-II score > or = 10) mortality rates were higher (22.5%, 23.0%, and 22.5%, respectively) than in low-risk patients (2.4%, 2.3%, and 0.8%, respectively, p=0.00001). APACHE-II scores may be especially useful for monitoring the progress of patients with pancreatic necrosis and secondary pancreatic necrosis.Acute pancreatitis still represents a condition of variable severity. The adoption of multiparametric criteria proposed together with morphological evaluation consents the formulation of a discreetly reliable prognosis on the evolution of the disease a few days from onset, even though this still appears insufficient to plan a varied and timely therapeutic program.Comparative study of serum pancreatic isoamylase, lipase, and trypsin-like immunoreactivity in pancreatic disease.Serum total amylase, pancreatic and salivary isoamylase, lipase and trypsin-like immunoreactivity (TLI) were measured in 16 patients with acute pancreatitis, 37 patients with chronic pancreatitis, 11 patients with pancreatic cancer, and 53 control subjects in order to evaluate the relative value of these tests in the diagnosis of pancreatic disease. In acute pancreatitis patients studied within 2 days from the onset of pain all pancreatic enzymes were abnormally high. In chronic pancreatitis patients serum pancreatic isoamylase and TLI were abnormally low in 8 out of 10 patients with severely impaired pancreatic exocrine function, while lipase was abnormally low in 6 patients. During acute exacerbations of the disease elevated levels of pancreatic isoamylase and lipase, but not of TLI, were found in about one third of cases. In patients with pancreatic cancer the pattern of changes in serum pancreatic enzymes was variable since levels within, below and above the normal range were found. The results demonstrate that in acute pancreatitis all serum pancreatic enzymes had the same diagnostic sensitivity, however serum lipase determination is the most convenient because of its simplicity and low cost. In chronic pancreatitis serum pancreatic isoamylase and TLI may be useful in detecting severe pancreatic insufficiency. In pancreatic cancer serum pancreatic enzymes lack diagnostic specificity.[Pancreatitis in infants with a clinical diagnosis of septicemia].Considering the possibility that during septicemic processes, pancreatitis could develop, 10 infants were studied when the clinical diagnosis of septicemia was established. With this purpose, the clinical manifestations present in the patients were recorded and the activities of serum amilase and lipase were determined at 24 hour intervals during the first three days and these studies were repeated on the 5th and 7th days. The results showed an abnormally high serum lipase activity, especially in 6 of the 10 infants. The amilase was found within normal limits with a tendency to drop in certain cases. This information suggest the presence of acute pancreatitis in some of the subjects studied.Lipase/amylase ratio in pancreatitis: an etiologic index?Determination of amylase activity in serum by using a wheat germ inhibitor with the Du Pont aca.A rapid procedure for determining salivary- and pancreatic-type amylase (EC 3.2.1.1) in serum by incorporating a wheat germ inhibitor (from Triticum aestivum) was developed for the Du Pont aca IV analyzer. Under optimal assay conditions, activities of salivary and pancreatic amylase were inhibited by 93% and 19%, respectively. The 95% central reference interval for the percentage of inhibition of serum amylase was 38-84%. Patients with acute pancreatitis showed less than 26% inhibition of amylase after addition of the wheat germ extract, reflecting the prevalence of pancreatic-type amylase in this disorder.Urine trypsinogen-2 as marker of acute pancreatitis.We examined the clinical utility of urine trypsinogen-2 as a marker of acute pancreatitis (AP). Fifty-nine patients with AP, 42 with acute abdominal diseases of extrapancreatic origin, and 63 without evidence of acute abdominal disease were studied. Urine trypsinogen-2 was determined by a time-resolved immunofluorometric assay. As reference methods we used serum trypsinogen-2, urine amylase, and serum amylase. The diagnostic accuracy of the markers was evaluated by receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) analysis. At admission, urine trypsinogen-2 differentiated patients with AP from controls with high accuracy. The area under the ROC curve (AUC) was 0.978, which was equal to that of serum trypsinogen-2 (0.998) and serum amylase (0.969) and significantly larger than that of urine amylase. For differentiation between severe and mild AP, urine trypsinogen-2 (0.730) was equal to serum trypsinogen-2 (0.721), and clearly better than amylase in serum and urine. These results suggest that determination of urine trypsinogen-2 is a useful test to detect AP and to evaluate disease severity.Plasma lipase properties as related to pancreatic condition.We examined the sensitivity to colipase of two types of lipase (EC 3.1.1.3) activity in plasma. Results were very similar for plasma lipase corresponding to that found in cases of acute pancreatitis and for swine pancreas lipase, whereas we found some differences between "pancreatitis lipase" and lipase from healthy subjects. Gel-filtration experiments suggest that the two forms of lipase in plasma have different relative molecular masses; moreover, their avidity for antibodies against human pancreatic lipase differs. Guided by these studies, we propose optimal conditions for nephelometry of "pancreatitis" lipase.[Validity and limits of the relation between amylase and creatinine clearance in the diagnosis of acute postoperative pancreatitis].Diagnosis of acute pancreatitis: a proposed sequence of biochemical investigations.In 60 controls and 108 patients admitted with acute abdominal pain, Rapignost urinary amylase correctly identified (++) 18 of the 23 patients with acute pancreatitis (AP), with 8 results being equivocal (+), and 1 false negative. This is a suitable screening test for AP, but an equivocal result requires further investigation. In 14 patients with AP the serum amylase was over 1000 U/l with no false-positive results, whereas when 316 U/l was used as the diagnostic threshold, 22 cases were identified (but with 2 false positives). Serum lipase was 100% sensitive in the diagnosis of AP, but there were three false-positive results.[Amylase/creatinine clearance in the differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].In the Department of Gastroenterology of "El Centro Mdico La Raza, I.M.S.S.", three groups of 20 patients were studied: group I with acute pancreatitis; group II with acute abdomen without pancreatic pathology, in both groups the diagnosis was demonstrated surgically or in necropsy; group III was formed by 20 normal voluntary persons, and served as control. A 4 per cent amilase/creatinine clearence index was considered as a high normal value. The diagnosis accuracy in group I was 90 per cent. In group II there was five false positive results, in 80 per cent of the cases the results of the amilase/creatinine clearence index was found within normal limits. The difference between group I and group III was significant (P less than 0.002). The difference between group I and group II was also significant (P less than 0.05). There was no significant difference between group II and group III. The amilase/creatinine clearence index has the advantage that it can be obtained with only one blood and urine samples taken simultaneously. We concluded that amilase/creatine clearence index is useful for the differential diagnosis in acute pancreatitis and that is probably due to an alteration in the tubular renal reabsorption.Measurement of urinary trypsinogen-2 as a screening test for acute pancreatitis.Incidence of elevated serum amylase levels and pancreatitis after upper abdominal surgery.[Acute pancreatitis. Etiology, diagnosis, prognosis].Evaluation of a rapid urine amylase test using post-ERCP hyperamylasemia as a model.The initial diagnosis of acute pancreatitis is often based on clinical criteria together with elevations of serum amylase and lipase. A reliable bedside urine test could facilitate the early diagnosis of pancreatitis. We evaluated a rapid urine amylase test (Rapignost) by using post-ERCP hyperamylasemia as a human model of acute development of hyperamylasemia suggestive of pancreatitis.Seventy-five patients undergoing ERCP were prospectively evaluated. Patients with renal insufficiency, hyperlipidemia, or hyperglycemia were excluded. Before ERCP, patients had serum amylase and lipase measured, and urine amylase tested with the Rapignost test strip. At 4 and 16-24 h post-ERCP, a serum and urine (test strip) amylase were measured again; the adequacy of urine collection was verified by measuring a 2-h creatinine clearance. Patients were clinically assessed for the development of clinical pancreatitis. The concordance of the strip result with post-ERCP hyperamylasemia was assessed.The sensitivity of the test strip for the detection of hyperamylasemia was greatest at 16-24 h post-ERCP (78%). Specificity was uniformally high (100% specificity at 16-24 h post-procedure). The test strip was positive in all cases of clinical pancreatitis. Of three cases of clinically evident ERCP-induced pancreatitis, only one was urine test strip positive by 4 h post-procedure.Using post-ERCP hyperamylasemia as a model, the Rapignost rapid urine amylase test strip was only marginally sensitive but highly specific for hyperamylasemia. The urine test strip was positive in all cases of clinical pancreatitis and may be a useful bedside test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Comparison of serum amylase pancreatic isoamylase and lipase in patients with hyperamylasemia.We compared results of measurements of total serum amylase, pancreatic isoamylase, and lipase measurements in patients with hyperamylasemia. Serial measurements of these three enzyme levels in patients recovering from acute pancreatitis indicated that pancreatic isoamylase and lipase were elevated above normal to a greater extent and remained elevated much longer than did the total amylase. This finding indicates an appreciable sensitivity advantage of the pancreatic isoamylase and lipase over total amylase measurement during the recovery phase of pancreatitis. Comparison of pancreatic isoamylase and lipase levels in selected sera indicated a good correlation (r = 0.84) between these two measurements in patients who did not have macroamylasemia. Lipase was normal in sera with amylase elevations due solely to salivary isoamylase. Thus, in nonmacroamylsemic sera, pancreatic isoamylase and lipase appear to be roughly interchangeable markers of the level of pancreatic enzymes in the blood. An advantage of the lipase assay is that this enzyme is normal in hyperamylasemia caused by macroamylasemia, whereas the inhibitor assay indicates that the pancreatic isoamylase is elevated. Development of automated assays for either pancreatic isoamylase or lipase should lead to the routine use of one of these assays in place of the present reliance on total amylase measurements in the diagnosis of pancreatitis.Lipase turbidimetric assay and acute pancreatitis.The simplified turbidimetric assay for lipase activity was used for the differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. Serum lipase levels were found to be increased in a group of 17 patients in whom acute pancreatitis was clinically suspected and confirmed by a high ACCR and decreased uptake of the radionuclide in the pancreas scan. The lipase levels were within normal limits in a control group of 14 patients suffering from diseases other than acute pancreatitis. The turbidimetric test was helpful for rapid quantitative determination of serum lipase and thus for the early and accurate diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Studies on serum amylase in normal man and in acute pancreatitis.Amylase isoenzymes in serum, urine, saliva, jejunal juice, and pancreatic tissue were separated by isoelectric focusing. Isoamylase patterns obtained indicated that the majority of amylase activity in normal serum is of salivary gland origin. Pancreatic amylase is characteristically predominant in acute pancreatitis. The increased renal clearance of amylase in acute pancreatitis may be partly due to the increased proportion of the smaller molecular weight pancreatic amylase. However, a demonstrated increase in the renal clearance of salivary amylase in acute pancreatitis suggests a renal cause also. Autopsy pancreas samples devoid of TAME (p-tosyl arginine methyl ester) esterase activity (e.g. trypsin and plasma enzymes such as thrombin and plasmin) had isoenzyme patterns different to those samples with free proteolytic activity. Incubation of TAME esterase free pancreas with trypsin caused conversion of the former isoamylase pattern to one with the predominant isoenzymes focusing coincident with the predominant peak in serum from acute pancreatitis, jejunal aspirate, and TAME esterase positive autopsy pancreas. Such conversion suggests that pancreatic amylase is synthesized in a form different from that found in the intestinal lumen and serum.Serum pancreas-specific protein in acute pancreatitis. Its clinical utility in comparison with serum amylase.To compare the clinical utility of serum pancreas-specific protein and serum amylase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, the study was conducted in 134 normal subjects and 70 patients (36 with acute pancreatitis and 34 with other acute abdominal diseases as control group). The serum level of pancreas-specific protein in 134 healthy adults was 29.6 +/- 1.6 micrograms/l, with 95% within 7.3-67.2 micrograms/l. The upper reference limit was set at 70 micrograms/l. Serum levels of pancreas-specific protein and amylase within 12 h of arrival were significantly higher in patients with acute pancreatitis than in the control group (647.3 +/- 79.3 versus 33.8 +/- 4.8 micrograms/l (p < 0.0001) and 2536 +/- 344 versus 175 +/- 35 IU/l (p < 0.0001)). No significant difference in the levels of pancreas-specific protein was noted between biliary and alcoholic pancreatitis or between severe and mild attacks. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of diagnosing acute pancreatitis were 100%, 94.1%, and 97.1% with serum pancreas-specific protein > 70 micrograms/l and 97.2%, 91.2%, and 94.3% with serum amylase > 360 IU/l. The result demonstrated that pancreas-specific protein may be a good serum marker in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.The lipase to amylase ratio in acute pancreatitis.The ratio of serum lipase to serum amylase has been proposed to distinguish acute episodes of alcoholic from nonalcoholic pancreatitis. We evaluated the efficacy of this test in a community hospital setting.Charts of all patients discharged with a diagnosis of acute pancreatitis over 19 months were retrospectively reviewed. Patients were excluded if their creatinine was greater than 3.0 mg/dl, if the amylase and lipase were not measured within 72 h of the onset of symptoms, or if the cause of pancreatitis was not known by the time of discharge.Of the 56 patients, 31 had alcoholic pancreatitis. The lipase to amylase ratio did not differ significantly between patients with alcoholic and nonalcoholic pancreatitis. Median amylase and lipase were significantly higher in nonalcoholic pancreatitis; however, the wide ranges of both meant that neither amylase nor lipase accurately determined the cause of pancreatitis.The lipase to amylase ratio does not appear to be sufficiently sensitive or specific to distinguish alcoholic from nonalcoholic acute pancreatitis.Proceedings: Specificity of the renal amylase: creatinine clearance ratio in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and in detecting the incidence of pancreatitis after ERCP.Serum tests for pancreatitis in patients with abdominal pain.Though the serum total amylase test has been used for the diagnosis of pancreatitis for over 50 years, both its clinical sensitivity and specificity are far from perfect. We first present the results of serial serum total amylase, pancreatic isoamylase, lipase, and immunoreactive trypsin tests in nine patients during the week after their admission to the hospital with a diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, and then compare the serum total amylase, lipase, and immunoreactive trypsin levels in the initial serum submitted for amylase analysis from 100 patients because of the clinical suspicion of acute pancreatitis. In the former group of patients, the serum total amylase test was the least sensitive of the tests for pancreatitis after the first hospital day. In the latter group of patients, the largest discordance was found in patients with elevated serum total amylase levels, but normal lipase and immunoreactive trypsin levels. In 90% of these discordant cases, the elevation of serum total amylase was due to salivary amylase, yielding a maximum clinical specificity of only 71% for serum total amylase. Based on these data, we conclude that alternate tests deserve careful consideration as replacements for the serum total amylase test.Is serum amylase an obsolete test in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis?Point-of-care urine trypsinogen testing for the diagnosis of pancreatitis.To assess a point-of-care (POC) urine trypsinogen (UT) test for the diagnosis of pancreatitis in the emergency department (ED).This was a prospective cohort study of a convenience sample of patients presenting to the ED with abdominal pain or symptoms suggestive of pancreatitis. A 3-minute POC UT test (Actim Pancreatitis; Medix Biochemica, Kauniainen, Finland) was compared with plasma lipase and amylase measurements, imaging results when performed, and final discharge diagnoses. The criterion standard was a final discharge diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Of 191 patients included in this study, 17 patients were diagnosed with either acute or acute-on-chronic pancreatitis. The sensitivity and specificity of UT for acute pancreatitis were, respectively, 100% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 77% to 100%) and 96% (95% CI = 92% to 98%). Seven of the 17 patients with pancreatitis (41%) had diagnostic findings on CT and positive UT tests but had nondiagnostic plasma lipase and amylase levels.A POC UT screening test for pancreatitis in the ED compared favorably with plasma lipase and amylase levels. Future studies should be performed to explore whether this test in the ED setting has better clinical utility than plasma lipase or amylase.Urinary trypsinogen activation peptide as a marker of severe acute pancreatitis.Trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP) may be an early marker of severe pancreatitis. Previous studies have included all patients with organ failure in the group with severe pancreatitis, although patients with transient organ failure may have a good prognosis. The aim of this study was to determine the value of urinary TAP estimation for prediction of severity of acute pancreatitis, and to validate use of several markers of prediction of severity against a new, stringent definition of severity.Patients with acute pancreatitis were recruited within 24 h of onset of symptoms. Urine and blood samples were collected for 24 h, and Acute Physiology And Chronic Health Evaluation (APACHE) II (24 h), Ranson (48 h) and Glasgow (48 h) scores were calculated. Severe acute pancreatitis was defined by the presence of a local complication or the presence of organ failure for more than 48 h.Urinary TAP levels were significantly greater in patients with severe pancreatitis than in those with mild disease during the first 36 h of admission. The highest of three estimations of TAP in the first 24 h was as effective as APACHE II at 24 h in predicting severity. At 24 h after admission, urinary TAP was better than C-reactive protein (CRP) in predicting severity. The combination of TAP and CRP at 24 h allowed identification of high- and low-risk groups. The new definition of severity excluded 24 of 190 patients with transient organ failure; none of these patients died.Use of TAP improved early prediction of the severity of acute pancreatitis. Organ failure that resolves within 48 h does not signify a severe attack of acute pancreatitis.A comparative study of the urinary trypsinogen-2, trypsinogen activation peptide, and the computed tomography severity index as early predictors of the severity of acute pancreatitis.The aim of the study was to establish the value of urinary trypsinogen-2 in predicting the severity of acute pancreatitis (AP) and to compare it with the accuracy of the urinary trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP) and the computed tomography severity index (CTSI).The study population consisted of 187 consecutive patients with AP, of whom 38 had severe disease. The predictive values of urinary trypsinogen-2, TAP and CTSI were assessed within 24 h of the onset of symptoms.The mean values of predictive markers in the mild and severe pancreatitis groups were: urinary trypsinogen-2, 59/90 and 25/13 (p < 0.001); urinary TAP, 13.2 +/- 3.3nmol/l and 66.2 +/- 19.3 nmol/l (p < 0.001); and computed tomography severity index, 1.42 +/- 1.1 and 5.31 +/- 2.6 (p < 0.001). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and positive and negative likelihood ratios were calculated for the urinary trypsinogen-2 (65.7%, 66.4%, 33.3%, 88.4%, 1.9, and 0.51), for TAP (greater than 35 nmol/l: 63.2%, 65.8%, 32.0%, 87.5%, 1.9, and 0.58) and for CTSI (greater than 3: 47.4%, 95.3%, 69.2%, 87.7%, 9.0 and 0.55). To differentiate between severe and mild AP, urinary trypsinogen-2 (AUC 0.724) was slightly better than TAP (AUC 0.722), and they were both clearly better than CTSI (AUC 0.597) (p < 0.05). Urinary trypsinogen-2 had significantly lower cost (p < 0.001) than TAP and computed tomography.Urinary trypsinogen-2 was superior to CTSI and was as good as or even better than urinary TAP in the early prediction of severity in AP. This suggests that this simple and quick method deserves routine clinical application.[Diagnostic effectiveness of immunoreactive serum trypsinogen, pancreatic iso-amylase and lipase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatic injury in hyperamylasemic patients].Comparative value of serum and urinary amylase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Normal serum amylase in acute pancreatitis.Effectivity of qualitative urinary trypsinogen-2 measurement in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis: a randomized, clinical study.There is no any definite diagnostic test for acute pancreatitis. In the present study we investigated the value of the qualitative urinary trypsinogen-2 measurement in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis by an immuno-chromatographic dipstick test.A prospective, randomized, clinical trial was planned on 99 patients (53 male, 46 female; male/female : 1.11; age range: 16-83; mean age: 37.4). Patients were divided into two groups: 50 cases were referred to our emergency surgical unit due to abdominal pain and diagnosed with acute pancreatitis by abdominal computerized tomography (CT) (Group 1); 49 cases were referred to our emergency surgical unit due to abdominal pain and whose abdominal CTs did not show any sign of acute pancreatitis (Group 2). Qualitative urinary trypsinogen-2 measurement, abdominal CT and blood amylase values were obtained in all cases.In group 1, urinary trypsinogen-2 measurement was found positive in 28 cases out of 50 cases diagnosed with acute pancreatitis (56% sensitivity). In group 2, results were found positive in 3 out of 49 patients with abdominal pain, who lacked an acute pancreatitis diagnosis (90.9% specificity). Severe intra-abdominal inflammation was present in three cases of group 2 where we obtained false positive results which may stimulate the pancreatic exocrine secretion.Qualitative measurements of urinary trypsinogen-2 in patients with abdominal pain may be useful in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. It is an easy, inexpensive, rapid and noninvasive method.[Value of blood lipase determination in pancreatic diseases. Comparison with blood amylase assay].The comparative diagnostic value of plasma lipase and amylase levels was evaluated in 90 patients with various symptoms of pancreatic disease. Comparison with healthy subjects showed that the lipase assay was more sensitive than the amylase assay in patients with acute pancreatitis or post-traumatic pancreatic injury, but not in patients with chronic pancreatitis. On the other hand, acute pancreatitis can be detected earlier by measuring plasma amylase levels, owing to the rapid release of this enzyme. The relative importance of these two laboratory tests is discussed.Combined diagnostic value of biochemical markers in acute pancreatitis.Eighty-three patients suffering from upper abdominal pain were studied to evaluate the contribution of commonly used biochemical markers in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. On admission to hospital, serum amylase, lipase, total bilirubin, aspartate aminotransferase, alanine aminotransferase, alkaline phosphatase and gamma-glutamyl transferase activities were measured. By stepwise logistic discrimination, only two determinations appeared to be of clinical value: lipase and alkaline phosphatase activities. A classification rule was established including these two measurements and its diagnostic performance evaluated by a jackknifed method amounted .83%. ROC curves were used to assess sensitivity and specificity. Our study clearly shows that serum lipase measurements should be preferred to amylase measurements, and that our two-test classification rule provides an efficient aid in clinical decision-making.Diagnostic value of immunoreactive phospholipase A2 in acute pancreatitis.In a prospective clinical trial 85 patients with acute pancreatitis were analysed for serum total amylase, pancreatic amylase, pancreatic lipase, trypsin, elastase 1, and immunoreactive phospholipase A2 (IR-PLA2). The diagnostic sensitivity of serum IR-PLA2 was comparable to that of serum total amylase, pancreatic amylase, and trypsin. The specificity of IR-PLA2 is superior to that of serum total amylase determination due to the fact that the IR-PLA2 determination is based on an antibody against human pancreatic PLA2.Evaluation of pancreatic amylase immunoassay in acute pancreatitis.Urinary trypsinogen activation peptides (TAP) are not increased in mild ERCP-induced pancreatitis.Acute pancreatitis following endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) occurs in 3-18% of patients undergoing either diagnostic or therapeutic ERCP. We prospectively measured urinary trypsinogen activation peptides (TAP) by an automated anti-TAP enzyme-linked immunoassay among 107 patients 4 h after ERCP to determine whether this measurement helps in the early diagnosis of ERCP-induced pancreatitis. Pancreatitis was documented in 10 of 107 patients (9.3%). All episodes were graded as mild. Urinary TAP was not significantly increased. We conclude that measurement of urinary TAP 4 h after ERCP is not helpful in documenting mild ERCP-induced acute pancreatitis.[Diagnostic significance of diastasuria in acute pancreatitis].Comparison of elastase-1 with amylase, lipase, and trypsin-like immunoreactivity in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Serum elastase-1, amylase, lipase, and trypsin-like immunoreactivity were measured in a group of 17 consecutive patients with acute pancreatitis. When assayed within 24 h of the onset of symptoms, all enzymes were found to be elevated, thus showing similar sensitivity. Elastase-1 did not improve the diagnostic score of the other enzymes studied. Owing to their much quicker and less expensive determinations, amylase and lipase should be considered the best initial markers of pancreatic injury. However, during the course of pancreatitis, amylase and in a lesser degree lipase returned to normal in more cases than elastase or trypsin; both were still elevated in 90% of the patients 10 days after the onset of the symptoms. Thus, trypsin and/or elastase-1 should be reserved for cases of doubtful or delayed diagnosis. The specificity and the positive predictive value of these enzymes need to be evaluated.The diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in the presence of hyperlipaemia.The value of the amylase/creatinine clearance ratio in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Acute pancreatitis usually confronts the clinician with a difficult diagnostic task. For years, the primary laboratory diagnostic tests were the serum and urine amylase and the serum lipase determinations. Recent studies have introduced the concept of the amylase/creatinine clearance ratio as a means of increasing the specificity of the laboratory diagnosis. This paper reviews the laboratory evaluation of acute pancreatitis with emphasis on the rationale, derivation, and specificity of the amylase/creatinine clearance ratio.[Significance of lipase determination in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[Value of the amylase/creatinine ratio in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Diagnostic tests and prognostic indicators in acute pancreatitis.Differential determination of serum isoamylase using an amylase inhibitor and its clinical application.Diagnostic significance of a simple and rapid screening procedure for determining the relative amounts of pancreatic and salivary isoamylase using an amylase inhibitor was evaluated in 242 subjects (controls 84, acute pancreatitis nine, chronic pancreatitis 28, pancreatic cancer 14, peptic ulcer 25, liver cirrhosis 15, cholelithiasis 24, irritable colon syndrome 13, diabetes mellitus 13, mumps seven, and chronic renal failure 10). Electrophoretically separated isoamylases of saliva and pure pancreatic juice were all inhibited at similar degrees to the corresponding unfractionated amylases. Total amylase and pancreatic isoamylase were elevated in all nine patients with acute pancreatitis. Pancreatic isoamylase was decreased in 12 of 28 patients (43%) with chronic pancreatitis and increased in nine of 14 patients (64%) with pancreatic cancer. The mean pancreatic isoamylase activity in the patients with acute pancreatitis was significantly higher (p less than 0.01), while that of chronic pancreatitis was significantly lower (p less than 0.05) when compared with controls. The inhibition method offers simple, rapid, and specific analysis of serum isoamylase for the differential diagnosis of hyperamylasemia in cases of emergency.Serum lipase assay. A test of choice in acute pancreatitis.We evaluated the clinical accuracy of an automated turbidimetric assay for serum lipase determination in order to screen for acute pancreatic damage. Seventy patients with pancreatic and thirty with nonpancreatic digestive diseases were studied. Fifty-two healthy subjects were also studied as controls. Serum lipase concentrations were abnormally high in all patients with acute pancreatitis and in 3 (10%) in the group of 30 patients with nonpancreatic acute abdomen. In the 35 patients with chronic pancreatitis studied during clinical remission, serum lipase levels were abnormally high in 8 (23%), and abnormally low in 3 (9%). In the 9 patients with pancreatic cancer, 4 (44%) had abnormally elevated serum lipase values and 1 (11%) abnormally low. The results indicate that serum lipase determination is useful in the emergency diagnosis of acute pancreatic damage because of its high sensitivity and specificity. In patients with chronic pancreatitis and in patients with pancreatic carcinoma serum lipase determination is of limited value.Use of the urinary trypsinogen-2 dip stick test in early diagnosis of pancreatitis after endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.This study aimed to prove that the urinary trypsinogen-2 dip stick test can be used for early diagnosis of pancreatitis after endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).For this prospective, blinded, pilot study, urine samples were collected before ERCP, 1 h after ERCP, and 4 h after ERCP. The urine dipstick test was used to detect trypsinogen-2 on the basis of immunochromatography. The dipstick results were compared with those of current methods used to diagnose post-ERCP pancreatitis. Once the patient disposition was finalized, pancreatic enzymes, clinical findings, and final diagnosis were obtained from the chart and compared with the urine trypsinogen-2 test findings. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were calculated.The urine trypsinogen dip stick test was performed for 30 patients (15 men and 15 women). Post-ERCP pancreatitis was diagnosed in 5 of 29 patients by clinician assessment, serum pancreatic enzyme levels, or both. The amylase and lipase levels for post-ERCP patients with and without pancreatitis were 650 +/- 145 vs 134 +/- 26 (p = 0.023) and 1,658 +/- 594 vs 84 +/- 17 (p = 0.057), respectively. This statement proves that patients who developed post ERCP pancreatitis had significant elevation of amylase and lipase compared to patients who did not have pancreatitis. For the dip stick test, 6 of 28 patients had positive results in 1 h and 6 of 29 patients had positive results in 4 h. The sensitivity of the 1-h test was 1.0, and the specificity was 0.91. The positive predictive value (PPV) was 0.66, and the negative predictive value (NPV) was 1.0. The sensitivity of the 4-h test was 1.0, and the specificity was 0.96. The PPV was 0.8, and NPV value was 1.0.The urinary trypsinogen-2 dip stick test is useful for early diagnosis of post-ERCP pancreatitis and allows the testing physicians to begin management early in its course.[Some of criteria in the evaluation of severity and prognosis with different forms of acute pancreatitis].The aim of the research is to improve diagnosis and assessment of severity and prognosis with different forms of acute pancreatitis. In 79 patients were studied levels of leukocytes, lymphocytes, leucocyte intoxication index (LII), the content of lactate dehydrogenase (LDG), creatinephosphokinase (CPK), amylase, aspartate aminotransferase (AST, alanine aminotransferase (ALT).The level of leukocytes reflects the severity of the disease, but had no prognostic value. The level of lymphocytes, LII. LDG and lipase reflect the severity, of the disease and have prognostic value. The level of amylase, AST, ALT, CPK not always reflect the severity of the disease, but had prognostic value.The most readily available to assess the severity and prognosis in acute pancreatitis are the level of blood lymphocytes and LII. Indicators LDG. CPK, amylase, lipase, AST and ALT also reflect the course and prognosis of the disease.[Importance of the delay in the serum determination of amylase, lipase and isoamylase P3 in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Predicting the severity of acute pancreatitis by rapid measurement of trypsinogen-2 in urine.Early identification of patients at risk of developing a severe attack of acute pancreatitis (AP) is of great importance because rapid therapeutic interventions improve outcome. At a cutoff of 50 microg/L, trypsinogen-2 measured by a rapid urinary dipstick is a sensitive and specific diagnostic test in AP. The trypsinogen-2 concentration correlates with the severity of the disease, and a test with a higher cutoff might therefore be useful for prediction of disease severity.We increased the detection limit of the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip (Actim Pancreatitis) from 50 microg/L to 2000 microg/L and evaluated the prognostic value of this test. The results were compared with those obtained with serum C-reactive protein and the acute physiology and chronic health evaluation II (APACHE II) score. The study population consisted of 150 consecutive patients with AP (42 with severe disease).The sensitivity of the rapid urinary test strip (detection limit, 2000 microg/L) for prediction of severe AP, both on admission and at 24 h, was 62%; specificities were 87% and 85%, respectively, positive predictive values were 65% and 62%, and negative predictive values were 85% and 85%. C-Reactive protein had a sensitivity of only 38% on admission, but at 24 h, it was 83%; specificities were 90% and 70%, respectively, whereas positive predictive values were 59% and 52%, and NPVs were 79% and 91%, respectively. On admission the positive-likelihood ratio for the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip was 4.8, and at 24 h it was 4.2; for C-reactive protein, the values were 3.7 and 2.7, respectively.The urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick is a simple and rapid method for prediction of severe acute pancreatitis.Time period from onset of pain to hospital admission and patients' awareness in acute pancreatitis.This study aimed to explore the period between onset of pain and hospital-admission (pain-to-admission time) in patients with acute pancreatitis (AP), to investigate the prognostic value and associated factors of this time, and to ascertain the knowledge about the pancreas in these patients.An analysis of a prospective multicenter study was done, which included 188 patients with AP.Median pain-to-admission time was 27 hours (interquartile range, 6.0-72.0). Median pain-to-admission time was significantly shorter in intensive care unit (ICU) patients (10 hours) compared to non-ICU patients (36 hours) (P = 0.045). Short pain-to-admission time was associated with high pain level. Median pain level (0, no pain; 10, maximal pain) was 8.0 (interquartile range, 7.0-10.0). Older age correlated with lower pain level (r = -0.26; P = 0.002). Multiple logistic regression analysis including the admission values for serum lipase and C-reactive protein and the corresponding interactions to the pain-to-admission time showed substantial discriminative ability regarding ICU admission (concordance index, 0.706; P = 0.006). 86% (112/130) knew that they have a pancreas, 72% (81/112) of these patients knew that AP exists, and 56% (45/81) recognized that AP is potentially fatal.Knowledge about AP in hospitalized AP patients is poor. Serum lipase and C-reactive protein in dependency of the pain-to-admission time might be a suitable predictor for severity of AP.[Diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[Significance of the determination of multiple forms of urinary amylases for the diagnosis of exocrine pancreas diseases].The multiple amylases of the urine were examined in healthy persons and in patients with acute and chronic pancreatitis as well as with parotitis using the polyacryl amide gel disk electrophoresis. A separation into about 7 amylase-containing fractions was achieved which could be coordinated to the pancreatic juice and to saliva. In acute pancreatitis the pancreas amylases increased, in chronic pancreatitis, on the other hand, they decreased. In parotitis the salivary amylases increased. For diagnostic purposes the formation of quotients from certain fractions was useful. The examination of the multiple amylases of the urine according to the method mentioned leads to an improved clinico-chemical diagnostics of diseases of the exocrine pancreas and gives the possibility of their course control.Clinical evaluation of a new rapid assay for serum lipase determination.We evaluated a new continuous colorimetric method for serum lipase determination based on the use of a 1,2-diglyceride as substrate and a specific 2-monoglyceride lipase. This test was compared with a turbidimetric assay and also with serum alpha-amylase and pancreatic isoamylase determinations. We studied 32 patients with acute pancreatitis, 27 with chronic pancreatitis in acute painful relapse, 19 with pancreatic cancer, 44 with other digestive diseases, 53 with end-stage renal disease, and 102 healthy controls. The results of the new test were closely correlated with those of the turbidimetric method (r = 0.96). Sensitivity of the new method was elevated (100%): it was the same as that of the turbidimetric method, but slightly higher than that of alpha-amylase and pancreatic isoamylase determinations (93.7 and 96.9%, respectively). Specificity was 95.5%, i.e. higher than that observed using the other tests (86.4, 84.1 and 88.6% for lipase turbidimetric assay, amylase, and pancreatic isoamylase determinations, respectively). The results demonstrate that this new lipase assay is a sensitive, specific test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.[Value of the simultaneous determination of alpha-amylase and pancreatic lipase for the diagnosis of attacks of acute pancreatitis].[1-hour urinary amylase excretion in acute pancreatitis].Diagnostic assays in acute pancreatitis. A study of sensitivity and specificity.The sensitivity and specificity of five assays used to diagnose acute pancreatitis were studied: two amylase assays; one lipase; one trypsinogen; and one pancreatic isoamylase. Thirty-nine patients with acute pancreatitis were compared to 127 controls with abdominal pain. Using the upper limit of normal both amylase assays appeared sensitive but somewhat nonspecific (specificities of 88.9% and 86%, respectively). The trypsinogen and pancreatic isoamylase assays were also relatively nonspecific (specificity of 82.8% and 85.1%). Most nonspecific elevations occurred between a one- and twofold elevation of each assay. Lipase, however, maintained excellent specificity (99%) at its upper limit of normal. If the level of best cutoff is used instead (the level that best enhances sensitivity and specificity), the specificities of both amylase assays, as well as the trypsinogen and pancreatic isoamylase assays, exceed 95%. At the best cutoff level, trypsinogen maintains a qualitative advantage in sensitivity over lipase or pancreatic isoamylase (97.4% as compared to 86.5% and 84.6%).A comparison of serum trypsinogen-2 and trypsin-2-alpha1-antitrypsin complex with lipase and amylase in the diagnosis and assessment of severity in the early phase of acute pancreatitis.The aim of the study was to compare the recently introduced laboratory markers trypsinogen-2 and trypsin-2-alpha1 antitrypsin complex (trypsin-2-AAT) in serum with lipase and amylase in the diagnostic and prognostic evaluation of patients with acute pancreatitis (AP).The analytes were measured on admission in 64 consecutive patients with AP and in 30 controls with acute abdominal disease of extrapancreatic origin. Twenty-one patients had severe and 43 mild AP. As reference methods we used serum amylase and C-reactive protein.In subjects with AP, elevated trypsinogen-2 values (> or = 90 microg/L) were observed in 63 patients (98%), trypsin-2-AAT values (> or = 12 microg/L) in 64 patients (100%), lipase values (> or = 200 U/L) in 64 patients (100%), and amylase values (> or = 300 IU/L) in 62 patients (97%). The diagnostic accuracy of the markers was evaluated by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis. On admission, trypsinogen-2, trypsin-2-AAT, lipase, and amylase differentiated patients with AP from controls with high accuracy and ROC analyses showed similar areas under the ROC curves (AUC) for trypsinogen-2 (AUC 0.960), trypsin-2-AAT (0.948), lipase (AUC 0.947), and amylase (AUC 0.930). For differentiation between severe and mild AP, trypsin-2-AAT (AUC 0.805) was slightly better than trypsinogen-2 (AUC 0.792), and they were both clearly better than lipase (AUC 0.583), C-reactive protein (AUC 0.519), or amylase (AUC 0.632) (p < 0.05).All the markers studied showed high accuracy for differentiating between AP and extrapancreatic diseases. However, trypsinogen-2 and trypsin-2-AAT displayed the best accuracy for predicting a severe AP already at admission, which makes these markers superior for clinical purposes.Amylase isoenzyme clearances in normal subjects and in patients with acute pancreatitis.Renal clearances of amylase isoenzymes, expressed as percentages of creatinine clearances, were determined in 20 normal subjects and in 8 patients with acute pancreatitis. The isoenzyme assay employed thin layer isoelectric focusing, starch iodine staining, and densitometry. Normal clearance of pancreatic-like amylase (mean +/- SE: 3.00 +/- 0.40%) was greater than the clearance of salivary-like amylase (0.51 +/- 0.06%) in ea ch individual (P less than 0.001). However, the amount of pancreatic amylase in the serum was not the major determinant of amylase clearance. Normal clearance of pancreatic-like amylase was significantly (P less than 0.001) less than the clearance of total serum amylase in acute pancreatitis (6.49 +/- 1.07%). In pancreatitis the clearance of pancreatic-like amylase (7.29 +/- 1.19%) and the clearance of salivary-like amylase (4.55 +/- 1.02%) were both elevated compared to normal (P less than 0.001). These findings indicate that the increased clearance of amylase in pancreatitis results from a change in renal function rather than a change in serum amylase. Renal changes not reflected by increased serum creatinine or more than mild proteinuria may be manifestations of the systemic toxicity of acute pancreatitis.Serum amylase levels and acute pancreatitis.A comparison of currently used serum lipase and amylase procedures in the serial detection of enzyme elevations in acute pancreatitis.Twenty-eight patients having acute pancreatitis were followed during convalescence with serum amylase and lipase determinations. Starch and p-nitrophenyl-oligosaccharide substrates were used for amylase. Dimercaptotributyrate and triolein were employed for lipase. The extreme sensitivity of the lipase procedure using the tributyrate detected a persistent elevation of lipase when other parameters of measurement had returned to normal.Trypsin-alpha 1-protease inhibitor complexes in serum and clinical course of acute pancreatitis.The levels of amylase, trypsinogen, and trypsin-alpha 1-protease inhibitor complexes, both in serum and in peritoneal fluid, were correlated to the severity and clinical course in 27 attacks of acute pancreatitis. Serum levels of trypsin-alpha 1-protease inhibitor complexes on admission correlated well with the severity and clinical course of the disease, whereas serum levels of amylase and trypsinogen did not. This may be of clinical importance in differentiating severe acute pancreatitis from milder and self-limiting forms of the disease.Normal amylase levels in the presentation of acute pancreatitis.Recent literature suggests that serum amylase levels are not an appropriate screen for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis because specificity and sensitivity are poor. Evidence from several studies supports the use of lipase determinations to diagnose acute pancreatitis, and recent improvements in this assay have made it more readily available to the emergency physician. This retrospective review compares the use of serum amylase to lipase levels in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in 52 patients who presented to the emergency department, with the hospital discharge diagnosis serving as the gold standard to which the assays were compared. Serum lipase was found to be more sensitive than serum amylase (95% vs 79%); serum amylase levels decreased to normal significantly faster than lipase levels.[Diagnostic value of the determination of serum amylase and serum lipase in suspected acute onset of acute or chronic pancreatitis].In a prospective study the value of serum amylase and serum lipase determination has been analyzed in 19 patients with an acute episode of acute or chronic pancreatitis and in 19 patients with acute abdomen not due to pancreatitis. The concentration of urinary amylase and the urinary output of amylase in the spot urine as well as after a two-hour collection period have also been examined. The normal values were determined in 21 healthy volunteers and the reproducibility of the various parameters was analyzed after 1 hour and 25 hours in these volunteers. For diagnosis of an acute episode of chronic pancreatitis serum amylase was found to have good sensitivity, but a specificity inferior to that of serum lipase. By contrast, the specificity of serum lipase is excellent. Unlike determination of serum enzymes, measurement of urinary enzymes in all variations does not offer any further advantage. Except for the combination of serum amylase and serum lipase, none of the other tested combinations provides further diagnostic information. The examination of spot urine samples is not inferior to the 2-hour urine specimen. For the time being the combination of serum amylase and serum lipase determination is again recommended for diagnostic routine in patients with an acute episode of pancreatitis.Serum lipase determination in acute pancreatitis. Clinical appraisal of a new method.Radioimmunoassay of human pancreatic amylase with monoclonal antibody.A monoclonal antibody (E-21) was obtained that specifically binds to human pancreatic amylase and shows negligible cross-reaction with human salivary amylase. Using this antibody a radioimmunoassay was developed for pancreatic amylase in human serum. The assay was shown to be sensitive (detectable up to 7 mg/L), reproducible, and specific for pancreatic amylase. In normal subjects, the mean concentration of serum pancreatic amylase determined by this method was 36.3 mg/L with a 95% confidence range of 16.5 to 79.2 mg/L. A good correlation was observed between the concentrations of immunoreactive pancreatic amylase (IR-PA) and enzymatic activities in 20 serum samples (r = 0.97). The concentration of serum IR-PA was below the detectable limit in pancreatectomised patients, and was greatly increased in patients with acute pancreatitis; the latter was accompanied by parallel changes in total enzymic activity. In patients with mumps, the serum IR-PA level was within the normal range whereas the total enzymic activity was elevated.The amylase clearance/creatinine clearance ratios in acute pancreatitis.Diagnostic and prognostic utility of phospholipase A activity in patients with acute pancreatitis: comparison with amylase and lipase.We compared the diagnostic and prognostic utility of phospholipase A (PLA; EC 3.1.1.4) for acute pancreatitis with that of amylase and lipase by analysis of sera from 151 consecutive patients presenting with abdominal pain in whom assays of serum amylase and (or) lipase had been ordered. We determined the diagnostic accuracy for both the initial and the peak enzyme activities. Maximal diagnostic accuracy obtained for the initial activities of amylase, lipase, and PLA was 0.83, 0.83, and 0.76 at cutoff values of 650, 650, and 41 U/L, respectively. Use of peak enzyme activities showed maximal diagnostic accuracy of 0.85, 0.86, and 0.73 at cutoff values of 650, 1050, and 42 U/L, respectively. Receiver-operator characteristic curve analysis revealed the diagnostic performance of amylase and lipase to be similar, whereas that of PLA was almost random and not incremental. As with amylase and lipase, PLA activities in sera showed no relation to patients' survival; three patients who died after an attack of acute pancreatitis failed to demonstrate the dramatic increases in PLA activity previously described. We conclude that assessing the severity of acute pancreatitis by using enzyme activities still remains problematical. Measurements of amylase or lipase activities provide similar diagnostic discrimination when appropriate cutoff values are used and remain the methods of choice for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Plasma pancreatic lipase activity: from analytical specificity to clinical efficiency for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Using five procedures (turbidimetry with the Boehringer Mannheim kit and with a home made reagent, reflectometry with the Eastman Kodak kit, colorimetry with the Sigma kit, and UV spectrophotometry with the Wako kit), lipase activity was assayed in the same group of 60 healthy adults and in 30 patients suffering from acute pancreatitis (n = 197 samples) as well as in a purified and stabilized preparation of human pancreatic lipase. Results indicated considerable inter-assay discrepancies for the mean values of the patients' results: catalytic activity concentrations differed by a factor of up to 16 according to the measurement procedures. For each method, mean patients' results were also expressed as multiples of the upper limit of normal values. This method of presentation did not significantly improve the intra-assay agreement, with maximal relative differences as high as 13-fold. When each method was calibrated with the same material (human pancreatic lipase), the inter-assay agreement was considerably improved. The causes of inter-assay disagreement are discussed in detail, and the necessity for a validated lipase calibrator is stressed, in order to improve the efficiency of the information transmitted by clinical laboratories to clinicians. A strategy is proposed, which includes development of a reference method and reference material, and a study of inter-assay commutability of secondary calibrators for a set of methods.[Significance of immunoreactive lipase in the diagnosis of pancreatic diseases].The diagnostic value of a new enzyme immunoassay for lipase (IRL) was evaluated in controls (n = 65), in acute pancreatitis (n = 11) and in extrapancreatic hyperamylasemia (n = 15) by comparing IRL with serum amylase (TA), pancreatic isoamylase (PA) and lipase (turbidimetrically: TL). IRL and immunoreactive trypsin (IRT) of 60 patients with alcoholic chronic calcified pancreatitis were also studied and correlated with duration of disease and degree of pancreatic insufficiency (based on fecal chymotrypsin test: FCT). IRL was constantly elevated in patients with acute pancreatitis. In extrapancreatic hyperamylasemia IRL was mainly normal, in contrast to PA, which was elevated in 7 patients with macroamylasemia. In 56.7% of all patients with chronic pancreatitis, IRL was pathologically low; in association with advanced insufficiency (FCT less than 20 micrograms/g) this figure was 74%, and after duration of disease of greater than or equal to 15 years 77%. For IRT comparable results were found in 79% and 77% respectively. This new lipase test thus seems to be useful for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, the differential diagnosis of extrapancreatic hyperamylasemia and the detection and monitoring of severe chronic pancreatitis.Persistence of increased amylase and lipase concentrations in acute pancreatitis.A prospective study of serum pancreatic elastase-1 in the diagnosis and assessment of acute pancreatitis.Serum amylase gives a poor estimate of both the true incidence and the severity of acute pancreatitis (AP).We evaluated serum pancreatic elastase-1 (PE-1) prospectively in 567 patients in whom AP was suspected. In established AP, severity was assessed using the Glasgow Criteria, and C-reactive protein, amylase, and serum PE-1 were evaluated over 5 days.The sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic efficiency of serum PE-1 were 0.66, 0.85, and 0.84, respectively. The diagnostic accuracy of serum PE-1 was 0.80, and that of amylase 0.97. Serum PE-1 did not correlate with disease severity or the development of complications, but it fell more slowly than the serum amylase in the week after admission.The serum PE-1 level correlated closely with the serum amylase but conferred no benefit as a diagnostic test, nor did it provide further prognostic information.Sensitivity of the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio in acute pancreatitis.An elevated amylase-creatinine clearance ratio has been established as being highly specific for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. In the present study, the sensitivity of this test was compared to that of the serum amylase and the one-hour urinary amylase test in 29 patients with acute pancreatitis. Abnormal elevations of the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio were found less frequently than abnormal elevations of the serum and one-hour urinary amylases. Moreover, abnormal elevations of the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio showed less deviation from normal and values returned to normal sooner than those of the serum and one-hour urinary amylases. When compared to the serum amylase and the one-hour urinary amylase tests, the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio is a relatively insensitive test in patients with acute pancreatitis.[Diagnosis and treatment of acute pancreatitis].In diagnosis of acute pancreatitis of special importance is determination of the activity of transamidinase, phospholipase A, lipase, concentration of copper, calcium and triglycerides in blood serum as well as laparoscopy with biopsy and local thermometry of the pancreas. The dosage of 5-fluoruracil in the complex treatment of patients should be differentiated corresponding to the form of the disease: 3 mg/kg in the endomatous form, 5 mg/kg in the destructive form. The general lethality was 1.4%. In conservative treatment there were no lethal outcomes.[Semiquantitative lipase determination--a useful screening test for pancreatitis?].In 233 sera, taken from 112 patients and 20 healthy blood-donors, we have compared RapiTex-Lipase, a semi quantitative immunochemical latex test for the determination of the lipase, with the conventional quantitative method of determination in order to establish its diagnostical value as a screening test for acute pancreatitis. It appeared that, with a positive result of the test increased values of lipase were found in 98% of the cases, but that a negative result of the test did not exclude an increased lipase. The sensitivity of the test as to the quantitative determination of the lipase depended directly on the activity of the lipase and turned out to be acceptable at 88% only with values 4 X higher than the upper limit of the normal range. With values 5 X higher and more, it reached 100%. Even if the test, due to its very high level of discrimination, did not show a reaction in every case of unspecific extrapancreatic hyperlipasemia, its organ-specificity for the pancreas was reduced and came to 80 to 96% in patients with renal insufficiency, diseases of the liver, abuse of alcohol and in various non-pancreatic intra- or extra-abdominal affections. In 16/18 patients with acute pancreatitis the test used for screening turned out positive (sensitivity 89%), two patients with values between 2 and 4 X the upper limit of the norm had a negative test.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)[The diagnosis of postoperative acute pancreatitis].Trypsin-like immunoreactivity in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Elevated serum and urine amylase and serum lipase values are not always diagnostic of an acute pancreatitis, on the account of the extrapancreatic production of these enzymes. A diagnostic improvement can be made by using the CAm/CCr ratio, but this index too is abnormal in some non pancreatic diseases. Since trypsin measurement seems to be more specific in the evaluation of pancreatic condition, serum trypsin-like immunoreactivity has been measured in 28 patients with acute pancreatitis, 95 patients with a wide spectrum of gastroenterological diseases and in 30 patients with severe chronic renal failure. 85 normal subjects were used as controls. Abnormally high serum trypsin-like immunoreactivity (TLI) values were detected in 100% of patients with acute pancreatitis, without any overlap with normal controls. TLI values above the upper normal limit were also found in 70% of patients with severe renal damage, while none of the patients with liver disease, biliary disease, peptic ulcer an inflammatory bowel disease had elevated TLI levels. In 29 patients with hyperamylasemia due to extra-pancreatic diseases serum trypsin-like immunoreactivity was always within the normal range. It is concluded that the determination of serum TLI is a sensitive and reliable tool in the diagnosis of an acute pancreatic inflammation, providing that a severe renal failure is excluded.Hyperamylasaemia and acute pancreatitis in paracetamol poisoning.Hyperamylasaemia and even acute pancreatitis have been reported in patients with paracetamol poisoning.To describe the incidence, clinical characteristics, and prognostic implications of hyperamylasaemia in paracetamol poisoning.Six hundred and two patients transferred to a specialized unit with severe paracetamol poisoning and 212 unselected patients admitted from the local region.Retrospective study based on hospital charts. The optimum threshold of serum amylase to discriminate non-survivors was identified.An elevated serum amylase (>100 U/L) occurred in 28 of the unselected patients (13%), in 218 of the transferred patients (36%), and in 118 of 148 patients (80%) with fulminant hepatic failure. Only 33 cases of paracetamol-associated acute pancreatitis were diagnosed. A threshold serum amylase of 150 U/L to discriminate non-survivors had sensitivity 76%, specificity 85%, positive predictive value 33%, and negative predictive value 97%. In a logistic regression analysis, a serum amylase > 150 U/L was associated with an excess mortality (odds ratio 5.0, 2.6-9.7).Hyperamylasaemia is frequent in patients with paracetamol poisoning, whereas clinical acute pancreatitis occurs rarely. The incidence of hyperamylasaemia increases with the degree of hepatic dysfunction. A serum amylase exceeding 1.5 times the upper normal limit indicates a poor prognosis.Immunochemical qualitative latex agglutination test for pancreatic lipase in serum evaluated for use in diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.In 417 patients (213 men, 204 women) consecutively hospitalized with acute abdominal pain we evaluated the clinical usefulness of a latex-agglutination test at admission to screen for concentrations of pancreatic lipase (EC 3.1.1.3) in serum greater than 300 micrograms/L. The diagnoses of acute pancreatitis (in 25 patients, 6%) and other diseases were made without knowledge of the results of the latex test or of quantification of pancreatic lipase in the serum by enzyme immunoassay. In the latex assay, when agglutination was taken as a positive test for acute pancreatitis, we found a diagnostic efficiency of 0.986 (95% confidence limits: 0.971-0.997) for acute pancreatitis. The predictive value of a positive latex test result with respect to acute pancreatitis was 0.807 (0.625-0.926); the predictive value of a negative test was 1.000 (0.991-1.000). Six patients had false-positive test results. No false-negative test results were found by enzyme immunoassay. We conclude that the latex agglutination test is useful as an emergency test for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in patients with acute abdominal pain; negative results virtually exclude acute pancreatitis.Assessment of trypsinogen-2 levels as an early diagnostic for post-endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography pancreatitis.The objective of the present study was to assess the use of serum trypsinogen-2 (TRY-2) measurements in early diagnosis of pancreatitis after endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).In this prospective study, investigation 1 involved collection of blood serum both before and at 2, 4, and 18 hours after ERCP, whereas investigation 2 involved collection before and 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, and 18 hours after ERCP. Total amylase, pancreatic amylase, and TRY-2 levels were measured from serum samples, and values from patients with pancreatitis after ERCP were compared to those from healthy control patients after ERCP.In investigation 1, 8 of the 68 cases examined were diagnosed as post-ERCP pancreatitis. In the healthy group, total- and pancreatic-amylase levels peaked 4 hours after ERCP, and TRY-2 levels peaked at 2 hours after ERCP. In contrast, cases of post-ERCP pancreatitis demonstrated prolonged periods of high total-amylase, pancreatic-amylase, and TRY-2 levels. In investigation 2, none of the 23 cases was diagnosed as post-ERCP pancreatitis: Pancreatic amylase levels peaked 4 to 6 hours after ERCP and TRY-2 levels peaked 1 hour after ERCP.These results suggest that TRY-2 is a more sensitive marker than amylase, and it can be useful in early diagnosis of post-ERCP pancreatitis.[Acute pancreatitis, hyperamylasemia and carbohydrate intolerance].Detection of postoperative pancreatitis after pancreatic surgery by urine trypsinogen strip test.The urine trypsinogen strip test has been used successfully in the diagnosis of pancreatitis of various aetiologies, but has not been studied in postoperative pancreatitis. The aim of this study was to evaluate this test for the diagnosis of postoperative pancreatitis after pancreatic resection.Fifty patients undergoing pancreatic resection were included. The urine trypsinogen strip test was done daily during the first postoperative week, blood was analysed before and 4, 6 and 10 days after surgery, and amylase activity in the drainage fluid was measured on days 4 and 6. Patients underwent computed tomography (CT) before operation and on days 2 and 6 afterwards.Thirteen patients (26 per cent) developed CT-detected pancreatitis after operation. In 12 of these patients pancreatitis was detected on the second postoperative day. The urine trypsinogen test was positive in all 13 patients with postoperative pancreatitis, and was already positive on the first day after surgery in 12. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the trypsinogen strip test in detection of postoperative pancreatitis were 100, 92, 81 and 100 per cent respectively. In receiver-operator characteristic analysis the area under the curve (AUC) was higher for the urine trypsinogen strip test (AUC 0.959) than for a serum amylase level more than two (AUC 0.731) or three times (AUC 0.654) above the upper normal range in the diagnosis of postoperative pancreatitis. Patients whose recovery was complicated by pancreatic fistula, detected by drain output measurements on day 6, more often had a positive urine trypsinogen test than patients without a fistula (11 of 12 versus five of 38; P < 0.001).This study suggests that the urine trypsinogen strip test might be a valuable method for diagnosis of pancreatitis after pancreatic surgery.The amylase creatinine clearance ratio in acute pancreatitis.One hundred and twenty-two patients have been studied in order to evaluate the usefulness of the amylase creatinine clearance ratio (ACCR) as a simple diagnostic test for acute pancreatitis. Sixteen out of 17 patients with acute pancreatitis had significant elevations in ACCR; in only 10 of these 17 cases was the serum amylase greater than 1200iu/l. The mean ACCR was within the normal range in control patients, in patients with chronic gastro-intestinal disease and in patients with acute abdominal conditions excluding pancreatitis; however, the mean serum amylase was significantly greater in patients with acute abdominal conditions than in the control group (P less than 0-05). The ACCR remained significantly elevated in patients with acute pancreatitis for longer than either serum or urine amylase values. The findings of the study suggest that the amylase creatinine clearance ratio is a simple yet reliable diagnostic test which could be used when screening patients suspected of having acute pancreatitis.[Usefulness of determining amylase isoenzymes in the blood and urine in acute pancreatitis].[Determination of urinary amylase using a test strip. Contribution to the emergency diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[Study of postoperative amylasemia. Its diagnostic value in postoperative acute pancreatitis (PAP)].A study of the postoperative amylasemia levels on 375 different intervents is presented. Three different behaviours have been observed: 1) in 44 cases there has been a rapid increase of the amylasemia gone on for less than 4 days without any clinical sign of pancreatitis; 2) in 6 cases the increase, sometimes less marked than the previous cases, developed and continued for longer time, showing oscillations with a slow return to the normality. At the same time there was a slow recovery in the general conditions; the cause of that has been interpreted as a pancreatic affection; 3) in 8 cases the amylasemia increase developed for many days with large and long oscillation and clinical signs of APP. The opinion of Authors is that the APP is characterised by amylasemia increases presenting large oscillations life times exceeding 4 days, and that they are joined with clinical signs of pancreatitis (pain, sickness, hypotension, ec.). The study of the amylasemia plotting is considered to be a rather good method to emphasize a pancreatic disease.Time-course and clinical value of the urine trypsinogen-2 dipstick test in acute pancreatitis.Urine trypsinogen-2 has been suggested as a marker of damage due to acute pancreatitis. Our aim was to assess the time-course and the clinical value of this test in acute pancreatitis.A urine trypsinogen-2 dipstick test was performed on 30 patients with acute pancreatitis upon admission to the emergency room, as well as on 30 patients with non-pancreatic acute abdominal pain, and in 30 healthy subjects.In 53.3% of the patients with acute pancreatitis the dipstick test showed abnormal urine trypsinogen-2 whereas this test gave negative results in all patients with non-pancreatic acute abdomen and in all healthy subjects. Patients with severe acute pancreatitis had a frequency of abnormal results of urine trypsinogen-2 (8/9, 88.9%; 95% CI, 51.8-99.7%) significantly higher (P = 0.031) than those with the mild disease (8/21, 38.1%; 95% CI, 18.1 -61.6%), while no significant differences were found in the urine trypsinogen-2 results between patients with biliary acute pancreatitis and those with non-biliary acute pancreatitis. Regarding the time-course of urine trypsinogen-2, there were no significant differences during the three days of the study.The specificity of urine trypsinogen-2 in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis is good however its sensitivity is low.Lipase and pancreatic amylase activities in diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in patients with hyperamylasemia.Measurement of total serum amylase (AMY) is the most widely used biochemical test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, but it is commonly considered a nonspecific marker. To improve the biochemical diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, lipase (LIP) and pancreatic amylase (PAMY) have been tested in recent years. The present study was designed to evaluate whether serum LIP and pancreatic PAMY tests could replace total amylase test to improve diagnostic efficiency in the evaluation of acute pancreatitis in patients with hyperamylasemia.LIP and PAMY values were determined in serum samples from 92 patients with hyperamylasemia. Reference values for each enzyme were derived from serum samples of 147 healthy subjects. The activities of LIP and PAMY in patients with various diseases were shown directly by the boxplot graph. The diagnostic accuracy of LIP and PAMY was defined as the area under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve. Their sensitivity and specificity in detecting acute pancreatitis at varying cutoff points were shown by the curve, and the best cutoff value for each enzyme was shown by the modified ROC curve. The diagnostic values of LIP, PAMY and LIP+AMY with each upper limit of reference range (ULR) were compared with the corresponding best cutoff values.The references values of LIP and PAMY were 12.2-47.6 U/L and 28-95 U/L, respectively. These values in patients with acute pancreatitis were higher than those patients with other diseases. The areas under the ROC curve (AUC) of LIP and PAMY were 0.799 and 0.792, respectively. With the best diagnostic cutoff point of maximum (sensitivity + specificity)-100%, we obtained values of 97.9 U/L (LIP(97.9)=2.06 X ULR) for LIP and 209 U/L (PAMY(209)=2.20 X ULR) for PAMY. The best cutoff values for LIP, PAMY and LIP+AMY demonstrated the specificity, positive predictive value, and diagnostic efficiency higher than the corresponding ULRs.Serum LIP and PAMY are specific for the pancreas and might replace total amylase for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in hyperamylasemia patients. LIP(97.9) is more efficient than PAMY(209) in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. A combined test of both enzymes is not superior to single test of either enzyme in diagnostic accuracy.[Value of the various pancreatic enzymes in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Relationship between post-ERCP pancreatitis and the change of serum amylase level after the procedure.To clarify the relationship between the change of serum amylase level and post-ERCP pancreatitis.Between January 1999 and December 2002, 1291 ERCP-related procedures were performed. Serum amylase concentrations were measured before the procedure and 3, 6, and 24 h afterward. The frequency and severity of post-ERCP pancreatitis and the relationship between these phenomena and the change in amylase level were estimated.Post-ERCP pancreatitis occurred in 47 patients (3.6%). Pancreatitis occurred in 1% of patients with normal amylase levels 3 h after ERCP, and in 1%, 5%, 20%, 31% and 39% of patients with amylase levels elevated 1-2 times, 2-3 times, 3-5 times, 5-10 times and over 10 times the upper normal limit at 3 h after ERCP, respectively (level < 2 times vs >or= 2 times, P < 0.001). Of the 143 patients with levels higher than the normal limit at 3 h after ERCP followed by elevation at 6 h, pancreatitis occurred in 26%. In contrast, pancreatitis occurred in 9% of 45 patients with a level higher than two times the normal limit at 3 h after ERCP followed by a decrease at 6 h (26% vs 9%, P < 0.05).Post-ERCP pancreatitis is frequently associated with an increase in serum amylase level greater than twice the normal limit at 3 h after ERCP with an elevation at 6 h. A decrease in amylase level at 6 h after ERCP suggests the unlikelihood of development of post-ERCP pancreatitis.[A rapid and simple method for serum amylase determination in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[A study of lipase, amylase and isoamylase in acute pancreatitis].Determination of pancreatic lipase by immunoactivation technology. A rapid test system with high sensitivity and specificity.This paper describes the test characteristics and clinical relevance of a newly developed homogeneous enzyme immunoassay IMAC lipase test for the determination of serum pancreatic lipase. The method of determination is based on an immunoactivation technology and utilizes antibody fragments against human pancreatic lipase covalently bound to the marker enzyme horseradish peroxidase. The serum samples of 408 persons were investigated with this new assay. The within-run and day-to-day precision, the linearity, and the recovery of this immunoassay correspond to a very high degree to the requirements made of a modern immunological test. Comparison with an ELISA method resulted in a correlation coefficient of 0.971, whereby the IMAC lipase assay tended to register lower serum values. The serum range for the IMAC lipase test is 0-47 micrograms/L, based on a normal collective of 187 healthy controls. A sensitivity of 95.8% for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis at a cutoff level of twice the upper normal range and a specificity of 99.3% at an efficiency of 99.8% can be given. The advantage of the IMAC lipase test method is its ability to be adapted to work on automatic laboratory analyzers.The value of serum amylase and elastase measurements in the prediction of post-ERCP acute pancreatitis.Acute pancreatitis is the most serious complication of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) but is not very common. A test that could predict the occurrence of pancreatitis would help to decide whether to discharge a patient after ERCP or not. The aim of this prospective study was to compare the value of serum amylase and elastase in the prediction of post-ERCP pancreatitis and its severity.Ninety-seven patients underwent ERCP. Serum samples were taken before, two and six hours after ERCP for amylase and elastase measurement. Fifty-four patients (group A) were treated with continuous intravenous infusion of octreotide, beginning 6 hours before ERCP and terminating 24 hours after. Forty-three patients (group B) received no preventive treatment.In group A, 9 patients (16.6%) developed pancreatitis, 8 of them (14.8%) mild and 1 (1.8%) severe. Two patients in group B developed mild pancreatitis (p = 0.1). In all patients the predictive accuracy in the second hour for amylase >3N, >5N and elastase >N was 79%, 87% and 86% respectively. The likelihood ratio of positivity (LRP) was 3.6, 6.5 and 6.1. In the sixth hour the respective values were 76%, 86%, 85% and 4, 7.3 and 6.4. In group A, the respective values in the second hour were 85%, 91%, 94% and 5, 25.2, infinity, and in the sixth hour 85%, 94%, 98% and 5.7, 11.5, infinity.Serum amylase (with cutoff value >5N) and elastase (>N), 6 hours after ERCP, were the most accurate tests for the prediction of post-ERCP pancreatitis, especially in patients receiving octreotide. The measurement of serum elastase could supplement that of serum amylase in the prediction of more cases of post-ERCP pancreatitis.Hyperamylasemia and pancreatitis following biliary tract surgery: a prospective study.[Correlation of the clearance of amylase and creatinine in acute pancreatitis and other pathologies].The study of a group of 151 patients confirms the diagnostic value of elevated ACCR in pancreatitis, it was positive in 89.4% of them, of the group, 30 were normal, 19 exhibited acute pancreatitis and 102 had various other pathologies. Serious pancreatitis has shown coincide with a long-lasting rise of ACCR, and its rise in the course of the disease was a sign of a new outburst of progressive necrosis. Total unreliability when abnormal creatinine clearance is present was ascertained. The possible mechanism of increase in ACCR has been considered also in connection with the study of the results obtained on a group of patients exhibiting renal insufficiency, gastrointestinal bleeding, acute colecystitis, vesicular lithiasis and obstructive jaundice.Urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick in acute pancreatitis.In acute pancreatitis (AP), rapid diagnosis and early treatment are of importance for clinical outcome. Urinary trypsinogen-2 has been suggested as a promising diagnostic marker; however, studies using the urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test (UTDT) have provided varying results.The study was set to evaluate the use of the UTDT (Actim Pancreatitis; Medix Biochemica, Kauniainen, Finland, Medinor, Roskilde, Denmark) in apparent first attack of AP in daily clinics. Acute pancreatitis was defined as more than a 3-fold increase in plasma amylase levels. We included 75 patients admitted with AP. Thirty-four patients with acute abdominal pain of causes other than AP served as a control group.In 58 of 75 patients, the UTDT result was positive, giving a sensitivity of 77% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 66%-86%). In severe cases, the sensitivity improved to 87% (95% CI: 69%-96%). In 33 of 34 controls, the test result was negative, giving a specificity of 97% (95% CI: 84%-99.9%).The UTDT had a low sensitivity but high specificity. These results do not support the UTDT to replace standard plasma amylase for the diagnosis of apparent first attack of AP. However, the test demonstrated an adequate sensitivity to be used for rapid early screening of AP in daily clinics.[Value of amylase-creatinine clearance index in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Radioimmunoassay for human pancreatic lipase in acute pancreatitis.We examined the utility of serum pancreatic lipase by radioimmunoassay as a diagnostic test for acute pancreatitis and its correlation with serum total amylase, pancreatic isoamylase, and lipase activity. Data were analyzed on 11 patients with documented acute pancreatitis, three groups of patients (N = 104) with nongastrointestinal, gastrointestinal, and renal diseases, and 30 healthy controls. Patients with acute pancreatitis had significantly (P less than 0.01) higher mean serum lipase by radioimmunoassay than all other groups. Using a serum lipase of 112 ng/ml as a cutoff point in all patients, the test was 91% sensitive and 96% specific for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. The correlation coefficients of serum lipase by radioimmunoassay with respect to total amylase, pancreatic isoamylase, and lipase activity were 0.86, 0.98, and 0.79, respectively.Elevated serum amylase activity in the absence of clinical pancreatic or salivary gland disease: possible role of acute hypoxemia.Elevated serum amylase activity, in the absence of clinically apparent pancreatic or salivary gland disease, has been observed in many seemingly unrelated conditions. In a search for common etiological factors to account for hyperamylasemia in these conditions, a retrospective analysis was performed. Eighty-four episodes of hyperamylasemia (greater than 300 I.U./l. Phadebas method) occurring in 75 patients over a one-year period ending in June, 1975 were assigned to one of two groups. Group 1 consisted of 56 (67%) episodes of hyperamylasemia with clinical pancreatitis. Group 2 consisted of 28 (33%) episodes of hyperamylasemia in the absence of clinical pancreatitis. Hypoxemia (pO2 less than 75 mm. Hg.) was found in 9/15 patients in Group 2 who had arterial blood gases measured. To assess the possible relationship between acute hypoxemia and amylase activity, a prospective study was initiated. Patients with known causes of pancreatitis or renal failure were eliminated. Hyperamylasemia was found in 3/8 hypoxemic patients. This raises the possibility that acute hypoxemia alone or in combination with other factors may raise serum amylase activity, possibly through ischemic injury to the pancreas or salivary glands or other amylase containing tissues.Amylase inhibitor from wheat: its action and clinical application.The electrophoretic and column chromatographic characteristics of an amylase inhibitor of wheat origin were investigated. Further, the clinical usefulness of this inhibitor for determining the ratio of pancreatic to salivary isoamylase activity in serum was evaluated. Amylase inhibitor inhibits the action of salivary alpha-amylase by making an amylase-inhibitor complex, which is easily separated into its individual component during electrophoresis with full recovery of amylase activity. Using the specific inhibitory effect of this inhibitor on salivary alpha-amylase activity, the ratio of pancreatic to salivary isoamylase activity (P/S) in serum was determined. There was a good correlation in P/S ratio in serum between the results obtained with the inhibitor method and those with electrophoretic method. The P/S ratio in sera from patients with acute pancreatitis was over 8.0, whereas that in sera from patients with salivary-type hyperamylasemia such as mumps, pulmonary diseases and following surgery was less than 0.1. However, hyperamylasemia due to macroamylase or renal failure could not be identified by the inhibitor method.Alcoholic pancreatitis and parotitis: utility of lipase and urinary amylase clearance determinations.Acute alcoholic pancreatitis is a clinical diagnosis made in patients who have acute upper abdominal pain, emesis, and hyperamylasemia soon after ingesting alcohol. We sought to determine whether the clinical diagnosis of pancreatitis was supported by elevated serum levels of pancreatic isoamylase, currently the most specific test for pancreatitis. Serum lipase levels and urinary amylase/creatinine clearance ratios were examined for comparison with pancreatic isoamylase concentrations. Potential sources for salivary isoamylasemia were explored with technetium scans of the parotid glands. Of 19 patients with a clinical diagnosis of alcoholic pancreatitis, 16 had elevated levels of pancreatic isoamylase, and 17 had salivary hyperamylasemia. The diagnostic specificity of the serum lipase level or the urinary amylase/creatinine clearance ratio was excellent compared to that of the pancreatic isoamylase level. Three patients had elevated levels of salivary isoamylase only. Scans of the parotid glands in the study group revealed significantly higher uptake values than scans in nonalcoholic control subjects, suggesting one possible source of elevated levels of salivary isoamylase.Combined serum amylase and lipase determinations for diagnosis of suspected acute pancreatitis.Serum amylase and lipase measurements are often used to diagnose acute pancreatitis. This study addresses the question of whether it is advantageous to order serum amylase and lipase tests simultaneously. We evaluated performance of the two tests separately and in combination through a retrospective study of patients for whom both amylase and lipase determinations were ordered. Initial analysis of test performance was conducted with a uniformly applied criterion based on determination of optimal sensitivity-specificity pairs. Individual tests and combinations of tests, including the "AND" and "OR" rules and discriminant functions, were examined. Only the discriminant approach demonstrated better performance than the lipase test alone. This finding was subsequently confirmed by logistic regression analysis. We conclude that ordering both tests simultaneously can be advantageous in diagnosing acute pancreatitis when a bivariate approach is used; however, this must be weighed against the difficulties associated with clinical implementation of such approaches.Serum amylase test in differential diagnosis of freely perforated ulcer and acute pancreatitis; a reevaluation.Serum phospholipase A2, amylase, lipase, and urinary amylase activities in relation to the severity of acute pancreatitis.To compare serum phospholipase A2 activity with measurements of conventional enzymes as an indicator of the severity of acute pancreatitis.Prospective study.University hospital, Finland.80 Consecutive patients with acute pancreatitis.Serum and urine samples were taken daily for a week after admission.Serum phospholipase A2, amylase, lipase, and urinary amylase activities.On admission, the serum amylase and lipase activities increased in parallel in all patients. However, the mean serum phospholipase A2 activity was three times higher in the patients with acute fulminant pancreatitis than in those with milder disease. The phospholipase A2 activity remained high during the course of the severe disease, whereas the other enzyme activities decreased appreciably during the first week. In contrast to the other enzyme activities that of serum phospholipase A2 correlated well with the severity of the acute pancreatitis. Heating at 60 degrees C for 45 minutes to inactivate the non-pancreatic thermolabile phospholipase A2 reduced the total serum phospholipase A2 activity more than the enzyme activity in the homogenates of pancreatic tissue, which suggests that extrapancreatic phospholipase A2 is present in serum. The receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves confirmed the high sensitivity and specificity of serum phospholipase A2 activity with a mean (SEM) area under the curve up to 0.870 (0.062) compared with the other enzyme activities of which the highest area under the curve was 0.52 (0.089).In contrast to amylase and lipase activities, measurement of serum phospholipase A2 activity is important in the assessment of the severity of acute pancreatitis so that optimal treatment may be given.Serum amylase and lipase in the evaluation of acute abdominal pain.The purpose of this study was to determine 1) the incidence and magnitude of elevation in admission serum amylase and lipase levels in extrapancreatic etiologies of acute abdominal pain, and 2) the test most closely associated with the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. Serum amylase and lipase levels were obtained in 306 patients admitted for evaluation of acute abdominal pain. Patients were categorized by anatomic location of identified pathology. Logistic regression analysis was used to compare the enzyme levels between patient groups and to determine the correlation between elevation in serum amylase and lipase. Twenty-seven (13%) of 208 patients with an extrapancreatic etiology of acute abdominal pain demonstrated an elevated admission serum amylase level with a maximum value of 385 units (U)/L (normal range 30-110 U/L). Twenty-six (12.5%) of these 208 patients had an elevated admission serum lipase value with a maximum of 3685 U/L (normal range 5-208 U/L). Of 48 patients with abdominal pain resulting from acute pancreatitis, admission serum amylase ranged from 30 to 7680 U/L and lipase ranged from 5 to 90,654 U/L. Both serum amylase and lipase elevations were positively associated with a correct diagnosis of acute pancreatitis (P < 0.001) with diagnostic efficiencies of 91 and 94 per cent, respectively. A close correlation between elevation of admission serum amylase and lipase was observed (r = 0.87) in both extrapancreatic and pancreatic disease processes. Serum amylase and lipase levels may be elevated in nonpancreatic disease processes of the abdomen. Significant elevations (greater than three times upper limit of normal) in either enzyme are uncommon in these disorders. The strong correlation between elevations in the two serum enzymes in both pancreatic and extrapancreatic etiologies of abdominal pain makes them redundant measures. Serum lipase is a better test than serum amylase either to exclude or to support a diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Rapid measurement of urinary trypsinogen-2 as a screening test for acute pancreatitis.Acute pancreatitis can be difficult to diagnose. We developed a rapid dipstick screening test for pancreatitis, based on the immunochromatographic measurement of urinary trypsinogen-2.We prospectively compared the urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test with a quantitative urinary trypsinogen-2 assay, a urinary dipstick test for amylase, and serum and urinary amylase assays in 500 consecutive patients with acute abdominal pain at two emergency departments. Acute pancreatitis was diagnosed according to standardized criteria.The urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test was positive in 50 of the 53 patients with acute pancreatitis (sensitivity, 94 percent), including all 7 with severe pancreatitis. Two patients with urinary trypsinogen-2 concentrations below the sensitivity threshold of the test (50 ng per milliliter) and one with a very high concentration had false negative results. The test was also positive in 21 of the 447 patients without pancreatitis (specificity, 95 percent), including 7 with abdominal cancers, 3 with cholangitis, and 2 with chronic pancreatitis. The sensitivity and specificity of the dipstick test were similar to those of the quantitative urinary trypsinogen-2 assay and higher than those of the urinary amylase dipstick test. The serum amylase assay had a sensitivity of 85 percent (with a cutoff value of 300 U per liter for the upper reference limit) and a specificity of 91 percent. The sensitivity and specificity of the urinary amylase assay (cutoff value, 2000 U per liter) were 83 and 88 percent, respectively.In patients with acute abdominal pain seen in the emergency department, a negative dipstick test for urinary trypsinogen-2 rules out acute pancreatitis with a high degree of probability. A positive test usually identifies patients in need of further evaluation.Lipase and pancreatic amylase activities in tissues and in patients with hyperamylasemia.Lipase, pancreatic amylase, and total amylase activities were measured in nondiseased and diseased human pancreatic tissues and in six different locations of the human digestive system. In addition, it was determined whether serum lipase and pancreatic amylase tests could replace the total amylase test to improved diagnostic efficiency in the evaluation of acute pancreatitis in hyperamylasemia patients. Nondiseased pancreatic tissue contained 4.5 times more lipase activity than total amylase activity. Diseased pancreatic tissue contained less activity for both lipase and total amylase compared to normal tissue. The total amylase activity of the pancreas was comprised solely of pancreatic amylase. Tissue obtained from six different anatomic locations in the digestive system contained 35 to 45 times less lipase and total amylase activity compared to the pancreas. Total amylase activity of the digestive system tissues were comprised of 25% pancreatic and 75% salivary isoamylases. Lipase, pancreatic amylase, and total amylase levels also were determined in serial serum samples from 17 consecutive hyperamylasemia patients admitted with possible acute pancreatitis. The serum lipase level remained higher than normal longer than either the total amylase and pancreatic amylase levels. In patients with hyperamylasemia of pancreatic origin, a poor correlation was observed at admission between serum pancreatic amylase and serum lipase. Not all patients with elevated lipase had an elevated pancreatic amylase level and vice versa. However, in every patient pancreatic disease would have been detected by the elevation of either lipase or pancreatic amylase levels. Diagnostic efficiency for pancreatic disease using serum pancreatic amylase, lipase, and total amylase tests was 94.1%, 76.5%, and 64.7%, respectively. These data suggest that lipase and pancreatic amylase tests are specific for the pancreas and might be considered replacements for total amylase as the stat or routine laboratory test for the diagnosis of pancreatic tissue injury.Electrophoretic fractionation of pancreatic lipase.Human pancreatic isolipases were separated by electrophoresis on cellulose acetate membrane. Band visualization by fluorescence detection of NADH produced by beta-oxidation cyclic reaction of fatty acid liberated from 1,2-dilinoleoylglycerol by lipase was achieved by making a two-plate "sandwich" of an electrophoresis plate and a substrate-bearing plate. Two true lipase forms, named L1 and L2 to reflect their electrophoretic migration, were resolved with this method and quantified by densitometry. The procedure was not only simple and rapid but also precise (between-run CV less than 13.5%) and sensitive (detected lipase fractions of less than 2 U/L). L1 (mean 57% of total lipase, SD 19.3%) and L2 (mean 43%, SD 19.3%) lipase forms were found in all normal persons studied. In a preliminary clinical study of 27 emergency room patients, evaluation of the lipase electrophoretic pattern in serum did not separate patients with acute pancreatitis from those with other acute abdominal disorders.Urinary trypsinogen-2 for diagnosing acute pancreatitis: a meta-analysis.Currently, serum amylase and lipase are the most popular laboratory markers for early diagnosis of acute pancreatitis with reasonable sensitivity and specificity. Urinary trypsinogen-2 (UT-2) has been increasingly used but its clinical value for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and post-endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) pancreatitis has not yet been systematically assessed.A comprehensive search was carried out using PubMed (MEDLINE), Embase, and Web of Science for clinical trials, which studied the usefulness of UT-2 as a diagnostic marker for acute pancreatitis. Sensitivity, specificity and the diagnostic odds ratios (DORs) with 95% confidence interval (CI) were calculated for each study and were compared with serum amylase and lipase. Summary receiver-operating curves were conducted and the area under the curve (AUC) was evaluated.A total of 18 studies were included. The pooled sensitivity and specificity of UT-2 for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis were 80% and 92%, respectively (AUC=0.96, DOR=65.63, 95% CI: 31.65-139.09). The diagnostic value of UT-2 was comparable to serum amylase but was weaker than serum lipase. The pooled sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of post-ERCP pancreatitis were 86% and 94%, respectively (AUC=0.92, DOR=77.68, 95% CI: 24.99-241.48).UT-2 as a rapid test could be potentially used for the diagnosis of post-ERCP pancreatitis and to an extent, acute pancreatitis. Further studies are warranted to confirm these results.Rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Early diagnosis of acute pancreatitis remains a challenge. A rapid dipstick screening test for acute pancreatitis has been developed. This prospective study was designed to evaluate the diagnostic value and time course of the rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip in acute pancreatitis, with comparisons with serum amylase and serum lipase.A total of 165 patients with acute abdominal pain (67 with acute pancreatitis and 98 with other acute abdominal diseases) attending our emergency unit were included. All patients were tested with the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip, and serum amylase and serum lipase concentrations were determined simultaneously. To measure the time course of the urinary trypsinogen-2 test, 32 patients with acute pancreatitis were tested with a urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip on days 1, 2, 3, and 4 after admission.Using a cutoff level of 50 microg/L for urinary trypsinogen-2, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip for recognition of acute pancreatitis were 89.6%, 85.7%, and 87.3%, respectively. The diagnostic accuracy rates of serum amylase and serum lipase were 88.5% and 93.3%, using cutoff values of 3 times the upper normal limits for serum amylase and serum lipase, respectively. All but one of the 17 patients with severe acute pancreatitis was detected by the test strip (sensitivity, 94.1%). The time-course study of the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip revealed that the sensitivity on days 1, 2, 3, and 4 was 90.6%, 81.2%, 59.4%, and 50%, respectively. There was no significant difference in the sensitivity between urinary trypsinogen-2 and serum lipase; however, the sensitivity values of serum lipase were significantly higher than those of serum amylase from days 1 to 4.The rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test is a reliable and simple method for the early diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. A positive test identifies patients in need of further diagnostic measures. The urinary trypsinogen-2 test can be performed in health care units where laboratory testing facilities are not immediately available.Diagnosis of acute pancreatitis using the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio and radionuclide hepatobiliary and pancreas imaging.[Differential diagnosis of acute biliary tract diseases and acute pancreatitis by means of laboratory tests].Evaluation of a new urinary amylase test strip in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.We have developed a novel rapid test strip for detecting pancreatic amylase in urine and prospectively evaluated its accuracy in screening for acute pancreatitis (AP). The test strip is based on the immunochromatography principle and uses two monoclonal antibodies specific for pancreatic amylase. Urine samples were collected from 500 consecutive patients with acute abdominal disease (52 with AP) and prospectively tested with the strip. The accuracy of the test strip was compared with that of two quantitative urine amylase determinations and a urinary dipstick test for amylase (Rapignost). Sensitivity of the test was 69% and specificity was 97% in differentiating patients with AP from those with acute abdominal extrapancreatic disease at admission. The negative predictive value was 0.986. The test showed moderate agreement both with an assay measuring total amylase activity and with another measuring pancreatic amylase immunoreactivity. At similar high specificity (97%), quantitative determination of total amylase activity (cut-off 3960 U/L) and pancreatic amylase (cut-off 2180 micrograms/L) showed lower sensitivity (54% and 41%) than the test strip (69%). The test is specific and rapid to perform, and it rules out AP with high probability. It could therefore be useful in an emergency setting without laboratory facilities in the differential diagnosis of acute abdominal pain.No parallel between the biochemical course of acute pancreatitis and morphologic findings.The clinical, biochemical (serum enzymes), and morphologic course of acute pancreatitis was studied in 83 consecutive patients from time of admission until 3 months after discharge. At discharge, all 75 surviving patients had no more symptoms of acute pancreatitis, even though amylase (in 11%) and lipase (in 25%) were still elevated, computed tomography (CT) findings still abnormal (in 81%), and necrosis amounting up to 50% of the gland still present (in 24%). There was no significant correlation between serum enzymes and CT findings at discharge. Three months later, with the exception of one patient with an acute relapse of the disease, all followed-up patients were free of symptoms and had normal serum amylase, whereas lipase was still elevated in 10%, and CT findings abnormal in 23%. Subsiding symptoms provided a more accurate picture of the patients' recovery than the biochemical markers, and even more so that the morphologic findings.The interrelationship of blood and urine diastase during transient acute pancreatitis.Enzyme immunoassay for serum pancreatic lipase in the diagnosis of pancreatic diseases.To evaluate the diagnostic utility of serum immunoreactive lipase (IRL), serum lipase was determined using an enzyme immunoassay and a turbidimetric method along with total serum amylase in 41 healthy controls, 76 patients with pancreatic disease and 60 with nonpancreatic disease. Serum IRL was elevated in 12 of 13 patients with acute pancreatitis, 12 of 44 with chronic pancreatitis and in 12 of 19 with pancreatic cancer. The IRL was low in 9 of the 44 patients with chronic pancreatitis, which coincided with advanced exocrine pancreatic insufficiency. Overall sensitivities in pancreatic diseases were 59% for serum IRL, 38% for turbidimetric lipase and 51% for amylase, specificities in healthy controls and nonpancreatic diseases were 80% for serum IRL, 86% for turbidimetric lipase and 88% for serum amylase. Serum IRL determination is useful for diagnosis in pancreatic diseases when compared with the conventional determination of serum lipase.[Laboratory diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. Amylase analysis is still the leading one, but a "urinary strip" is on its way to be marketed].Amylase: creatinine clearance ratio and urinary excretion of lysozyme in acute pancreatitis and acute duodenal perforation.The amylase:creatinine clearance ratio in patients suffering from acute pancreatitis or acute duodenal perforation was higher than normal in both groups of patients. These findings cast doubt on the value of this parameter as a specific index of acute pancreatitis. The mechanism or mechanisms underlying the increased amylase excretion have not been determined. However, the markedly elevated urinary excretion of lysozyme observed in some patients suggests, by analogy, that diminished tubular reabsorption of amylase may contribute towards the elevated amylase:creatinine ratio.[Value of pancreatic enzymes in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[THE VALUE OF SERUM ENZYME DETERMINATIONS IN ACUTE PANCREATIC DISEASES. AN EXPERIMENTAL STUDY].[The relationship between amylase and creatinine clearance is useful in the evaluation of acute pancreatitis, but it is not specific].Human pancreas-specific protein/procarboxypeptidase B: a useful serum marker of acute pancreatitis.The aim of this study was to evaluate the serum behavior of human pancreas-specific protein/procarboxypeptidase B (hPASP/PCPB) in the early phases of acute pancreatitis, and to calculate its sensitivity and specificity in comparison with those of serum amylase and lipase in the diagnosis of this illness. Twenty-six acute pancreatitis patients were studied; the pancreatitis was of biliary origin in 11, due to alcohol abuse in 8, and due to other causes in 7. Sixteen patients had mild pancreatitis and 10 the severe form of the disease. Thirty-one patients with nonpancreatic acute digestive diseases were also studied. Serum concentrations of hPASP/PCPB, amylase and lipase were determined in all subjects on admission to the study as well as daily for the following 5 days in acute pancreatitis patients. All patients with acute pancreatitis had abnormally high serum hPASP/PCPB, amylase and lipase concentrations on the first day of admission. On the sixth day of the disease, 76% of acute pancreatitis patients had abnormally high serum concentrations of hPASP/PCPB, whereas only 48% (p < 0.05) had elevated serum amylase and lipase. No differences in serum levels of hPASP/PCPB, amylase or lipase were found between patients with alcoholic pancreatitis and those with other etiological forms of the disease, or between those with mild and severe forms of pancreatitis. The specificity of the three serum pancreatic protein assays, calculated on the 31 patients with nonpancreatic acute digestive diseases, was 90% for both hPASP/PCPB and lipase, 75% for amylase.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Early diagnosis and prediction of severity in acute pancreatitis using the urine trypsinogen-2 dipstick test: a prospective study.To evaluate the use of the trypsinogen-2 dipstick (Actim Pancreatitis) test for early diagnosis and prediction of severity in acute pancreatitis (AP).Ninety-two patients with AP were included in this study. The control group was 25 patients who had acute abdominal pain from non-pancreatic causes. Urine trypsinogen-2 dipstick test (UTDT) and conventional diagnostic tests were performed in all patients. Patients were divided by the Atlanta classification into two groups as having mild or severe pancreatitis.UTDT was positive in 87 (94.6%) of the AP patients and in two (8%) controls (P < 0.05). Positive UTDT was found in 61 (92.4%) of 66 (71.7%) patients with mild pancreatitis and in all (100%) of the 26 (28.3%) with severe pancreatitis (P > 0.05). UTDT positivity lasted longer in severe pancreatitis compared with that in mild pancreatitis (6.2 +/- 2.5 d vs 2.0 +/- 1.43 d, P < 0.05). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value (NPV), positive likelihood ratio (PLR) and negative likelihood ratio (NLR) of UTDT were 91%, 72%, 96.6%, 70.4%, 3.4 and 0.1, respectively.UTDT is a simple, rapid and reliable method for use on admission. It has high specificity and low NLR for early diagnosis and prediction of severity in AP. However, its relatively low NPV does not allow trypsinogen-2 dipstick test to be a stand-alone tool for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis; the use of other conventional diagnostic tools remains a requirement.[Diagnostic value of lipase and isoamylase determination. Monitoring studies in patients with proven and suspected pancreatitis].Changes of lipase (turbidimetric evaluation), total amylase and isoamylases (inhibition test) were determined in 93 patients with proven or suspect pancreatitis. In 35 patients with established acute pancreatitis 143 sera were investigated in the course of disease. Lipase and pancreatic amylase were increased in these samples significantly more often (thus longer in the course of disease) than total amylase. Eight patients with chronic pancreatitis and exocrine insufficiency showed very low lipase and pancreatic amylase activities whereas total amylase was normal. Observations in the course of two groups of patients with suspect (but not established) pancreatitis showed superior organ specificity of lipase and pancreatic amylase when compared to total amylase. However, no relevant difference of the diagnostic validity of both enzymes could be demonstrated.[Laboratory diagnostics of acute pancreatitis].A clinical evaluation of elevated serum and urine amylase.[A study of the specificity of amylases. Measurement of pancreatic isoamylases (author's transl)].Serum lipase, pancreatic isoamylases and serum inhibitory activity on proteases were measured in 29 patients, 17 of whom had pancreatic disorders. The new test used to measure pancreatic isoamylases is rapid and useful, as it is relatively specific of pancreatic lesions. In acute abdominal syndromes, it undoubtedly enhances the value of biochemical investigations by confirming or excluding pancreatic lesions or involvement.Evaluation of amylase and lipase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.The diagnosis of acute pancreatitis relies heavily on a raised amylase.In the present study patients were prospectively categorized, without knowledge of pancreatic enzyme levels, into acute pancreatitis (AP; n = 51), disease controls (n = 35), indeterminate as to pancreatitis (n = 189) or exclusions (non-pancreatitis diseases where amylase may be elevated; n = 53).Enzyme levels were analysed by receiver operator characteristics (ROC) curves, with specificity > 80%. Day 1 serum lipase gave the greatest diagnostic accuracy (area under ROC curve = 0.128; P = 0.041 vs serum amylase). At the calculated diagnostic threshold of 208 U/L, lipase gave a sensitivity of 67% and a specificity of 97%. Other diagnostic thresholds (day 1) were: serum total amylase, 176 U/L (ROC 0.104, sensitivity 45%, specificity 97%), urinary total amylase, 550 U/L (ROC 0.108, sensitivity 62%, specificity 97%) and serum pancreatic isoamylase, 41 U/L (ROC 0.107, sensitivity 63%, specificity 85%). At delayed diagnosis (3 days) no enzyme was superior to lipase. The combination of lipase and amylase did not increase diagnostic accuracy.Serum lipase is recommended for diagnosis of AP, both early and late in the disease. Although highly specific when elevated, all pancreatic enzymes have low sensitivity for diagnosis.Diagnostic accuracy evaluation using ROC curve analysis.The diagnostic accuracy of a biochemical quantity is inversely related to the overlapping zone between the values of the population suffering from a disease and the population which does not. The ROC curves are an indirect measure of the overlapping zone between both populations. Specimens (plasma and urine) taken from 928 patients with symptoms of acute abdominal pain were used and the catalytic concentration of alpha-amylase, pancreatic alpha-amylase and triacylglycerol lipase (determined by two methods) were measured. Definitive diagnosis was obtained by following the directives of expert groups on the evaluation of diagnostic tests. Diagnostic accuracy was characterized by calculating the diagnostic sensitivity and specificity, by representing the ROC curves and by quantifying the areas under the ROC curves. The catalytic concentration of pancreatic alpha-amylase in plasma was the quantity with a greater area under the ROC curve (A = 0.9740) and then the one which had greatest diagnostic accuracy. If we considered the upper limit of the reference interval to be the cut-off value, the catalytic concentration of pancreatic alpha-amylase in plasma had a diagnostic sensitivity and specificity values of 0.96 and 0.88 respectively for the acute pancreatitis.[AMYLASE BEHAVIOR IN ACUTE PANCREATITIS].The immunochemical determinations of serum lipase in acute pancreatitis: further results.The amylase to creatinine clearance ratio. It is a suitable test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis?Serum lipase levels in nonpancreatic abdominal pain versus acute pancreatitis.1) To determine whether serum lipase is elevated in patients with nonpancreatic abdominal pain, and 2) to compare the levels of serum lipase and serum amylase found in patients with nonpancreatic abdominal pain with those found in acute pancreatitis in order to differentiate between the two groups.Serum lipase and amylase levels were estimated in 95 patients with nonpancreatic abdominal pain (group A). These levels were then compared with those found in 75 patients with acute pancreatitis (group P).Serum amylase in group A ranged from 11 to 416 U/L [mean 58 +/- 46 (SD)]. Three patients (3.3%) had raised amylase levels. The maximum elevation noted in this group was 416 U/L. Serum amylase in group P ranged from 124 to 13,000 U/L (mean 1620 +/- 1976). Twenty of the 75 patients (27%) in group P had levels that overlapped those found in group A. The serum lipase in group A ranged from 3 to 680 U/L (mean 111 +/- 101). Ten of the 93 patients (11%) had elevated lipase levels. The maximum elevation noted was roughly 3 times normal (680 U/L). Serum lipase in group P ranged from 711 to 31,153 (mean 6705 +/- 7022). None of the patients in group P had levels that overlapped those found in group A. The sensitivity of a serum lipase level > 3 normal in detecting acute pancreatitis was 100% and the specificity was 99%. The corresponding figures for serum amylase were 72% and 99%, respectively.A serum lipase level > 3 normal has a better diagnostic accuracy than serum amylase in differentiating nonpancreatic abdominal pain from acute pancreatitis.Lipase/amylase ratio. A new index that distinguishes acute episodes of alcoholic from nonalcoholic acute pancreatitis.Because of observations that patients with acute episodes of alcoholic pancreatitis had high serum lipase levels whereas patients with gall stone pancreatitis had high serum amylase levels, a prospective study was undertaken to determine whether the ratio of serum lipase to serum amylase, a newly computed ratio, would discriminate between acute episodes of alcoholic and nonalcoholic pancreatitis. In phase one, 30 consecutive patients with acute pancreatitis were entered into the study and divided into groups A and B. Patients with renal failure were excluded from the study. Group A consisted of 20 patients in whom the etiology of pancreatitis was alcohol. Group B consisted of 10 patients whose pancreatitis was nonalcoholic in etiology (predominantly gallstones). Serum lipase values in group A ranged 492 to 25,706 U/L (median, 3433 U/L) and in group B from 711 to 31,153 U/L (median, 1260 U/L). These differences were not significant statistically. Serum amylase values in group A ranged from 104 to 2985 U/L (median, 331 U/L) and in group B from 423 to 13,000 (median, 1187 U/L). Although these figures were statistically different (P less than 0.005), there was a considerable degree of overlap in the values between the two groups. The lipase/amylase ratio calculated from the blood sample obtained at presentation appeared to be a promising discriminatory index. The lipase/amylase ratio was calculated by using the amylase and lipase levels expressed as multiples of the upper limit of normal in each case. The lipase/amylase ratios in the alcoholic group ranged from 2.2 to 14.8, whereas the lipase/amylase ratio in nonalcoholic pancreatitis ranged from 0.31 to 1.93. These differences were statistically significant (P less than 0.005). A lipase/amylase ratio of greater than 2 was indicative of an alcoholic etiology, and a ratio of less than 2 suggested that the pancreatitis was nonalcoholic in nature. In phase two, this lipase/amylase ratio of 2 was applied prospectively to an unselected population of 21 consecutive patients with acute pancreatitis. Thirteen patients had a lipase/amylase ratio of greater than 2; in 11 of them, the etiology of the pancreatitis was alcohol. Eight patients had a lipase/amylase ratio of less than 2; of them, only 1 patient had an alcoholic etiology for the pancreatitis. These differences were statistically significant (P less than 0.05).(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 400 WORDS)[Bedside diagnosis of pancreatitis using the urinary amylase test tape. Preliminary results].A test strip for rapid detection of alpha-amylase in urine was evaluated in 12 patients with an acute episode of acute or chronic pancreatitis and in 16 patients with hyperamylasemia of varying origin. The test strip was positive in 11 of 12 patients with acute pancreatitis and in 8 of 13 patients with hyperamylasemia. In 3 patients with macroamylasemia the test strip was negative. The specificity was 98% in 100 ambulatory patients without evidence of pancreatic disease.[HUMORAL DIAGNOSIS OF ACUTE PANCREATITIS].A comparison of lipase and amylase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in patients with abdominal pain.The clinical value of amylase and lipase measurement for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis was evaluated in 253 patients presenting with acute abdominal pain. Acute pancreatitis was detected in 32 patients by computed tomography or ultrasound. In the serum samples collected on days 0-1 after the onset of symptoms, lipase was elevated in 100% and amylase in 95%. A 95% sensitivity/specificity was reached at a lipase cutoff near twofold above normal. The receiver-operating characteristics (ROC) showed similar curves for both enzymes, lipase being slightly superior to amylase. The ROC curves from days 2-3 demonstrated a much lower sensitivity/specificity of both enzymes. Lipase, however, was notably superior to amylase: at a sensitivity of 85% the specificity of lipase (amylase) was 82% (68%). In samples from days 4-5 the accuracy of the enzyme assays was even worse; at a sensitivity of 60% the specificity did not increase above 70%. The diagnostic value of simultaneous measurement of amylase and lipase was tested at different cutoffs in two groups: the OR group, in which one of the two parameters had to be elevated, and the AND group, in which both parameters had to be above normal. Combination of both parameters mainly improved the specificity of the assay (from 91 to 98% on days 2-3 and from 93 to 97% on day 4-5) but only when, in the OR group, twofold elevated amylase was combined with lipase. We conclude that the simultaneous determination of serum lipase and amylase marginally improved the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in patients with acute abdominal pain, however, the sensitivity of the assay with samples collected 4-5 days after onset of the disease remained low.[Diagnostic value of a diagnostic strip for determining urinary amylase].The semiquantitative determination of amylase in urine with a stick-method has produced controversial results as to its diagnostical significance. In our study we compared the result of the Rapignost-test with the simultaneously measures activity of enzymes (total amylase, pancreatic isoamylase in serum and urine and lipase) in 323 samples of serum and urine taken from 32 patients affected with acute pancreatitis. On the 1st day of hospitalization Rapignost was positive in only 17 out of 32 cases. Both sensitivity and specificity of the test depended of the values referred to. Near range limits and in cases with slight or average increase of the enzymes, the correspondence of Rapignost results were unsatisfactory. We found a good correspondence in cases with normal low and excessively high values of the enzymes. On the whole, Rapignost showed the best correspondence with the pancreas isoamylase in urine. The result of Rapignost was also positive in 5 out of 15 cases with extrapancreatic increased urinary amylase, which confirms its lack of organ specificity. From case to case, the -, and + + test results of Rapignost did not lead to any conclusions as to the absolute values of the enzymes in serum and urine. Our results show that Rapignost does not offer enough safety either to confirm or to exclude an acute pancreatitis, and especially it should not be used as a screening test in emergency diagnostics. The determination of the enzyme, in particular in serum, can not be eluded.Diagnostic value of measuring pancreatic lipase and the P3 isoform of the pancreatic amylase isoenzyme in serum of hospitalized hyperamylasemic patients.We assayed amylase (AMY) isoenzymes by cellulose acetate electrophoresis and determined pancreatic lipase (LPS) activity by a turbidimetric colipase-supplemented method in 54 hospitalized hyperamylasemic patients (32 men and 22 women; mean age 61.5, SD 16, years). In AMY isoenzyme analysis, use of a value for P3 isoform greater than 14 U/L as a positive test for acute pancreatitis gave a diagnostic efficiency of 92.6%, a predictive value of a positive test result of 90.5%, and a predictive value of a negative test of 100%. Four of 12 patients with other, nonpancreatic abdominal diseases had false-positive test results. LPS activity (cutoff limit, 700 U/L) was as effective as P3 isoform in distinguishing patients with acute pancreatitis (sensitivity, 100%) from those without acute pancreatitis (specificity, 81.3%). Thus, P3 isoform and LPS appear to be interchangeable markers of pathological release of pancreatic enzymes into the bloodstream during acute pancreatitis. This finding decreases the need for the expensive radiological procedures currently required to confirm this diagnosis. In particular, negative results virtually exclude acute pancreatitis.Amylase, lipase, pancreatic isoamylase, and phospholipase A in diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.To determine the utility of serum amylase (AMY), lipase (Lp), pancreatic isoamylase (isoA), phospholipase A (PLA), and urine AMY in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, samples of serum and urine were obtained on admission and every day thereafter for 5 days from 384 patients with acute abdominal pain. Diagnostic accuracy, determined as the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve, was > 0.975 for serum AMY, Lp, isoA, and urine AMY. For each of these enzymes, a threshold value (twice to sixfold the upper limit of the reference values) offering diagnostic efficiency > 95% could be determined. In contrast, accuracy and efficiency of serum PLA were low. The profiles of these enzymes in acute pancreatitis decreased in a parallel fashion over 5 days except for PLA. We conclude that diagnostic utilities are similar for serum AMY, Lp, isoA, and urine AMY for acute pancreatitis, provided that an appropriate threshold is established.A simple screening test for acute pancreatitis.A urinary test strip for amylase (Rapignost-Amylase) was compared with plasma amylase assay in samples of urine and plasma collected on the day of admission to hospital from 23 patients with acute pancreatitis and 38 patients with other causes of acute abdominal pain. Plasma amylase was greater than 1200 IU/l in 24 patients (23 with pancreatitis and 1 with a perforated duodenal ulcer) and all were Rapignost-Amylase positive. Twenty-nine of the remaining patients were Rapignost-Amylase negative, but there were eight "false positives' with plasma amylase levels of 86-474 IU/l. The Rapignost-Amylase test is of potential value to screen for clinically occult acute pancreatitis.[SIMPLE LABORATORY STUDIES IN THE DIAGNOSIS OF ACUTE PANCREATITIS].A useful diagnostic and prognostic tool for acute appendicitis and acute pancreatitis.Comparative evaluation of the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis based on serum and urine enzyme assays.We compared the diagnostic sensitivities of serum amylase, lipase (assayed enzymatically and immunologically), trypsinogen and elastase-1, the 2-h-timed urine amylase excretion and the ratio of amylase and creatinine clearances in the recognition of acute pancreatitis. Serial serum and urine findings from 39 patients with acute pancreatitis, and from 42 patients with non-pancreatic causes of abdominal pain (controls), as well as findings from 24 healthy subjects (normals) were studied. Decision thresholds were established for each parameter using either the control or the normal population, and the resulting diagnostic sensitivities determined. On hospital admission, all serum assays were equally sensitive, but on subsequent days lipase, trypsinogen and elastase-1 assays all significantly surpassed the sensitivity of the serum amylase assay. On the second and subsequent hospitalization days, determination of timed urine amylase excretion offered no advantage over the serum amylase, and the ratio of amylase and creatinine clearances lacked discrimination altogether.Role of serum pancreatic enzyme assays in diagnosis of pancreatic disease.The serum behavior of amylase, pancreatic isoamylase, lipase, trypsinogen, and elastase 1 was studied in 145 patients with pancreatic disease and in 66 patients with abdominal pain of nonpancreatic origin, for the purpose of evaluating the relative diagnostic utility of their assays. In 34 patients with acute pancreatitis, serum lipase, trypsinogen, and elastase 1 were elevated in all 34, pancreatic isoamylase in 33 (97%) and amylase in 30 (88%). Ten of these acute pancreatitis patients were followed sequentially for seven days: the variations in their serum enzyme levels were parallel, although the lipase, trypsinogen, and particularly the elastase 1 elevations persisted longer than did those of amylase and pancreatic isoamylase. Among the patients with chronic pancreatitis, either in painful relapse (N = 19) or with pancreatic cysts (N = 15), the respective percentages of enzymes elevations were: 79 and 80% for elastase 1, 68 and 67% for trypsinogen, 63 and 73% for pancreatic isoamylase, 58 and 60% for lipase, 53 and 60% for amylase. In the 52 chronic pancreatitis patients studied during clinical remission, serum enzyme behavior varied greatly, and a majority of the assays (60%) were normal; even in the case of severe pancreatic exocrine insufficiency, normal as well as abnormally high and low enzyme values were seen. Highly variable enzyme behavior was also seen in the 40 patients with pancreatic cancer, and elastase I was the most frequently (35%) elevated enzyme in this group as well. Among the patients with abdominal pain of nonpancreatic origin, abnormally high enzyme levels were present in percentages ranging from 6% for lipase to 21% for trypsinogen.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Cancer, pancreatitis, and the detection of the isoenzymes of DNAase, RNAase and amylase.Substrate films of starch, RNA, and DNA were used to identify the isoenzymes of amylase, RNAase, and DNAase found in human ductal pancreatic juice subjected to isoelectric focusing. The pancreatic secretions from 15 patients were shown to contain as many as four isoenzymes of RNAase; the two major forms had isoelectric points of 7.87 and 7.52, and the two minor forms, of 7.25 and 6.90. Six DNAase bands were detected; the major bands had pI values of 4.86 and 4.79, and sometimes appeared as one band. The minor bands had pI values of 5.08, 5.00, 4.68, and 4.58. Purified bovine DNAase I, analyzed similarly, showed four bands (5.29, 5.19, 5.04 and 4.96). Nine isoenzymes of alpha-amylase were observed in the secretions from 15 patients. The major alpha-amylase isoenzyme had a pI value of 6.84 in 14 patients and of 7.04 in 1 patient. Secondary bands were seen with pI values of 6.23, 6.53 and 6.69. Additional isoenzymes were found with pI values of 7.16, 6.39, 6.00 and 5.78. The amylase isoenzyme with a pI value of 6.39 was found in 7 of the 8 patients with a normal pancreas or carcinoma of the pancreas, and in only 1 of 7 patients with acute or chronic pancreatitis.Serum amylase, isoamylase, and lipase in the acute abdomen. Their diagnostic value for acute pancreatitis.We evaluated the diagnostic value of serum amylase, isoamylase, and lipase for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis from sera of patients with acute abdominal pain. Comparison was first made in condition A between 32 patients with image-proven pancreatitis and 414 patients with nonpancreatic acute abdomen (the control group), then in condition B, between 62 pancreatitis patients with or without image proof and the control group. We found (a) that patients with image-proven pancreatitis suffer a more severe clinical course than those without; (b) that the sensitivity, positive predictive value, and accuracy in condition B are higher than in condition A at any cutoff level; (c) that none of the enzyme assays is specific at the upper reference limit, but their diagnostic yields are much improved by raising cutoff levels to about three or four times the upper limit; and (d) that at these selected cutoff levels, amylase had a diagnostic value similar to p-isoamylase or lipase in both conditions (sensitivity 84% and 92% for amylase in conditions A and B, respectively; specificity 98% and 98%; positive predictive value 75% and 90%; negative predictive value 99% and 99%; accuracy 91% and 97%). In conclusion, at an appropriately selected cutoff level, amylase can be effectively used as the first-line test and isoamylase or lipase as adjunct tests for acute abdominal conditions.Significant hyperamylasaemia in conditions other than acute pancreatitis.[Amylase clearance compared to creating clearance in diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].A simple quantitative index of the P3 amylase isoenzyme in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Following a report (Legaz, M.E. and Kenny, M.A. (1976) Clin. Chem. 22, 57--62) that the amylase isoenzyme, P3, is elevated in acute pancreatitis but not in other conditions a new "P3 Index" is proposed. This reflects the ratio of the P3 isoenzyme to the major salivary isoenzyme, S1. The P3 Index eliminates the problems of peak overlap which prevent accurate detection or direct quantitation of P3. In acute pancreatitis a large increase in 3 produces a serum P3 Index of below 80%. Normal serum exhibits a P3 Index of above 80%. Most causes of hyperamylasaemia observed without acute pancreatitis also exhibited a P3 Index of above 80%. The P3 Index seems to be a useful aid to the diagnosis or exclusion of acute pancreatitis in patients exhibiting equivocal hyperamylasaemia.[Diagnostic and prognostic significance of diastase in acute pancreatitis].Point-of-care urine trypsinogen-2 test for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.To assess a point-of-care urine trypsinogen-2 (UT) test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.This was a prospective study of patients presenting to the emergency department with abdominal pain suggestive of acute pancreatitis. A 3-minute point-of-care UT test (Actim Pancreatitis; Medix Biochemica, Kauniainen, Finland) was compared with final diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, which was based on suggestive clinical features, serum lipase and/or amylase levels and imaging.Of 124 patients included in this study, 69 patients had final diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. The sensitivity and specificity of UT were, respectively, 73.9% (95% CI 61.9% to 83.8%) and 94.6% (95% CI 84.9% to 98.9%).The point-of-care UT test for acute pancreatitis had good sensitivity and specificity, and can be used reliably at the bedside to make a positive diagnosis.[Acute pancreatitis and biochemical markers. Isoamylase].Amylase activity in blood and urine, lipase activity in blood, and amylase/creatinine clearance ratio have been prospectively compared in order to test these parameters against estimation of pancreatic isoamylase. Pancreatic isoamylase had been evaluated by inhibition methodology and not by electrophoresis. One hundred patients admitted for strictly sus-umbilical abdominal pain in emergency unit have been studied. Results show that we do not have in blood specific biochemical marker for acute pancreatitis. Lipase and P isoamylase activity evaluation have about the same specificity. In emergency situation the choice of routine investigation will be rather based on methodological simplicity and lower cost.Evaluation of Pankrin, a new serum test for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Evaluation of a new serum test for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.One hundred and sixty-three patients presenting with acute abdominal pain were included into the study. Acute pancreatitis was diagnosed by CT or ultrasound. Serum samples were taken 0-1 days, 2-3 days, and 4-5 days after onset of symptoms and C-reactive protein, lipase, elastase, and amylase were determined. As a further parameter, Pankrin, a newly available kit for the measurement of a mixture of elastase and other pancreatic secretory proteins was used. As control, serum from 558 apparently healthy blood donors was analysed. The receiver operator characteristics (ROC) and the areas under the curves (AUC) were calculated for each individual test.In Western blot analysis the antibodies of the Pankrin assay detected the majority of protein bands in human pancreatic juice. In blood donors, the median value of Pankrin was 88 U/ml (range 14-316 U/ml). In 16 from 163 patients with acute abdominal pain, acute pancreatitis was diagnosed and the median Pankrin level in samples collected on days 0-1 was 345 U/ml (range 220-518 U/ml, p<0.0001). In those patients with abdominal pain but without pancreatitis, the median was 116 U/ml (range 17-396 U/ml). The ROC-curves for amylase, lipase, elastase, and Pankrin from samples collected after 0-1 days were similar (area under the curves (AUC) >0.98). After 2-3 days, the AUC of all markers decreased (AUC 0.80-0.89) and after 4-5 days the AUC of Pankrin (0.85) was higher than all other parameters.In those patients with abdominal pain, who present several days after onset of pain, the new serum test for pancreatitis, Pankrin, could be of help to improve the diagnosis of pancreatitis.Should serum pancreatic lipase replace serum amylase as a biomarker of acute pancreatitis?Serum pancreatic lipase may improve the diagnosis of pancreatitis compared to serum amylase. Both enzymes have been measured simultaneously at our hospital allowing for a comparison of their diagnostic accuracy.Seventeen thousand five hundred and thirty-one measurements of either serum amylase and or serum pancreatic lipase were made on 10 931 patients treated at a metropolitan teaching hospital between January 2001 and May 2003. Of these, 8937 were initially treated in the Emergency Department. These results were collected in a database, which was linked by the patients' medical record number to the radiology and medical records. Patients with either an elevated lipase value or a discharge diagnosis of acute pancreatitis had their radiological diagnosis reviewed along with their biochemistry and histology record. The diagnosis of acute pancreatitis was made if there was radiological evidence of peripancreatic inflammation.One thousand eight hundred and twenty-five patients had either elevated serum amylase and or serum pancreatic lipase. The medical records coded for pancreatitis in a further 55 whose enzymes were not elevated. Three hundred and twenty of these had radiological evidence of acute pancreatitis. Receiver operator characteristic analysis of the initial sample from patients received in the Emergency Department showed improved diagnostic accuracy for serum pancreatic lipase (area under the curve (AUC) 0.948) compared with serum amylase (AUC, 0.906, P < 0.05). A clinically useful cut-off point would be at the diagnostic threshold; 208 U/L (normal <190 U/L) for serum pancreatic lipase and 114 U/L (normal 27-100 U/L) for serum amylase where the sensitivity was 90.3 cf., 76.8% and the specificity was 93 cf., 92.6%. 18.8% of the acute pancreatitis patients did not have elevated serum amylase while only 2.9% did not have elevated serum pancreatic lipase on the first emergency department measurement.It is concluded that serum pancreatic lipase is a more accurate biomarker of acute pancreatitis than serum amylase.Serum pancreatic enzyme assays in acute abdomen: a comparative prospective study.Serum amylase, pancreatic isoamylase, lipase, trypsinogen and elastase-1 were measured in 100 consecutive patients who were emergency admissions to a surgical department, and in 27 selected patients with proven acute pancreatitis who served as controls. The final diagnoses in the 100 patients of the study group were: acute pancreatitis in eight patients, other digestive diseases in 87, and urogenital tract diseases in five. In the control group, pancreas-specific enzymes were abnormally high in all patients and amylase in 26 out of 27. In the study group, all enzymes were markedly high in all eight patients with acute pancreatitis. In the remaining 92 patients, serum amylase was abnormally high in seven, and at least one pancreatic enzyme was elevated in 16. These elevations were generally mild. The diagnostic efficiency, i.e., the percentage of patients correctly classified, was 96% for pancreatic isoamylase and lipase, 93% for amylase, 91% for elastase-1, and 84% for trypsinogen. We conclude that serum lipase turbidimetric assay is the most suitable test for emergency diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, because it is highly sensitive and specific and simply and quickly performed.Evaluation of lipase levels in patients with nephropathia epidemica--no evidence for acute pancreatitis.The most common causative agent for hemorrhagic fever with renal syndrome in Germany is Puumala virus (PUUV) and a high percentage of patients with PUUV infection have gastrointestinal (GI) symptoms. The aim of the present study was to determine the prevalence of increased lipase levels and acute pancreatitis during nephropathia epidemica (NE) in 166 patients from Germany.Clinical and laboratory data during the acute phase of the disease were obtained from medical reports and files from 456 patients during acute hantavirus infection. Patients in whom serum lipase levels were determined during acute course of the disease were included in the study.Lipase levels at the time of diagnosis were determined in 166 of the 456 NE patients (36%). Of the 166 patients, 25 (15%) had elevated lipase levels at the time of admission to hospital or first contact with general practitioner/nephrologist. In total 7 patients had a threefold increased serum lipase above the normal range. Abdominal pain was not more often present in the group of patients with elevated serum lipase compared to the lipase-negative group (9/25 vs 58/141). Abdominal ultrasound and CT scans revealed no signs of pancreatitis in any of the patients. Patients with elevated serum lipase had higher serum creatinine peak levels (p = 0.03) during the course of the disease.Elevated lipase levels were common in our patient cohort and might reflect a more severe form of NE. NE does not lead to acute pancreatitis.The value of clinical laboratory studies in acute pancreatitis.Validity of the urinary trypsinogen-2 test in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.A simple urinary trypsinogen-2 test was evaluated for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.This prospective multicenter study enrolled consecutive patients with acute abdominal pain who presented to the emergency department or who were hospitalized at 1 of 21 medical institutions in Japan. Patients were tested with urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test and a quantitative trypsinogen-2 assay, and these values were compared with serum amylase and lipase findings.A total of 412 patients were enrolled. The trypsinogen-2 dipstick test was positive in 107 of 156 patients with acute pancreatitis (sensitivity, 68.6%) and in 33 of 256 patients with nonpancreatic abdominal pain (specificity, 87.1%). The sensitivity for the diagnosis of pancreatitis caused by alcohol and gallstones by the dipstick test was 72.2% and 81.8%, respectively, which was much higher than those associated with amylase testing. There are several degrees of positivity within the urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test. Modification of the cutoff point such that positive (+) and most positive (++) results were interpreted as a positive result, the specificity and positive likelihood ratio increased to 92.2% and 7.63, respectively.This simple, rapid, easy, and noninvasive urinary trypsinogen-2 test can diagnose or rule out most cases of acute pancreatitis.Serum elastase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis: a prospective study.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the usefulness of the elastase 1 (E1) enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. This is the first Australian evaluation of the E1 ELISA.Three groups of patients were prospectively assessed: control patients, patients with acute pancreatitis, and patients with acute non-pancreatitic abdominal pain. Serum was collected on all patients on admission and the sensitivity, specificity and diagnostic accuracy of serum elastase, amylase and lipase was determined.Twenty-nine patients with 30 episodes of pancreatitis, 38 patients with acute non-pancreatitic abdominal pain and 121 control patients were studied. For all patient episodes E1 ELISA at a cut-off of 3.5 ng/mL had a sensitivity of 80%, specificity of 96% and an efficiency of 94% in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. For episodes more than 48 h after onset of symptoms, sensitivity was 100%, specificity was 96% and diagnostic efficiency was 96%. This performance was equivalent to amylase but inferior to lipase.Of the biochemical markers for pancreatitis currently available, lipase is the most useful. The relatively inferior sensitivity and problematic reference range for the ELISA E1, together with its limitations in measuring total elastase, currently prevent its widespread use.Acute pancreatitis. Normal serum amylase does not exclude severe acute pancreatitis.[Role of certain enzymatic systems in different forms of acute pancreatitis].[RESEARCH ON THE BEHAVIOR OF AMYLASE IN ACUTE PANCREATITIS].Post-ERCP pancreatitis and hyperamylasemia: patient-related and operative risk factors.Previous studies on the development of post-endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (post-ERCP) hyperamylasemia and pancreatitis have focused on different risk factors, either procedure- or patient-related, and also prognostic factors, such as amylase levels together with the occurrence of pancreatic-type pain, which might be implicated. The aim of this study is to identify possible predictive risk factors and also prognostic factors in order to better organize the treatment strategy.During a 5-year period, 556 ERCP procedures were performed by the same operator. Of these, 43 procedures were excluded from the study. Data recorded from the procedures included both patient characteristics and procedure details. Patients were evaluated for pancreatic-type pain at 4 and 24 h after the procedure, and serum amylase levels were determined at 2 and 24 h after the procedure. Pancreatitis was diagnosed on the basis of both clinical and laboratory examination, while patients with hyperamylasemia were in a normal clinical condition but had high serum amylase levels.Post-ERCP pancreatitis occurred after 17 procedures (3.3%) and hyperamylasemia after 85 procedures (16.5%). Patients who developed pancreatitis all had pancreatic-type pain together with amylase levels higher than 4-5 times the upper normal limit at 24 h after ERCP. There was a significant association between serum amylase levels and post-procedure pancreatic-type pain both at 4 h and 24 h after ERCP (P = 0.006). Age less than 50 years, history of relapsing pancreatitis, pancreatic duct opacification, and difficulty in obtaining bile duct cannulation all proved to be significant predictive risk factors for the development of either hyperamylasemia or pancreatitis. In contrast, additional procedures and sphincterotomy seemed to reduce the likelihood of both complications.Serum amylase levels higher than 4 - 5 times the normal upper limit together with the existence of pancreatic-type pain, at 24 h after ERCP, strongly suggest the occurrence of pancreatitis. When any of the predictive risk factors coexist during a procedure it would be better either to abandon the procedure and try again later or, if the situation is urgent, to have earlier recourse to an alternative, such as precut or needle-knife papillotomy.Urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip in detecting ERCP-induced pancreatitis.We have evaluated a new urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip, based on the principle of immunochromatography, in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis induced by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).One hundred six consecutive patients undergoing ERCP (with opacification of the pancreatic duct) at the Helsinki University Central Hospital were included in the study. Patients were tested with a urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip six hours after ERCP. Quantitative trypsinogen-2 as well as serum and urine amylase values were measured before the procedure and six hours after it.In patients developing pancreatitis after ERCP, the median urinary trypsinogen-2 concentration six hours after the endoscopic procedure was 1780 micrograms/l (range 29-10,700 micrograms/l), and in patients without pancreatitis the median concentration was 3.6 micrograms/l (range 0.1-3390 micrograms/l; P < 0.0001). The sensitivity and specificity figures for the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip results in diagnosing post-ERCP pancreatitis were comparable (81% and 97%, respectively) to those for serum amylase (91% and 96%) and urine amylase measurements (81% and 95%). The test strip showed a good correlation (kappa = 0.75) with the quantitative trypsinogen-2 assay.The increase in urinary trypsinogen-2 concentration after ERCP reflects pancreatic injury, and can be detected by the test strip. Patients should be tested before the ERCP procedure as well, since elevated baseline values occur. The test is reliable and easy to perform even on an outpatient basis. However, its clinical usefulness requires evaluation in further trials.[Significance of serum lipase measurement for the diagnosis of acute and chronic pancreatic disease].Early prediction of severity in acute pancreatitis by urinary trypsinogen activation peptide: a multicentre study.There is a pressing clinical requirement for an early simple test of severity in acute pancreatitis. We investigated the use of an assay of trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP).We undertook a multicentre study in 246 patients (172 with acute pancreatitis [35 with severe disease], 74 controls). We assessed the predictive value of urinary TAP concentrations measured by a validated competitive immunoassay. We compared the results with those for plasma C-reactive protein and three clinicobiochemical scoring systems. TAP and C-reactive protein concentrations were analysed at set times after symptom onset and compared with the clinicobiochemical systems scores at key times during hospital stay.At 24 h after symptom onset, the median urinary TAP concentration was 37 nmol/L (IQR 17-110) for severe and 15 nmol/L (5-35) for mild disease (p<0.001). The respective values for plasma C-reactive protein were 24 mg/L (3-34) and 25 mg/L (6-75; p=0.208). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive, and negative predictive values of the test to show severe acute pancreatitis compared with mild acute pancreatitis at 24 h were: for TAP (>35 nmol/L), 58%, 73%, 39%, and 86%, respectively, and for C-reactive protein (>150 mg/L), 0%, 90%, 0%, and 75%. 48 h after admission the values for the clinicobiochemical scoring systems were: APACHE II (> or =8), 56%, 64%, 30%, and 85%; Ranson score (> or =3), 89%, 64%, 38%, and 96%; and Glasgow score (> or =3), 77%, 75%, 44%, and 93%. At 48 h, the values for C-reactive protein were 86%, 61%, 37%, and 94% and for TAP were 83%, 72%, 44%, and 94%. Combined testing of C-reactive protein and TAP was not superior to TAP alone for accuracy.Urinary TAP provided accurate severity prediction 24 h after onset of symptoms. This single marker of severity in acute pancreatitis deserves routine clinical application.[Value of blood lipase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[Enzyme activity of blood and urine in acute pancreatites].[Diagnostic value of various laboratory parameters in acute pancreatitis].In 427 samples of serum and urine, collected during their stay at hospital from 40 patients affected with acute pancreatitis, the sensitivity and the specifity of total amylase and lipase in serum, total amylase and pancreas isoamylase in urine, as well as the amylase-/creatinine clearance were determined. The pancreas isoamylase in serum was used as reference value. It appeared that the sensitivity of the lipase was next to that of the pancreas isoamylase in serum, even in limit ranges. Usually the lipase stayed pathological the longest and could therefore be used to identify in the best way even an easing-off pancreatitis. The diagnostic accuracy of the total amylase in serum and urine, of the pancreatic isoamylase in urine and of the amylase-/creatinine clearance was found to be obviously less reliable. The specifity of all examined tests was reduced in patients with renal insufficiency, liver disease, alcohol abuse and in patients with abdominal pains of non pancreatic origin. Concluding form our results and with regard to the expenditure of laboratory technique and to the time required by the methods of determination, we found that of all the examined parameters, the lipase was the most convenient for both emergency and routine diagnose of an acute pancreatitis.Strategic use of individual and combined enzyme indicators for acute pancreatitis analyzed by receiver-operator characteristics.The optimal strategy for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis with enzyme assay results as indicators was evaluated in 67 emergency cases in whom this condition was suspected. We measured urine amylase expressed as activity concentration (U/L), timed excretion (U/h), and amylase/creatinine clearance ratio, and also serum amylase, elastase, lipase, and trypsinogen, at admission and repeatedly during hospitalization. The receiver-operator characteristic function was used to evaluate the diagnostic discrimination of each variable among initial findings and among the highest individual findings established retrospectively. We applied the same treatment to multiple univariate discrimination, using the six possible pairs and the four possible triplets of serum indicators. The results suggest that such urine assays should be abandoned, that all individual serum assays combine about 0.9 sensitivity with 0.9 specificity, that pairing of two assays does not clearly enhance discrimination, and that triplets of tests may degrade discrimination. The trade-off between sensitivity and specificity is a function not only of the chosen decision threshold but also of the sampling strategy (initial vs highest values) and of the interpretation rule (Boolean "and" vs "or" strategy).[Usefulness of amylase isoenzyme determination for the diagnosis of pancreatic diseases].Serum amylase shows the greatest increase among the various pancreatic enzymes that increase at the onset of acute pancreatitis. However, the diagnostic value of the total serum amylase activity has been questioned due to its lack of specificity. To differentiate hyperamylasemia due to pancreatic disease from that due to other causes, the activity of pancreatic amylase should be determined by using a monoclonal antibody that specifically binds to pancreatic or salivary amylase, or by electrophoresis. The most useful and accurate method for distinguishing pancreatic from salivary-type hyperamylasemia is isoamylase analysis by electrophoresis. In patients with acute pancreatitis, increase of Amylase-1 and -2 is accompanied by the appearance of Amylase-4, a minor component of the pancreatic-type isoamylases, and by disappearance of the salivary-type isoenzymes, thereby leaving a pattern of the pancreatic isoenzymes alone. This pancreatitis pattern persists for about 10 days after the onset of illness. Therefore, if such a pattern is found in a patient with clinical findings suggesting acute pancreatitis despite a normal serum amylase level, the patient can be diagnosed as having acute pancreatitis or a recent attack of the disease. However, the existence of an inherited trait of the pancreatitis pattern in some healthy individuals must be borne in mind. Patients with recurrent chronic pancreatitis also show pancreatic-type hyperamylasemia, whereas the pancreatic amylase activity decreases when pancreatic exocrine insufficiency progresses. Hyperamylasemia due to elevated salivary amylase activity is also common in patients with diabetic ketosis or malignancies such as lung cancer (adenocarcinoma). Hyperamylasemia is also found following various types of operation. In most cases, it is salivary-type hyperamylasemia.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Diagnostic value of routine isoamylase assay of hyperamylasemic serum.The purpose of this study was to determine if routine isoamylase assay would provide valuable diagnostic information in patients with hyperamylasemia. Isoamylase distribution was determined in sera of 37 consecutive hyperamylasemic patients. The attending physicians (without knowledge of the isoamylase level) had considered acute pancreatitis to be "probable" in 19, "possible" in 4, and "unlikely" in 14 of these 37 patients. Three of the patients considered probably to have pancreatitis and 3 thought possibly to have pancreatitis had normal serum pancreatic isoamylase levels. Knowledge of the normal pancreatic isoamylase level in these 6 patients probably would have changed the clinical diagnosis to some condition other than pancreatitis. Of the 14 hyperamylasemic patients thought "unlikely" to have pancreatitis, 7 had an elevation of just pancreatic isoamylase and 3 additional patients had elevation of both pancreatic and salivary isoamylases. It seems likely that knowledge of these elevated pancreatic isoamylase levels would have changed the clinical diagnosis to "probable" pancreatitis for many of these patients. We conclude that routine isoamylase assay provides diagnostic information that might change the clinical diagnosis in 20%--40% of hyperamylasemic patients.The diagnosis of acute pancreatitis: enhanced sensitivity from an ELISA assay of lipase.An enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for human pancreatic lipase was compared, for diagnostic sensitivity, to a chromogenic assay of total plasma amylase in 37 patients with acute pancreatitis. Data from patients were related to a control group of 38 patients with gastrointestinal disease but without pancreatic diseases. During the first 24 hours of admission, lipase was elevated 131 standard deviations (SD) above the mean of the control range compared to 25 SD for amylase (p less than 0.001). When amylase fell to within the control range (less than 531 iu/l) lipase was still elevated at a mean of 11 SD above the control mean. In patients followed for longer, lipase usually remained above normal for at least ten days, whereas amylase lay within 1 SD of the mean of the control samples in most plasma samples after 4 days. These data show that lipase is considerably more sensitive than total amylase for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.The Rapignost-Amylase test in acute pancreatitis.Serum lipase: a better test to diagnose acute alcoholic pancreatitis.To determine whether serum lipase is a better test than serum amylase to diagnose acute alcoholic pancreatitis.Two hundred two asymptomatic chronic alcoholics (Group A) and 29 patients with image-proven pancreatitis (Group P).Serum lipase was measured using the Kodak Ektachem clinical chemistry slide. Serum amylase was estimated using the Kodak Ektachem clinical chemistry slide or the Beckman Astra amylase chemistry module.The level of serum amylase in Group A ranged from 17 to 347 U/L (mean 71, SD +/- 36 U/L) and in Group P from 180 to 2,985 U/L (mean 722, SD +/- 663 U/L). Thirteen of 29 patients (45%) with image-proven pancreatitis had levels that overlapped those found in asymptomatic alcoholics. The serum lipase levels in Group A ranged from 34 to 600 U/L (mean 186, SD +/- 111 U/L), while in Group P, the corresponding figures were 1,011 to 25,706 U/L (mean 5,822, SD +/- 5,664 U/L). None of the 29 patients with image-proven pancreatitis had levels that overlapped those found in asymptomatic alcoholics.Serum lipase is a better test that serum amylase to diagnose acute alcoholic pancreatitis.Biochemical evaluation of patients with acute pancreatitis.In this study we determined the clinical accuracy of alpha2-macroglobulin, alpha-amylase, C-reactive protein, lipase, non-esterified fatty acids, pancreatic alpha-amylase and phospholipase A in the diagnosis and prognosis of acute pancreatitis in a group of patients with acute abdominal pain using receiver operator characteristic curve analysis. We investigated 59 patients with acute pancreatitis and 72 patients with extrapancreatic diseases of gastrointestinal origin. On the basis of initial enzyme activities, at cut-offs of 245 U/l for amylase, 656 U/l for lipase, and 182 U/l for pancreatic alpha-amylase, the diagnostic efficiencies were 0.993, 0.980, and 0.975, respectively. Receiver operator characteristic curve analysis showed the same diagnostic accuracies. We evaluated the accuracy of serum alpha2-macroglobulin, C-reactive protein, non-esterified fatty acids and phospholipase A for differentiation between acute necrotizing pancreatitis and acute oedematous pancreatitis. C-reactive protein had the highest prognostic accuracy of the parameters studied (the area under curve = 0.9082) and at a cut-off value of 126 mg/l, sensitivity and specificity were 0.759 and 0.912, respectively. The role of the clinical laboratory in the investigation of patients with acute pancreatitis continues to evolve and biochemical parameters are a good diagnostic and prognostic option.Evaluation and comparison of cathodic trypsin-like immunoreactivity, pancreatic lipase and pancreatic isoamylase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in 849 consecutive patients with acute abdominal pain.In 849 patients (417 men, 432 women) consecutively hospitalized with acute abdominal pain we compared the value of serum cathodic trypsin-like immunoreactivity, pancreatic lipase (EC 3.2.1.3) and pancreatic isoamylase (EC 3.2.1.1) as diagnostic tests for acute pancreatitis. The diagnoses of acute pancreatitis (in 49 patients, 5.8%) and other diseases were made without knowledge of these enzyme values. When evaluated by means of receiver operating characteristic curves no differences were found in diagnostic performance of the three enzymes. Use of combinations of different enzymes had no advantage over single enzyme determination using discrimination analysis for evaluation. The highest efficiency was for all three enzymes 0.991 (95% confidence limits: 0.983-0.995) and for all three enzymes the discrimination value giving this efficiency was several times the upper limit of reference range: 1 779 micrograms/l for cathodic trypsin-like immunoreactivity, 831 U/l for pancreatic isoamylase and 316 micrograms/l for pancreatic lipase. None of the enzymes had any prognostic value at admission in predicting a mild or severe attack of acute pancreatitis. In conclusion, no single enzyme or combination of enzymes had any diagnostic advantage for acute pancreatitis in patients with acute abdominal pain. Thus selection of one of the three enzymes as diagnostic test of acute pancreatitis is to be based on considerations such as economy, methodological simplicity, possibility of automated assay and the time-consumption at the assay.[Experiences with our rapid lipase method for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Efficiency in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis increased by improved electrophoresis of amylase isoenzyme P3 on cellulose acetate.Serum from patients who have suffered acute pancreatitis contains P3, an isoenzyme of pancreatic-derived amylase (EC 3.2.1.1). Heretofore, complete resolution of P3 from the major salivary isoenzyme in serum, S1, has not been possible, thus compromising the diagnostic potential of P3 for pancreatitis. I describe an electrophoretic method for the essentially complete resolution of P3 from S1 by including CaCl2, 1 mmol/L, in the Tris barbiturate electrophoresis buffer (25 mmol/L, pH 8.8). I evaluated the clinical utility of the method for 129 consecutive patients suspected of having pancreatitis, by using receiver operating characteristic curve analysis for results for total amylase, P2, and P3 activity. For a true-positive rate of 90% with a prevalence of pancreatitis of 7.8%, the diagnostic efficiency was increased from 82% (total amylase) to 91% (P2) to 98% (P3). Thus, including P3 activity in the diagnostic criteria will eliminate most false-positive results for pancreatitis based on total amylase activity alone, and should decrease the need for expensive radiologic procedures currently required to confirm the presence of pancreatitis. I conclude that P3 can be of significant value in the differential diagnosis of pancreatitis from other syndromes with hyperamylasemia.The value of immunoreactive lipase in acute pancreatitis.We have evaluated a new agglutination test for serum immunoreactive lipase in 24 patients with abdominal pain and hyperamylasaemia. On admission all 20 patients with acute pancreatitis had a positive lipase test, 3 of the 4 patients who did not have pancreatitis had a negative lipase test. The sensitivity of the lipase test on day 1 is 100%, the specificity 96% and predictive value of a positive test is 95.2% compared to 83% for amylase. A negative test excludes pancreatitis. In addition, the test stays positive longer than hyperamylasaemia.[Informativeness of the methods of early clinical laboratory diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].In 92 patients with acute pancreatitis, the informative value of the available methods for laboratory investigations (general blood analysis, biochemical blood analysis with measurement of the level of total protein, bilirubin, glucose, ALAT, ASAT, amylase activity, amylase activity in the urine) was analysed. The authors consider that the indices studied are rather informative for independent reliable diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and differentiation of its forms.Increase in amylase clearance in relation to creatinin clearance during acute pancreatitis.Renal amylase clearance in relation to creatinin clearance (Cam/Ccr) was determined for 20 patients suffering from acute pancreatitis (AP). For each of them, the diagnosis rested upon operative or laparoscopic observation of characteristic anatomical or histological lesions. The average clearance relationship in these patients reached 16 +/- SEM 3.8%. These results were significantly higher than those obtained from 132 patients who had been hospitalized for other medical or surgical diseases, as well as from 51 test patients (p less than 0.001). The authors stressed the diagnostic importance of this test, in particular in the presence of a normal amylasemia level.[Diagnosis and treatment of acute pancreatitis].[Clinical value of determination of some enzymes and isoenzymes in acute pancreatitis].Amylase-creatinine clearance ratio in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.[On the laboratory diagnosis of the functional state of pancreas].The role of urine trypsinogen-2 test in the differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in the Emergency Department.The aim of the study was to investigate the role and importance of the urine trypsinogen-2 dipstick test in the differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in the Emergency Department and to compare results with those of conventional tests.The study was performed prospectively in the patients admitting to the Emergency Department due to upper abdominal pain. Thirty-two of the 87 patients included in the study had acute pancreatitis diagnosis. Serum amylase, lipase, C-reactive protein (CRP) and urine trypsinogen-2 using Actim pancreatitis dipstick were studied in all patients. The statistical analysis was performed using SPSS 11.5 package program.Urine trypsinogen-2 was found positive in 21 (65.6%) of 32 patients. The sensitivity of the test for pancreatitis was identified as 64%, specificity as 85%, positive predictive value as 72%, and negative predictive value as 81%. These values were statistically significant compared to the control group (p<0.01).Although it has lower sensitivity and specificity compared to amylase and lipase, we suggest that urine trypsinogen-2 test may be an important diagnostic tool in excluding the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, since it provides results within 5 minutes in the Emergency Department, is cheaper, has a higher negative predictive value, and is easy to use.[Biochemical studies in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Clinical value of rapid urine trypsinogen-2 test strip, urinary trypsinogen activation peptide, and serum and urinary activation peptide of carboxypeptidase B in acute pancreatitis.To assess the usefulness of urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip, urinary trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP), and serum and urine concentrations of the activation peptide of carboxypeptidase B (CAPAP) in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Patients with acute abdominal pain and hospitalized within 24 h after the onset of symptoms were prospectively studied. Urinary trypsinogen-2 was considered positive when a clear blue line was observed (detection limit 50 microg/L). Urinary TAP was measured using a quantitative solid-phase ELISA, and serum and urinary CAPAP by a radioimmunoassay method.Acute abdominal pain was due to acute pancreatitis in 50 patients and turned out to be extrapancreatic in origin in 22 patients. Patients with acute pancreatitis showed significantly higher median levels of serum and urinary CAPAP levels, as well as amylase and lipase than extrapancreatic controls. Median TAP levels were similar in both groups. The urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip was positive in 68% of patients with acute pancreatitis and 13.6% in extrapancreatic controls (P<0.01). Urinary CAPAP was the most reliable test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis (sensitivity 66.7%, specificity 95.5%, positive and negative predictive values 96.6% and 56.7%, respectively), with a 14.6 positive likelihood ratio for a cut-off value of 2.32 nmol/L.In patients with acute abdominal pain, hospitalized within 24 h of symptom onset, CAPAP in serum and urine was a reliable diagnostic marker of acute pancreatitis. Urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip showed a clinical value similar to amylase and lipase. Urinary TAP was not a useful screening test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.[Usefulness of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].The clinical usefulness of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test is still in controversy. We evaluated the usefulness of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test in patients with acute pancreatitis.Urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test was prospectively performed in 50 patients with acute pancreatitis, 50 patients with non-pancreatic abdominal pain, and 50 healthy controls.On admission, urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test was positive in 36 of 50 patients with acute pancreatitis (sensitivity, 72%) and in 4 of 50 patients with non-pancreatic abdominal pain (specificity, 92%). On the other hand, it was all negative in controls. The sensitivity and specificity of serum lipase were 78% and 94%, respectively. At 24 hours after admission, the positive rate of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test rose from 72% to 94% (p=0.02). The results of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test was positive in 14 of 15 patients with severe pancreatitis and 22 of 35 patients with mild pancreatitis according to the criteria by Atlanta International Symposium, 1992.Urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test is comparable to serum lipase in diagnosing acute pancreatitis. Delayed measurement and severe pancreatitis are more likely to yield positive results with urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test. Thus, we suggest that the cut-off value of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test should be lowered to increase its sensitivity.Serum markers in the early assessment of severity of acute pancreatitis: which is the most useful?Amylase thermolability: its application in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and pancreatic pseudocysts.[Value of biochemical and imaging procedures for the diagnosis and prognosis of acute pancreatitis--results of a prospective clinical study].For a period of 14 days we carried out measurements for alpha-1-protease inhibitor, alpha-2-macroglobulin, complement C 3, complement C 4, and C-reactive protein in two different groups of patients with acute pancreatitis. Group I consisted of 13 patients with edematous-interstitial pancreatitis and group II of 22 patients with necrotizing pancreatitis. Diagnosis of acute pancreatitis was established by clinical signs and symptoms, by specific pancreatic enzymes determined in the serum, by imaging procedures, and by laparotomy in 24 cases. The overall detection rate for pancreatic necrosis was 90% for the contrast enhanced CT and 33% for ultrasonography respectively. There were significant differences as to all measured serum parameters between the two morphologically defined pancreatitis groups. The necrosis detection rate was 95% for CRP and 85% for alpha-2-macroglobulin. The combined determination of CRP and alpha-2-macroglobulin is recommended in patients with acute pancreatitis to stage the severity of the disease and to probably replace the CT investigation.What is the best biochemical test to diagnose acute pancreatitis? A prospective clinical study.To determine which biochemical test is best to distinguish acute pancreatitis from other pancreatic and nonpancreatic diseases associated with hyperamylasemia.We conducted a prospective clinical study of 836 consecutive patients who had a total serum amylase test requested by a physician during a 7-month period.Radioimmunoassay and enzymatic activity methods were used to measure pancreas-specific proteins of varied size, charge, and stability. In addition, scoring systems were used for the diagnosis of pancreatitis, and statistical analyses were done to determine sensitivity and specificity.We found minor differences in sensitivity and specificity for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis among pancreatic isoamylase, phospholipase A2, colipase, lipase, and carboxylester lipase. Of these tests, the combination of isoamylase and phospholipase A2 had a small but statistically significant increased sensitivity (90%; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 74 to 98%) and specificity (93%; 95% CI = 91 to 95%) over isoamylase (90% and 92%, respectively; 95% CI = 90 to 94%) and phospholipase A2 (90% and 75%, respectively; 95% CI = 72 to 78%) alone for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Pancreas-specific proteins are satisfactory for diagnosing acute pancreatitis if the test is validated by the laboratory. Clinically, the slight advantage of using both isoamylase and phospholipase A2 does not outweigh the expense of performing two assays; we recommend using isoamylase to diagnose acute pancreatitis.[Ratio of amylase clearance and creatinine clearance in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].In 21 healthy volunteers the ratio of amylase clearance and creatinine clearance (Cam/Ccr) was determined in urine collected at admission, after a 1-hour collection period and after a 2-hour collection period. The normal values were 1.8 +/- 1.6%, 1.9 +/- 2% and 2.0 +/- 1.7% respectively. They were comparable with those published by others. The reproducibility of the method was acceptable (r = 0.62). When compared with serum amylase determinations, Cam/Ccr showed neither better sensitivity in 19 patients suffering an acute episode of proven pancreatitis, nor better specificity in 19 patients with acute abdomen but no evidence of pancreatitis.Pancreatic amylase in serum for differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and acute abdominal diseases.[Clinical value of the analysis of amylase isoenzymes in the blood and urine of patients wih cholelithiasis without acute pancreatitis].Screening for acute pancreatitis: a rapid assay for plasma lipase.A simple agglutination test for plasma immunoreactive lipase has been evaluated in 101 patients. A positive agglutination reaction was observed if, and only if, plasma lipase exceeded 300 micrograms/l. The test was positive in all 23 patients with acute pancreatitis who were tested on the day of admission to hospital, in one patient with a pancreatitic pseudocyst and in one patient with hyperamylasaemia and hyperlipasaemia due to a perforated duodenal ulcer. The simplicity and reliability of this test make it suitable as an urgent diagnostic investigation for acute pancreatitis.Diagnosing acute pancreatitis in children: what is the diagnostic yield and concordance for serum pancreatic enzymes and imaging within 96 h of presentation?There are limitations and challenges with the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis (AP) in children. We evaluated the diagnostic yield and concordance for serum pancreatic enzymes and imaging in children with AP.A retrospective review of laboratory and radiographic results within 96 h of AP presentation (January 2000-July 2011) was performed at two paediatric hospitals. Observed agreement and kappa statistics () were determined between outcomes of bloods (lipase and/or amylase) and imaging (ultrasound (US) and/or computed tomography (CT)).A total of 103/131 (79%) AP cases had both bloods and imaging performed (within 96 h). Overall, lipase, amylase, US and CT were consistent with an AP diagnosis in 93% (93/100), 54% (43/80), 27% (21/77) and 67% (28/42) of cases respectively. The diagnostic yield for combinations of blood(s) and imaging(s) tests was higher than any single test and blood tests alone. The observed agreement between bloods 'lipase or amylase' and imaging 'US or CT,' was 40%. The  was -0.083 suggesting no agreement. In 55% of cases, enzymes were positive whilst imaging was negative and the converse was evident in 5% of cases. There was no agreement between the various diagnostic tests, except between amylase and US, which had fair agreement.Elevations in serum lipase contributed to the diagnosis more often than other tests. Combinations of blood(s) and imaging(s) tests have an increased diagnostic yield. Serum enzyme elevation and imaging changes poorly correlated. At least 5% of cases of AP may be missed if imaging is not performed.Assays of serum lipase: analytical and clinical considerations.We evaluated three commercially available methods for determining lipase (EC 3.1.1.3) in serum--the Du Pont aca, Boehringer Mannheim Diagnostics (BMD), and Kodak Ektachem (EK) procedures--for their analytical properties and diagnostic efficiencies. Titrimetry was used as the comparative method. The BMD and EK methods showed better agreement with the titrimetric method, owing to the presence of the necessary cofactor, colipase, in their reagents. Colipase also increased the analytical sensitivity of the BMD and EK procedures as compared with the aca method. Determinations of serum lipase, by all methods, had a clinical sensitivity in excess of 80% for acute pancreatitis; the specificity of the lipase test was about 60%, or twice that of serum amylase. Serum lipase determinations with the current, simpler technology are superior to total amylase in the diagnosis of patients with acute pancreatitis. When a colipase-supplemented method is used, a serum lipase value greater than 10-fold the upper reference limit appears to be pathognomonic for acute pancreatitis or inflammation of organs close to the pancreas.[Prognostic role trypsinogen-activating peptide in an acute pancreatitis].The level of trypsinogenactivating peptide (TAP) in the blood serum of patients with an acute pancreatitis was investigated. In patients with severe necrotic pancreatitis the TAP content was the highest one.[Serum lipase assay for clinical use. Critical study (author's transl)].An accurate, quick, and reproducible method to assay serum lipase activity allowed a parallel study of lipase and amylase in 147 patients. Lipase appeared very specific of pancreatic distress. In acute pancreatitis its increase was constant, frank, quick and lasting. It brought a diagnostic argument superior to the dosages of amylase activities in serum and/or urine. But its value as an evolutive and pronostic test was as much limited. Its interest as a negative argument for differential diagnosis was not superior either. In chronic pancreatic diseases, it gave evidence of massive spread or complications.Time-resolved immunofluorometric assay of trypsin-2 complexed with alpha 1-antitrypsin in serum.We developed a sensitive time-resolved immunofluorometric assay (IFMA) for trypsin-2 complexed with alpha 1-antitrypsin (AAT). We used a trypsin-2-specific monoclonal antibody on the solid phase and a europium-labeled polyclonal antibody to AAT as tracer. The detection limit is 0.05 microgram/L and the range of linearity extends to 100 micrograms/L. We compared the clinical utility of the trypsin-2-AAT assay with that of free trypsinogen-2 and amylase in serum by studying 120 healthy subjects, 29 patients with acute pancreatitis, 11 with extrahepatic biliary obstruction, and 34 with acute abdominal disorders of extrapancreatic origin. In patients with acute pancreatitis the median concentration of trypsin-2-AAT in serum was 59-fold that in healthy controls, 42-fold that in patients with biliary obstruction, and 33-fold that in patients with acute abdominal disorders of extrapancreatic origin. These differences are greater than those for trypsinogen-2 (19-, 20-, and 28-fold, respectively) and amylase (5.4-, 6.5-, and 5.4-fold, respectively). Compared with the assays of free trypsinogen-2 and amylase, our assay of trypsin-2-AAT improved the clinical specificity for acute pancreatitis by eliminating false-positive results in our control groups. Increased concentrations of trypsin-2-AAT and trypsinogen-2 were also observed in patients with chronic renal failure undergoing dialysis.[Laboratory diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip for acute pancreatitis.A simple, rapid test is specific and sensitive enough to distinguish, in patients with clinically suspected acute pancreatitis, those whose abdominal pain is indeed of pancreatic origin has proved elusive.In two consecutive series of surgical patients in a teaching hospital, whose acute abdominal pain turned out to be due to acute pancreatitis (n-57) or extrapancreatic in origin (n=40), we studied urinary trypsinogen-2 in two ways. A test strip, incorporating monoclonal antibodies to two epitopes on trypsinogen-2, recorded a blue line when concentrations exceeded 50 microgram/L; we also measured trypsinogen-2 concentrations in the laboratory.In the patients with acute pancreatitis the test strip was positive in 52 and negative in five, whereas in the 40 extrapancreatic controls there were four false positives. In a further set of 57 orthopaedic controls, one urine was strip-test positive. Concentrations of urinary trypsinogen-2 and the test-strip results were in good agreement and in only three of the 154 patients were the two approaches discrepant, at the 50 microgram/L cut-off.These findings, in patients whose acute abdominal pain was known to be pancreatic in origin or not, are encouraging but need to be confirmed in a consecutive series of patients in whom the diagnosis of pancreatitis is in doubt.The screening value of the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio in acute pancreatitis.The screening value of the amylase creatinine clearance ratio in acute pancreatitis is studied. A series of 28 patients with pancreatic disease is compared with 80 controls and 82 patients with other intra-abdominal disease. The greatest specificity of the amylase creatinine clearance ratio value is reached at the 3.5 level. The amylase creatinine clearance ratio value proves to be of interest, not only in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis but also in differentiating mild and heavy forms of pancreatitis.Interpretation of serum amylase levels in the critically ill patient.To understand better the incidence and meaning of hyperamylasemia in the intensive care setting, cellulose acetate membrane electrophoresis was used to measure the isoenzymes of serum amylase in 192 patients with a variety of critical illnesses. Seventy of these patients had elevated serum amylase levels, but none had clinical or biochemical evidence of acute pancreatitis or renal failure. Of the 70 patients who had hyperamylasemia, in only 18 (26%) was it due solely to an elevation of the pancreatic isoamylase fraction. The remaining 52 patients were hyperamylasemic due to elevations in the nonpancreatic isoamylase fraction or elevations in both pancreatic and nonpancreatic isoamylase fractions. These data indicate that hyperamylasemia in the absence of clinical pancreatic disease is common in the ICU and is frequently caused by nonpancreatic production of serum amylase. Caution is, therefore, advised in interpreting elevated serum amylase levels in critically ill patients.Rapid measurement of urinary trypsinogen-2 as a screening test for acute pancreatitis.Serum trypsinogen activation peptide in the assessment of the diagnosis and severity of acute pancreatic damage: a pilot study using a new determination technique.To evaluate the clinical value of a new direct and competitive immunoassay for trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP) determination in acute pancreatitis (AP).The subjects were 34 patients with AP (22 mild, 12 severe), 12 patients with nonpancreatic acute abdominal pain (AA), 11 healthy subjects (HS), and 16 consecutive patients who underwent therapeutic ERCP (ERCP). Serum TAP, amylase, and lipase levels were determined in AP, AA, and HS at their initial observation; the AP patients were also studied for 6 consecutive days after admission. In the ERCP patients, serum TAP, amylase, and lipase levels, as well as urine TAP and amylase levels, were determined before and 6 hours after endoscopy.Serum TAP levels on admission were 0.35 +/- 1.60 OD (mean +/- SD) in AP patients and 0.005 +/- 0.001 OD in AA patients, while HS patients had no detectable serum TAP levels. ERCP patients had no detectable serum TAP levels before and 6 hours after the ERCP, whereas urine TAP concentrations were 1.72 +/- 3.43 OD and 0.75 +/- 1.49 OD before and 6 hours after the execution of the endoscopy, respectively (P = 0.249). The sensitivities and specificities of serum TAP, amylase, and lipase levels in discriminating between AP and AA were 23.5% and 91.7%, 94.1% and 100%, and 97.1% and 100%, respectively, while those used in the assessment of the severity of AP were 29.9% and 73.5%, 38.8% and 81.2%, and 28.4% and 83.6%, respectively.TAP is of limited value in assessing the diagnosis and the severity of acute pancreatic damage.[Outcome of clinical application for medical test: "Actim pancreatitis test for acute pancreatitis diagnostics and control test"].The hourly rate of urinary amylase excretion, serum amylase, and serum lipase. II. Patients with gastrointestinal and pancreatic disorders.Gastrointestinal disease other than hepatobiliary and pancreatic disorders was associated with hourly rates of urinary amylase excretion above the limits of normal for control subjects (88 IU/hour compared with 69 IU/hour). In hepatobiliary disease, excretion rates of more than 88 but usually less than 190 IU/hour were sometimes found. Whilst rates of urinary amylase excretion were not helpful in the diagnosis of chronic pancreatitis or carcinoma of the pancreas, levels above 190 IU/hour were found in acute pancreatitis at a time when the serum levels were also diagnostic. After the acute episode the rate of urinary amylase excretion was moderately elevated for up to six days but did not reach diagnostic levels. Persistent elevation of serum amylase and lipase levels and hourly rates of urinary amylase excretion for more than six days suggested that a pseudocyst had developed. In acute pancreatitis the level of serum lipase was more frequently raised and persisted so for longer than either the serum or urinary amylase. Although the hourly rate of urinary amylase excretion is of little value alone, when performed in conjunction with evaluating the serum amylase and lipase it may provide useful additional evidence of pancreatic disease and it could be useful in the diagnosis of relapsing chronic pancreatitis.[Diagnostic and prognostic significance of urinary amylase in acute biliary pancreatitis].The diagnostic significance of amylasuria in the early period of an acute biliary pancreatitis (ABP) course was estimated in 70 patients. High sensitivity of the test during 3 days of the disease course was ascertained as well as a lack of specificity of the criterion concerning differential diagnosis with an acute cholecystitis. The interrelationship between the enzyme activity and lethality was not revealed. It is necessary to take into account the peculiarities of the amylasuria diagnostic-prognostical significance while substantiation of diagnostic program and the treatment tactics for ABP.[Usefulness of determining urinary trypsinogen-2 in diagnosis and prognosis of patients with acute pancreatitis].To study the role of urinary trypsinogen-2 in diagnosing and early prognosis of patients with acute pancreatitis (AP) and the relationship to length of hospital stay and mortality.Forty-two patients were included in the study. In all cases, blood cell count, serum chemistry, urine amylase and urine trypsinogen-2 were measured. A cut-off of 50 microg/L was established and, when positive, a second dilution was made (2000 microg/L). Other variables included were etiology, mean length of hospital stay, transfer to an ICU and death.Out of the 42 patients, 29 (69%) were men and 13 (31%) women. Average age was 61 years. The most frequent cause was biliary, followed by alcohol. Mean hospital stay was 8.38 days. Transferred to an ICU: 4 (9.5%) patients. Two of them and a third, who had not been transferred, died (7.14%). High serum amylase was found in 33 (78.57%) patients and high lipase in 36 (85.71%). Urinary trypsinogen-2 was positive in 34 patients (80.95%). Statistical association between urinary trypsinogen-2 and age (p=0.016; r=0.893), glucose (p=0.005; r=0.901), serum amylase (p=0.029; r=0.852), lipase (p=0.022; r=0.809) and hypoxemia (p=0.001; r=0.962) was found. Regarding hospital stay, there was statistical association with age (p=0.046; r=0.784) and metabolic acidosis (p=0.016; r=0.839). With respect to mortality there was statistical association with hypocalcemia (p=0.008; r=0.899) and metabolic acidosis (p=0.032; r=0.814).Testing urinary trypsinogen-2 in patients with AP is rapid and useful. Patients over the age of 65 with hypoxia, metabolic acidosis and hypocalcemia tend to present a prolonged average hospital stay and higher mortality.Serum lipase, C-reactive protein, and interleukin-6 levels in ERCP-induced pancreatitis.C-reactive protein (CRP) and interleukin-6 (IL-6) are elevated in acute pancreatitis. Limited studies have evaluated their role in ERCP-induced pancreatitis. The aim of this study was to assess the role of serum lipase, CRP, and IL-6 in ERCP-induced pancreatitis.Eighty-five patients (62 women, 23 men; mean age 43 years; range 16-85 years) who underwent ERCP were entered in a prospective trial. ERCP-induced pancreatitis was classified as mild, moderate, or severe. Serum levels of lipase, CRP, and IL-6 were measured before ERCP and at 12 to 24 hours and 36 to 48 hours after ERCP.Mild, moderate, and severe pancreatitis occurred, respectively, in 9, 7, and 4 patients after ERCP. There were significant differences in levels of CRP and IL-6 but not lipase for patients with mild versus moderate and moderate versus severe pancreatitis. The mean CRP levels (mg/dL) at 12 to 24 hours were 0.98 +/- 0.24 in mild pancreatitis, 3.89 +/- 0.32 in moderate pancreatitis, and 12.0 +/- 1.60 in severe pancreatitis. The levels, respectively, at 36 to 48 hours were 1.60 +/- 0.31, 7.60 +/- 0.74, and 25.0 +/- 2.9. The mean IL-6 levels (pg/mL) at 12 to 24 hours were 16.6 +/- 2.06 in mild pancreatitis, 73.0 +/- 15.60 in moderate pancreatitis, and 235.5 +/- 26.31 in severe pancreatitis. The levels at 36 to 48 hours were, respectively, 18.92 +/- 3.28, 100.17 +/- 11.56, and 438.2 +/- 71.50.Serum CRP and IL-6 levels may be useful early markers for predicting the severity of ERCP-induced pancreatitis.Variations in amylase isoenzymes and lipase during acute pancreatitis, and in other disorders causing hyperamylasemia.We compare the clinical value of assay of amylase (EC 3.2.1.1) isoenzymes with that of lipase (EC 3.1.1.3) in serum from patients with proven acute pancreatitis or with hyperamylasemia from other causes. In the former group we measured amylase, lipase, and isoamylases daily. Lipase and P(pancreas)-type isoamylases reached the highest mean values on the first day of an attack of acute pancreatitis (day one). Lipase declined rapidly, and by day four its mean activity was about the same as that of amylase and lower than that of the P-type isoamylases. Great inter-individual variations were found among patients with a similar clinical course. Of the 85 samples analyzed, amylase activity for 36 declined to within reference limits, but 18 of the 36 had high lipase activity, 18 had high P-type isoamylases activity, and 31 had P3 isoenzyme, which is not detectable in normal sera. Determination of isoamylases is a more sensitive index to acute pancreatitis than lipase assay and may be particularly useful when pancreatitis is suspected despite a normal total amylase activity. In the group of patients with hyperamylasemia from other origins, three had macroamylasemia, one had mumps, one had abdominal trauma without pancreatic injury, and one had pelvic inflammatory disease. The specific pattern of macroamylase on electrophoresis permitted a precise diagnosis of macroamylasemia; normal lipase had only ruled out pancreatitis. In the three other cases, lipase and isoamylases excluded pancreatic involvement.Role of activation peptides from pancreatic proenzymes in the diagnosis and prognosis of acute pancreatitis.[Sensitivity and specificity of blood amylase, of the ratio of amylase and creatinine clearance, and of the ratio of urinary amylase and creatinine in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Simultaneous determination of alpha-amylase and pancreatic lipase in acute episodes of pancreatitis.Serum complex of trypsin 2 and alpha 1 antitrypsin as diagnostic and prognostic marker of acute pancreatitis: clinical study in consecutive patients.To estimate the usefulness of serum concentrations of the complex of trypsin 2 and alpha 1 antitrypsin in diagnosing and assessing the severity of acute pancreatitis in comparison with serum C reactive protein, amylase, and trypsinogen 2 concentrations (reference markers).Markers were measured in consecutive patients admitted with acute abdominal pain that was either due to pancreatitis or to other disease unrelated to the pancreas (controls).Department of surgery of a teaching hospital in Helsinki.110 patients with acute pancreatitis and 66 with acute abdominal diseases of extrapancreatic origin. On the basis of the clinical course, acute pancreatitis was classified as mild (82 patients) or severe (28 patients).Clinical diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and severity of the disease.At admission all patients with acute pancreatitis had clearly raised concentrations of trypsin 2-alpha 1 antitrypsin complex (32 micrograms/l), whereas only three of the controls had such values. Of the markers studied, trypsin 2-alpha 1 antitrypsin complex had the largest area under the receiver operating curve, both in differentiating acute pancreatitis from extrapancreatic disease and in differentiating mild from severe disease.Of the markers studied, trypsin 2-alpha 1 antitrypsin complex was the most accurate in differentiating between acute pancreatitis and extrapancreatic disease and in predicting a severe course for acute pancreatitis.[Diagnostic significance of alpha-amylase determination in the serum and urine in acute and chronic pancreatitis].[The amylase and creatinine clearance coefficient in acute and chronic pancreatitis and diabetes mellitus].[Amylase-creatinine ratio in the diagnosis of acute pancreatic and biliary pathology].[VALUE OF AMYLASE TESTS IN ACUTE PANCREATITIS].[The diagnosis of acute pancreatitis (author's transl)].[Acute pancreatitis (etiology, pathogenesis and pathobiochemistry)].Clinical value of routine isoamylase analysis of hyperamylasemia.To study incidence and cause of hyperamylasemia in various diseases, serum amylase was determined in 1371 consecutive patients and subsequent isoamylase analysis was carried out in 91 hyperamylasemic sera. Hyperamylasemia was observed in various diseases: acute pancreatitis (5/5), chronic pancreatitis (0/3), mumps (3/3), cerebrovascular diseases (2/39), respiratory diseases (6/69), heart diseases (5/89), liver diseases (16/101), cholelithiasis (0/13), diabetes mellitus (2/66), peptic ulcer (0/46), other digestive diseases (0/33), malignant tumor (9/249), renal failure (21/25), intraabdominal surgery (9/35), extraabdominal surgery (2/20), trauma (1/23), and miscellaneous (10/552). Salivary type hyperamylasemia due to dominant increase of salivary type isoamylase occurred in over half of the hyperamylasemic patients. Knowledge of hyperamylasemia in various diseases and routine isoamylase analysis of hyperamylasemic sera would enhance diagnostic accuracy and exclude unnecessary treatment of pancreatitis solely because of the presence of hyperamylasemia.[Diagnostic value of the determination of amylase in the urine in diagnosis of postoperative pancreatic necrosis].Elastase-1 vs trypsin, lipase and amylase serum levels in pancreatic diseases.Serum levels of elastase-1 were measured in 174 patients with pancreatic diseases and in 131 controls and were compared with the circulating levels of trypsin, lipase and amylase and with clinical data. In 48 patients with chronic pancreatitis serum enzyme levels were also compared with the pancreatic exocrine capacity. About 50% of the patients with chronic pancreatic disease showed increased levels of serum elastase, sometimes even in the face of long lasting pain-free periods, and/or of severe pancreatic impairment. On the contrary, serum trypsin and lipase were almost always either normal or below the normal range in the absence of painful relapses and/or in the presence of an impairment of the exocrine pancreatic function. A strict correlation was found between elastase-1 and trypsin (r = 0.778) and lipase (r = 0.834). However, controls and patients with chronic pancreatic diseases behaved differently, an increase in trypsin and in lipase levels being associated in the patients with chronic pancreatitis with an increase in elastase-1 values significantly larger than that observed in controls. These findings raise the hypothesis, at present unproven, that trypsin and lipase serum assays are more reliable indices of pancreatic exocrine function, whereas serum elastase-1 levels may indicate the presence of acute pancreatic episodes, even if subclinical, the importance of which, in the natural history of the disease, remains unknown.CLINICAL ENZYMOLOGY. 3. SERUM AND URINARY AMYLASE AND LIPASE IN ACUTE PANCREATITIS.[Pancreatic lymph flow and lipase activity in acute pancreatitis. (Preliminary report)].The frequency of marcroamylasemia and the diagnostic value of the amylase to creatinine clearance ratio in patients with elevated serum amylase activity.190 patients with elevated serum amylase levels were tested for macroamylasemia and the amylase to creatinine clearance ratio. Macroamylasemia was found in 3 patients. In these patients macroamylasemia persisted after the total activity of serum amylase had fallen to nearly normal levels. The Cam/Ccr-ratios were determined 14 times in the 3 macroamylasemic patients. Only one of the 14 values was clearly less than 1%. Cam/Ccr-ratios above 4% were found in 83 patients. In 56 of them the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis could not be confirmed. 19 out of 46 patients with the established diagnosis of acute pancreatitis had Cam/Ccr-ratios below 4%. Cam/Ccr-ratios below 1% were also found in patients without macroamylasemia. It is concluded that high and low Cam/Ccr-ratios are not specific for acute pancreatitis and macroamylasemia, respectively, and--moreover--that a normal Cam/Ccr-ratio excludes neither acute pancreatitis nor macroamylesemia.[Amylase in blood and urine in diagnosis of acute pancreatitis; importance and clinical significance of excess amylase in the blood in acute abdominal disorders of extra-pancreatic origin].Laboratory tests in the differential diagnosis of hyperamylasemia.We evaluated the clinical utility of some recently developed laboratory methods, including total amylase by three methods; isoamylase by inhibition and isoelectric focusing; lipase by pH-Stat and turbidimetry; and immunoreactive trypsin. All methods correlated highly positively with hyperamylasemia due to primary acute pancreatitis. Pancreatic-type isoamylase determinations have the greatest clinical usefulness, because total amylase, lipase, and immunoreactive trypsin are increased in a relatively high percentage of other abdominal diseases. Increases in the last-mentioned enzymes in nonpancreatic abdominal disease may be the result of injuries to the pancreas secondary to the primary disease, which are being detected with these highly sensitive methods. Because of the high clinical sensitivity of lipase and immunoreactive trypsin determinations, a normal result tends to exclude acute pancreatitis. Hyperamylasemia seen in lung carcinoma is due to increase in an amylase isoenzyme similar to the salivary-type amylase. The method for pancreatic-type isoamylase based on selective inhibition is satisfactory for routine clinical laboratory use.Trypsinogen-2 and trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP) in urine of patients with acute pancreatitis.There is an obvious clinical need for a simple test that can identify patients at risk of developing severe acute pancreatitis. In this work we compared urinary trypsinogen-2 with urinary trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP) and serum C-reactive protein (CRP) for early differentiation between mild and severe acute pancreatitis.The study population consisted of 127 consecutive patients with acute pancreatitis of whom 29 had severe disease. Urinary trypsinogen-2 was measured by a quantitative immunofluorometric assay and TAP by a competitive immunoassay. Serum CRP was determined by immunoturbidimetry.The sensitivity and specificity to identify severe acute pancreatitis on admission was 72% and 81% for urinary trypsinogen-2, 64% and 82% for urinary TAP, and 29% and 93% for serum CRP, respectively. At 24 h after admission, the values were 82% and 78% for urinary trypsinogen-2, 52% and 92% for urinary TAP, and 84% and 72% for serum CRP, respectively. Receiver-operating characteristics curve analysis showed that the area under the curve was larger for urinary trypsinogen-2 than for urinary TAP and serum CRP on admission and 24 h after admission. On admission the positive likelihood ration for urinary trypsiongen-2 was 3.7, for urinary TAP 3.6, and 4.3 for serum CRP, respectively. The corresponding negative likelihood ratios were 0.34, 0.43, and 0.76, respectively.Urinary trypsinogen-2 was superior to serum CRP and as god as or even better than urinary TAP and in the early prediction of disease severity in acute pancreatitis. These results suggest that it could be a valuable adjunct in the early assessment of the severity of acute pancreatitis.[Amylase test in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].The determination of serum and urinary amylase are methods used in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, however there are many abdominal problems that can cause hyperamylasemia, in the absence of pancreatic disease, for this reason in 1969 Levitt and col. signaled the possible advantages of amylase/creatinine clearence ratio, in the clinical diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. This test was used in cases with acute pancreatitis, as in other diseases, in correlation with levels in normal subjects, with the objective of evaluating its clinica utility, in relation to the formentioned paragraph. Results concluded that the amylase/creatinine ratio is not of greater diagnostic utility than the determination of urinary amylase, in acute pancreatitis.Lipase latex test for acute abdominal pain: comparison with serum lipase, trypsin, elastase and amylase.The diagnostic capacity of a semiquantitative latex test for lipase measurement was compared with the measurement of other pancreatic enzymes in 100 consecutive patients admitted to a general hospital for recent onset of severe abdominal pain. Positive results of the test were found in two patients with acute pancreatitis, and in one out of three chronic pancreatitis relapses. The test yielded false-positive results only in two patients who had no apparent pancreatic involvement. A marginal increase in other pancreatic enzymes was found in a few patients with acute biliary or appendicular problems. In conclusion, the lipase latex test can be suggested in an emergency setting as a quick and reliable alternative to serum amylase to rule out a diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.[Acute pancreatitis: new diagnostic possibilities].A rapid assay for serum immunoreactive lipase as a screening test for acute pancreatitis.In 134 consecutive patients with acute abdominal pain, we evaluated the clinical role of a new rapid test for serum lipase based on latex agglutination. The results were compared with those obtained with a widely used lipase immunoassay as well as with serum amylase and pancreatic isoamylase measurements. Fifty-five healthy subjects were studied as controls. In 174 cases (121 patients and 53 controls) the results of the two lipase assays were in agreement. A positive lipase latex test was found in 10 of 12 patients with acute pancreatitis, in eight of 24 patients with other pancreatic diseases, and in 14 of 98 with nonpancreatic diseases. The sensitivity and specificity of this test were similar to those of the other pancreatic enzyme assays performed. The results indicate that the lipase latex agglutination test is useful for emergency screening for acute pancreatitis in patients with acute abdominal pain.The P3 iso-enzyme of serum amylase in the management of patients with acute pancreatitis.The concept of the P3 index and its use in separating acute pancreatitis from other causes of hyperamylasaemia is described. The mean P3 index of 12 healthy volunteers was 94.8 per cent. All 69 patients with acute pancreatitis had a P3 index below 80 per cent with a mean value of 67.9 per cent. The P3 index is abnormal longer than the raised serum amylase, which increases diagnostic accuracy. Causes of hyperamylasaemia other than acute pancreatitis have been studied and most patients have a P3 index above 80 per cent, although certain false positive values have been obtained. No patient with acute pancreatitis has had a P3 index above 80 per cent on admission. Five cases of acute pancreatitis have been studied in whom the P3 index remained abnormal; all had continuing pancreatic disease, usually with pseudocyst formation. The test has proved most valuable in identifying those patients at risk of developing subsequent problems. To date, the test cannot be relied upon to help in deciding upon the severity of an attack of acute pancreatitis.[Diagnostic value of amylase determination and early laparotomy in acute pancreatitis].Rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip in the diagnosis of pancreatitis after endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.The aim of this prospective study was to evaluate the diagnostic value of the rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip in post-endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) pancreatitis.A total of 150 patients were tested with the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip and serum levels of amylase and lipase before ERCP and 3 hours after ERCP. The diagnostic value of urinary trypsinogen-2 strip test compared with that of serum amylase and lipase was analyzed.Post-ERCP pancreatitis was diagnosed in 13 (8.7%) of 150 patients. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test at 3 hours after ERCP are 84.6%, 97.1%, 73.3%, 98.5%, and 96%, respectively. At the cutoff level of 3 times the upper reference limit, the negative predictive values of amylase and lipase were comparable to that urinary trypsinogen-2 strip test; however, their positive predictive values (42.9% and 36.4%, respectively) were markedly lower than that of urinary trypsinogen-2 test (73.3%).The urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test is a useful test for early diagnosis of post-ERCP pancreatitis. A negative urinary dipstick test at 3 hours after the procedure rules out post-ERCP pancreatitis with a high probability and allows of early discharge plan.Twenty-four-hour serum amylase predicting pancreatic reaction after endoscopic sphincterotomy.Acute pancreatitis is still the most common complication after endoscopic sphincterotomy (ES) and cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). The aim of this study was to detect the time when the peak of serum amylase was predictive for postprocedure pancreatitis or long-lasting severe hyperamylasemia, in order to plan the follow-up of patients.Serum amylase activity was measured in a prospective series of 409 consecutive patients after ES, immediately before ES and two, four, eight and 24 hours thereafter; the two, four and eight-hour data were compared with those at 24 hours and with the outcome. Evaluation was done separately for the 198 cases with pancreatic duct opacification and for the 202 cases at high risk for postprocedure pancreatitis.Twenty-four hours after ES, amylase was still more than five times the upper normal limit in 26 patients, associated with pancreatic-like pain in 19 of them (mild/moderate pancreatitis) and asymptomatic in the remaining seven (long-lasting severe hyperamylasemia). There was a significant difference at all sampling times between the 26 patients with 24-hour severe hyperamylasemia and those with the lower level. Although the sensitivity of amylase measurement in detecting pancreatitis was highest at eight hours, in practice the four-hour assessment appears a reliable predictor. Almost all patients with serum amylase levels more than five times the upper normal limit at four, eight and 24 hours had had pancreatic duct opacification. In contrast, patient-related risk factors for postprocedure pancreatitis did not play a significant role in the present series.Serum amylase assessment four hours after ES is a reliable, cost-effective follow-up and minimizes the likelihood of underestimating the risk of post-procedure pancreatic reaction. It should be recommended particularly in out-patients and when pancreatic duct opacification has occurred.[Significance of diastase and amylase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Detection of colipase in serum and urine of pancreatitis patients.Colipase, like other pancreatic proteins, is liberated into the circulation in acute pancreatitis. Its concentration was measured in serum by a turbidimetric and in urine by a titrimetric method. The principle of both assays is based on the reactivation of bile acid inhibited, pure human pancreatic lipase by colipase. Whereas in healthy individuals colipase was found neither in serum nor urine (detection limit approximately 6.5 micrograms/1), a wide concentration range was observed in 29 patients with acute pancreatitis. Urine values varied between 3.8 and 7121 micrograms colipase/g creatinine; in serum levels up to 664 micrograms/1 were found. There was no correlation with serum lipase activity: On a molar basis, the ratio of serum colipase to serum lipase ranged between less than 0.04 and 2.14, but was below 1 in most sera. Colipase is rapidly removed from the circulation by glomerular filtration, its elimination rate from serum being more than twice as fast as that of lipase. This results in a constant decrease of the colipase/lipase ratio during the course of the disease. Probably determination of colipase is of no direct diagnostic value in pancreatic disorders, but our findings are of considerable significance for the measurement of serum lipase in the presence of bile acids, particularly with regard to turbidimetric assays. We conclude that lipase activity values obtained by these methods are mainly dependent on the degree of saturation of the enzyme with its cofactor and not on the true lipase concentration.The role of routine assays of serum amylase and lipase for the diagnosis of acute abdominal pain.We aimed to evaluate the role of routine measurements of serum amylase and lipase in the diagnosis of acute abdominal pain.We identified all patients who had serum amylase and lipase assays over a 62-day period at a single university teaching hospital and reviewed their case notes.We excluded 58 of the 1598 patients on grounds of ineligibility (< 18 years of age and those transferred from other hospitals). A complete data set was obtained for 1520 (98.7%) of the remaining 1540 patients. Only 9.1% of requests were based on a clinical suspicion of acute pancreatitis. Of the 44 (2.9%) patients who had acute pancreatitis, only 28 (63.6%) had an associated rise in serum amylase and/or lipase 3 times above the maximum reference range, the remainder being diagnosed radiologically. At this cut-off range, the sensitivity and specificity for serum amylase were 50% and 99%, and those for serum lipase 64% and 97%, respectively.Routine measurements of serum amylase and lipase are unhelpful in the diagnosis of acute abdominal pain unless there is clinical suspicion of acute pancreatitis. In these patients, assay of lipase alone is preferable to assay of amylase alone or both enzymes.Increased serum trypsinogen 2 and trypsin 2-1 antitrypsin complex values identify endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP)-induced pancreatitis with high accuracy.Pancreatic leakage and acute postoperative pancreatitis after proximal pancreatoduodenectomy.Acute postoperative pancreatitis (APP) after proximal pancreatoduodenectomy (PDE) is a major and serious complication. The purpose of the the study is early diagnosis of APP, differentiation from pancreatic stump leak and possibilities of surgical treatment.Of all patients who underwent PDE for ductal adenocarcinoma of the pancreatic head complicated by type C pancreatic leak, who died during primary hospitalization, we used autopsy findings to find patients with histologically confirmed APP. We compared this group to patients with only a pancreatic leak and patients with an uncomplicated clinical course. We retrospectively evaluated the postoperative clinical course, and radiological and laboratory data of all patients. These parameters were statistically compared between the individual groups using Fisher LSD test. We considered p = 0.05 to be statistically significant. Data were analysed using software STATISTICA 10.0 (StatSoft CR s.r.o.).One hundred sixty patients underwent PDE for ductal adenocarcinoma at our institution between 20072011 and were retrospectivaly reviewed. APP with postoperative type C pancreatic leak was observed in 4 (2.5%) patients; none of these patients survived. We found significantly higher levels of serum pancreatic amylase (AMS) on the 1. postoperative day in 3 of these patients compared to the other groups. Significantly increasing levels of CRP during the the first 5 postoperative days were observed in 75% of these patients. Retrospectively analysed contrast CT scans up to the 5th POD did not show APP. Only 1 patient had findings of APP type E according to Balthazar on CT scan performed on the 9th POD.The most significant factor in early diagnosis of APP after PDE is an abrupt change in clinical status. We also observed significantly higher levels of serum concentrations of CRP and AMS. Based on our findings, CT scan is not beneficial in the early diagnosis of APP. In cases of early diagnosed APP after PDE, the question of performing a completion pancreatectomy and its timing remains.Reliable screening for acute pancreatitis with rapid urine trypsinogen-2 test strip.This study was designed to evaluate the validity of a new rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip (Actim Pancreatitis) for detection of acute pancreatitis in patients with acute abdominal pain.A total of 525 consecutive patients presenting with abdominal pain at two emergency units was included prospectively and tested with the Actim Pancreatitis test strip. Urine trypsinogen-2 concentrations were also determined by a quantitative method. The diagnosis and assessment of severity of acute pancreatitis was based on raised serum and urinary amylase levels, clinical features and findings on dynamic contrast-enhanced computed tomography.In 45 patients the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis could be established. The Actim Pancreatitis test strip result was positive in 43 of them resulting in a sensitivity of 96 per cent. Thirty-seven false-positive Actim Pancreatitis test strips were obtained in patients with non-pancreatic abdominal pain resulting in a specificity of 92 per cent. Nine patients with severe acute pancreatitis were all detected by the dipstick.A negative Actim Pancreatitis strip result excludes acute pancreatitis with high probability. Positive results indicate the need for further evaluation, i.e. other enzyme measurements and/or radiological examinations. The test is easy and rapid to perform, unequivocal in its interpretation and can be used in healthcare units lacking laboratory facilities.Lipase isoforms and amylase isoenzymes: assays and application in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Pancreatic juice and serum from patients with acute pancreatitis contain three enzymes that have lipolytic activity: L1 and L2, which are pancreatic isoenzymes or isoforms of lipase (EC 3.1.1.3), and L3, which is probably pancreatic carboxyl ester lipase, also known as cholesterol esterase (EC 3.1.1.13). These enzymes are readily separated electrophoretically on agarose and can be developed with an overlay of Kodak Ektachem lipase slide material. The latter acts as a dry-reagent developing substrate, with the enzymes producing blue bands in the slide material. We found L1 in about one-half of normal persons, L2 in none, and L3 in all. We assayed for amylase (EC 3.2.1.1), amylase isoenzymes, lipase, and lipase isoforms in the sera of 100 patients with suspected acute pancreatitis. L2 lipase has the greatest diagnostic efficiency for the diagnosis of pancreatitis, compared with total amylase, P3 amylase, and total lipase. Lipase and L2 could replace amylase, an inefficient test, for the diagnosis of patients with suspected acute pancreatitis. In patients receiving organ transplants, a serum amylase value of greater than 300 U/L or a lipase of greater than 1000 U/L discriminated well between patients with and without complications and (or) acute rejection.Serum lipase activity is increased in disease states other than acute pancreatitis: amylase revisited.Pankrin: a new parameter for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in cases of late clinical presentation.Specificity of increased amylase to creatinine clearance ratio in acute pancreatitis.The amylase to creatinine clearance ratio was found to be normal in 11 of 33 patients with acute pancreatitis. The ratio was elevated in 10 of 19 patients with renal insufficiency. Thus, it does not seem to be a specific index in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Renal handling of beta-2-microglobulin, amylase and albumin in acute pancreatitis.The renal handling of beta-2-microglobulin, amylase and albumin was studied in patients with acute pancreatitis. The data were compared with results obtained from patients with glomerular proteinuria and from patients with tubular proteinuria. Initially during acute pancreatitis, the clearance ratio (clearance protein/clearance creatinine) for beta-2-microglobulin was increased dramatically (77-fold) compared to normals. After four to seven days this ratio had fallen and was elevated only 7-fold. The corresponding figures for amylase were 3.3 and 1.8 times and for albumin 9 and 5 times respectively. In glomerular disease, the clearance ratios for beta-2-microglobulin, amylase and albumin were increased 6, 1.1, and 154 times and in tubular disease 448, 1.1, and 28 times, respectively. The electrophoretic pattern of the urinary proteins during pancreatitis was mostly normal. In a few cases, slight tubular proteinuria was noticed. Amylase activity in serum and urine from patients with pancreatitis was found to sediment, (S20,W = 4.6) in a sucrose gradient, identical to amylase from normal serum and urine. The marked increase in the excretion of beta-2-microglobulin probably reflects interference of the kidney function at the proximal tubular level. Determinations of this protein in urine may be of value in studies of kidney dysfunction that can accompany pancreatitis.The value of routine pancreatic iso-amylase measurements in the diagnosis of pancreatitis.The value of serum pancreatic iso-amylase (Pi) measurements in the clinica diagnosis of pancreatitiss was assessed using a wheat inhibitor kit (Phadebas) and cellulose acetate membrane (CAM) electrophoresis. Wheat inhibition totally suppressed Pi activity in the sera of 3 healthy subjects with substantial Pi bands on electrophoresis. Reference intervals for Pi, salivary iso-amylase (Si) and total alpha-amylase were established from the sera of 61 healthy subjects using CAM electrophoresis. Sera from 47 patients were assayed. Twenty-three had proven acute pancreatitis (AP) and 24 had established chronic pancreatitis (CP). All patients with AP had elevated serum Pi levels. Fifteen of these patients had a low P3 index, which ranged between 55.8% and 82.6% with a mean of 67.1%. An index of less than 100% indicates the presence of P3 isoamylase. P3 iso-amylase only occurred in patients with AP. Thirteen of these 15 patients did not have Si in their serum. In 20 of 24 patients with CP, serum Pi was reduced and in 4 it was at the lower limit of the reference interval. Ten of these patients had raised Si levels. In 13 of these patients the total amylase level was normal; in 4 it was increased and in 7 it was reduced. It is concluded that raised Pi and the P3 index are useful in the diagnosis and monitoring of AP; reduced Pi is highly suggestive of CP, and the use of total alpha-amylase levels alone can be misleading.[Comparative studies with a rapid lipase test and quantitative determination of serum lipase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Specificity of increased renal clearance of amylase in diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.[On possibilities and limitations of the diagnosis of acute and chronic pancreas diseases on the basis of diastase, lipase and trypsin determinations].Association of acute pancreatitis or high level of serum pancreatic enzymes in patients with acute spinal cord injury: a prospective study.[Usefulness of determining alpha-amylase thermolability in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].The role of serum isoamylase and lipase determinations in clinical practice.To determine the clinical utility of routine determination of serum isoamylase (pancreatic/salivary) and/or lipase activity, sera were tested from 109 consecutive patients with elevated total serum amylase. Without knowledge of the isoamylase and lipase results, an assessment was made of the confidence with which the attending medical staff had made or excluded a diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. The attending staff had considered acute pancreatitis to be probable in 78, possible in 12 and unlikely in 19 patients. The confidence of the clinical diagnosis of acute pancreatitis was directly related to the degree of elevation of the serum total amylase: (mean IU/l +/- s.e.m.) probable pancreatitis 1807 +/- 313, possible pancreatitis 680 +/- 74, pancreatitis unlikely 493 +/- 50. Pancreatic isoamylase was elevated in 97% of patients with probable pancreatitis, 92% with possible pancreatitis and 68% in whom pancreatitis had been considered unlikely. Lipase elevations generally parallelled these results. Although gall-stones were usually sought among patients with probable pancreatitis, they were rarely sought in patients in the other categories. In conclusion, amylase isoenzyme or lipase determinations add little information in cases of clinically suspected acute pancreatitis with marked hyperamylasemia. The tests may have a role in the evaluation of patients with clinically unexplained hyperamylasemia by defining more precisely the origin of the amylase.The early identification of patients with gallstone associated pancreatitis using clinical and biochemical factors only.Early differentiation of gallstone from nongallstone associated acute pancreatitis by imaging methods is often difficult. Timing of surgery in gallstone pancreatitis is controversial, but early surgery requires early demonstration of gallstones. This study assesses the value of easily available clinical and laboratory data in establishing gallstones as the etiology of pancreatitis. In 405 consecutive episodes of acute pancreatitis, data were collected prospectively on 14 clinical and laboratory variables. Gallstones caused 177 episodes and alcohol 135, 93 were due to other or unknown causes. Age, sex, and within 48 hours of admission, serum alkaline phosphatase, aminotransferases, amylase, and bilirubin were all significantly different (all p less than 0.001, chi square) in gallstone and alcohol groups. Multivariate analysis based on five of these variables enabled correct prediction of the presence or absence of gallstones in 50 of a further 56 episodes. This method may help in planning early interventional treatment of gallstone associated acute pancreatitis.[Clinico-biological correlations of the amylase/creatinine clearance quotients in acute pancreatitis].[Diagnosis of acute and chronic pancreatitis].Carboxyl ester lipase in human tissues and in acute pancreatitis.Carboxyl ester lipase was purified from human pancreatic juice. Antisera were raised in rabbits and the monospecificity of the antibody was verified by immunoblotting. The enzyme was present in zymogen granules of acinar cells, in occasional duct cells, and in secretory material in normal pancreas in immunohistochemistry. Also, occasional cells in the epithelium of small intestinal villi but not the granules of Paneth cells, were stained. Decreased and evenly dispersed staining was observed in necrotic acinar cells in acute pancreatitis, whereas the reaction was intensive in plugs in acinar lumina. Interstitial staining was seen around necrotic pancreatic lobules and in areas of fat necrosis. This staining pattern is similar to that obtained with antisera against other lipolytic pancreatic proteins, but differed from that with antisera against trypsin and pancreatic secretory trypsin inhibitor. We conclude that carboxyl ester lipase behaves similarly to the other lipolytic enzymes during acute pancreatitis and that interstitial localization of secretory lipolytic enzymes is characteristic of the necrotizing inflammatory process in pancreas.Increased serum trypsinogen 2 and trypsin 2-alpha 1 antitrypsin complex values identify endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography induced pancreatitis with high accuracy.To evaluate the clinical utility of two new tests for serum trypsinogen 2 and trypsin 2-alpha 1 antitrypsin complex (trypsin 2-AAT) in diagnosing and assessing the severity of acute pancreatitis (AP) induced by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Three hundred and eight consecutive patients undergoing ERCP at Helsinki University Central Hospital in 1994 and 1995.Patients were followed prospectively for pancreatitis and clinical outcome. They were tested for serum trypsinogen 2, trypsin 2-AAT, and amylase in samples obtained before and one, six, and 24 hours after ERCP.Pancreatitis developed in 31 patients (10%). Their median serum trypsinogen 2 increased 26-fold to 1401 micrograms/l at six hours after the procedure and trypsin 2-AAT showed an 11-fold increase to 88 micrograms/l at 24 hours. The increase in both markers was stronger in severe than in mild pancreatitis, and in patients without pancreatitis there was no significant increase. Baseline trypsinogen 2 and trypsin 2-AAT concentrations were elevated in 29% and 32% of patients, respectively. The diagnostic accuracy of a threefold elevation over the baseline value was therefore analysed. The sensitivity and specificity of these parameters in the diagnosis of post-ERCP pancreatitis was 93% and 91%, respectively, for serum trypsinogen 2 at six hours after the examination, and 93% and 90%, for trypsin 2-AAT at 24 hours.Serum trypsinogen 2 and trypsin 2-AAT reflect pancreatic injury after ERCP. High concentrations are associated with severe pancreatic damage. The delayed increase in trypsin 2-AAT compared with trypsinogen 2 appears to reflect the pathophysiology of AP. A greater than threefold increase in trypsinogen 2 six hours after ERCP is an accurate indicator of pancreatitis.[Hyperamylasemia: it is not always acute pancreatitis].[Clinical usefulness of the determination of the lipase/elastase ratio and of the polymorphonuclear elastase in the hospital admission of the patient with acute pancreatitis].The clinical usefulness of the determination of polymorphonuclear elastase in serum, in patients with acute pancreatitis as a predictive value of severity.A prospective study was made of 60 patients who at admission in the hospital showed high rates not only of lipase but also of polymorphonuclear elastase. High rates of this enzyme have been statistically related with the severity of pancreatitis. This severity is expressed by multifactorial Glasgow prognostic factors and by Ranson's CT degree. The predictive value in the evolution of the disease has been related to the need for surgery and related to the number of hospitalization days in non-operated patients. All these factors have been analysed taking into account such variables as age, sex, and biliary origin of the acute pancreatitis.Our study shows no statistically significant correlation between high polymorphonuclear (pmn) elastase serum levels in patients with acute pancreatitis (AP) and their evolution (as evaluated by means of clinical signs and CT images). In other words, determination of high pmn elastase serum levels has no predictive value to indicate the degree of severity in AP. Finally, we have found no clinical use in the lipase/ amylase ratio, neither as a predictive value in the evolution of our AP patients nor as a diagnostic tool to aid in the distinction among AP of biliary origin and AP due to other causes.The severity of acute pancreatitis must be evaluated according to clinical parameters and CAT scan imaging.Acute pancreatitis with hyperlipemia: the incidence of lipid abnormalities in acute pancreatitis.High, not low, amylase and lipase levels indicate severe acute pancreatitis!Serum amylase, lipase and C-reactive protein (CRP) levels upon and CRP again within 72 hours after admission were estimated in 115 consecutive patients with acute pancreatitis and correlated with contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) results performed within 72 hours after admission and scored for morphological changes and necroses. Serum enzyme levels > or = 3 times the upper limit of normal and CRP levels > or = 10 times on admission and maximal CRP levels > or = 10 times within 72 hours after admission significantly correlated with severe pancreatic morphological changes. Thus, contrary to previous belief, high, not low, enzyme levels indicate severe acute pancreatitis. Furthermore, maximal CRP levels > or = 10 times the upper limit of normal within 72 hours in all patients and amylase admission levels of > or = 3 times the upper limit of normal in alcoholics were significantly indicative of pancreatic necroses. Thus, serum enzyme estimation upon, and maximal CRP levels within 72 hours after, admission may help the clinician to evaluate the severity of acute pancreatitis when imaging procedures are not immediately available.[Alpha-amylase determination in acute pancreatitis: selection of a reference standard].It has been investigated which of the amylase determinations agrees most closely with the clinical diagnosis in a group of patients with acute pancreatitis and in a group with other diseases producing amylase elevation. By measuring the amylase in a urine specimen related to its creatinine concentration fewer values within the range of reference in patients with pancreatitis and also fewer falsely elevated values in the second group were observed when compared to amylase in plasma, urinary amylase activity per volume or the amylase/creatinine clearance ratio.[The dextrination method of determining amylase activity in the urine of healthy persons and patients with acute pancreatitis].[Value of simultaneous determinations of alpha-amylase and pancreatic lipase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[Macroamylasemia in the differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].The presence of macroamylasemia should be considered in the differential diagnosis of hyperamylasemia associated with acute abdominal pain, with suspect of pancreatitis. This uncommon and poorly known abnormality is defined as a blinding of serum amylase to certain proteins forming a circulating macrocomplex which prevents renal clearance of serum amylase. Two clinical cases as well as a review of this rare entity are here reported.Simultaneous serum assays of lipase and interleukin-6 for early diagnosis and prognosis of acute pancreatitis.There are no systems for the rapid diagnosis and prognosis of acute pancreatitis in the Emergency Department. Our aim was to evaluate whether the combined use of serum lipase and interleukin-6 or serum lipase and C-reactive protein is able to simultaneously establish both the diagnosis and the prognosis of acute pancreatitis.Eighty patients with acute abdomen were studied on admission to the Emergency Room. Forty patients had nonpancreatic acute abdomen, and 40 had acute pancreatitis (25 had mild acute pancreatitis and 15 had severe pancreatitis). Forty healthy subjects comparable for sex and age were also studied as controls. Lipase, interleukin-6, and C-reactive protein were determined on serum in all subjects.Using lipase to discriminate between patients with nonpancreatic acute abdomen and patients with acute pancreatitis (cutoff values ranging from 419 to 520 U/L), one patient with acute pancreatitis was not identified correctly. To discriminate between patients with severe acute pancreatitis and those with mild pancreatitis in the remaining 39 patients, interleukin-6 (cutoff value, <3.7 microgram/L) had a sensitivity of 100% (15 of 15) and a specificity of 83% (20 of 24); 75 of 80 (94%) patients were classified correctly. C-reactive protein (cutoff values ranging from 6 to 7 mg/L) showed a lower prognostic efficiency than interleukin-6: sensitivity of 87% (13 of 15) and specificity of 46% (11 of 24). Sixty-four of 80 patients (80%) were classified correctly. The area under the ROC curve for interleukin-6 (0.911 +/- 0.049) was significantly (P = 0.013) greater than that for C-reactive protein (0.685 +/- 0.090).The combined use of serum lipase and interleukin-6 is useful in simultaneously establishing both the diagnosis and the prognosis of acute pancreatitis.A cause of misleading serum amylase concentrations in acute pancreatitis.The operative discovery of acute pancreatitis associated with gross hyperlipidaemia but a normal or high elevated serum amylase concentration has been described. We report a case of acute pancreatitis in which serial dilutions of serum resulted in a 338% rise in the serum amylase concentrations. The importance of appreciating this effect of hyperlipidaemia on the serum level measurements in patients with acute pancreatitis is re-emphasised.[The clinical utility of the quotient of lipase-amylase and polymorphonuclear elastase in acute pancreatitis].Is the association of serum lipase with beta2-microglobulin or C-reactive protein useful for establishing the diagnosis and prognosis of patients with acute pancreatitis?In the Emergency Department it is mandatory to establish the diagnosis and the prognosis of acute pancreatitis as soon as possible. To evaluate whether the association of serum lipase either with serum beta2-microglobulin or with C-reactive protein allows simultaneously to establish the diagnosis and the prognosis of acute pancreatitis, 96 patients with acute abdomen were studied. Fifty-eight patients had non-pancreatic acute abdomen and the remaining 38 had acute pancreatitis: 23 mild acute pancreatitis, and 15 severe acute pancreatitis. Forty healthy subjects were studied as controls. Lipase, beta2-microglobulin and C-reactive protein were determined in the serum of all subjects, using commercial kits. One patient with acute pancreatitis was not correctly classified when lipase was used to discriminate between patients with non-pancreatic acute abdomen and those with acute pancreatitis. For the discrimination of patients with severe acute pancreatitis from those with the mild form of the disease in the remaining 37 acute pancreatitis patients, beta2-microglobulin had a sensitivity of 53.3 %, specificity of 81.8%, and prognostic accuracy of 70.3 % (27 of the 37 patients correctly classified); 87.5 % of the 96 cases were correctly classified. C-reactive protein showed a lower prognostic accuracy than beta2-microglobulin: sensitivity 86.7%, specificity 45.5%, accuracy 62.2 %; 84.4 % of the cases were correctly classified. Using the polychotomous logistic regression analysis we found the same accuracy in discriminating between patients with acute pancreatitis and those with non-pancreatic acute abdomen (99.0%) but a lower accuracy (54.1%) between patients with severe acute pancreatitis and those with the mild form of the disease. Our study shows that the association of serum lipase with beta2-microglobulin or with C-reactive protein is not useful in simultaneously establishing the diagnosis and prognosis of acute pancreatitis.Diagnostic value of measuring pancreatic isoamylase with a double-monoclonal antibody immunoassay in serum of hospitalized hyperamylasemic patients.We evaluated the diagnostic utility of measuring pancreatic isoamylase (P-AMY) with a double-monoclonal antibody technique in a population of 43 consecutive hospitalized hyperamylasemic patients in comparison with serum pancreatic lipase (LPS) activity. In 27 cases (62.8%), the final diagnosis was acute pancreatitis. Predictive values were calculated for P-AMY and LPS activities, and a P-AMY percentage was calculated for selected decision levels. The maximal diagnostic efficiency was 0.930, 0.814, and 0.767 for LPS, P-AMY activity, and P-AMY percentage, respectively, indicating that serum LPS measurement was clinically superior to P-AMY for distinguishing patients with or without pancreatitis. Measurement of both P-AMY activity and percentage in serum did not significantly improve diagnostic accuracy.Amylase isoenzymes in the acute abdomen: an adjunct in those patients with elevated total amylase.The role of routine isoamylase determinations in differentiating acute pancreatitis from other causes of an acute abdomen with hyperamylasemia and/or hyperamylasuria was evaluated. Values were analyzed from a control group of 21 patients with acute pancreatitis (group I) and from 100 consecutive patients diagnosed in our emergency department as having an acute abdomen (group II). In group I, 100% of patients had hyperamylasemia, hyperamylasuria, and a P isoamylase fraction greater than 0.75 of the total amylase value. In group II, 50% of patients had hyperamylasemia and/or hyperamylasuria. Of these patients, 44% had a P isoamylase fraction less than 0.75 of the total amylase value, a finding apparently incompatible with a diagnosis of acute pancreatitis as identified by our control group. We conclude that routine isoamylase determinations in patients with an acute abdomen and hyperamylasemia and/or hyperamylasuria allows the differentiation from acute pancreatitis in 44% of cases.[Increased lipase levels].[The diagnostic value of determining the amylase content in blood in acute pancreatitis].Diagnosis and management of acute pancreatitis.Specificity of serum amylase and amylase creatinine clearance ratio in the diagnosis of acute and chronic pancreatitis.In 31 patients with pancreatitis, the amylase to creatinine clearance ratio (CACR) was significantly greater than for controls (10.7 +/- 1.7 vs. 2.6 +/- 0.3, P less than .001). Sixteen pancreatitis patients with serum amylase (SAm) within the normal range had a mean CACR significantly greater than that of 19 hospital control patients with normal SAm (9.2 +/- 1.5 vs. 3.0 +/- 0.4, P less than .001). For control patients a highly significant inverse correlation between SAm and CACR was observed. No relationship was detected between these parameters for pancreatitis patients. The results suggest that the CACR may be of aid in establishing the diagnosis of pancreatitis even in patients without hyperamylasemia.Comparison of urine trypsinogen-2 test strip with serum lipase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.The accuracy of a new rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip (actim Pancreatitis) was compared with that of serum lipase for detection of acute pancreatitis in patients with acute abdominal pain.A prospective study was conducted which consisted of 237 consecutive patients with acute abdominal pain admitted to the emergency unit at Helsinki University Central Hospital. The patients were tested on admission with the actim Pancreatitis test strip. Serum amylase, serum lipase, and urine trypsinogen-2 concentrations were also determined quantitatively.The actim Pancreatitis test strip result was positive in 27 out of 29 patients with acute pancreatitis (sensitivity 93%) and in 16 of 208 patients with non-pancreatic abdominal pain (specificity 92%). This was superior to that of serum lipase (sensitivity 79% and specificity 88%). With a cut-off > 3x the upper reference limit, the sensitivity of serum lipase was only 55% while the specificity was 99%. The high sensitivity for the actim Pancreatitis test strip resulted in a very high negative predictive value of 99%. All six patients with severe acute pancreatitis were detected by the dipstick. With a higher cut-off value (> 3x upper reference limit) for lipase, two patients with severe acute pancreatitis remained undetected. Combining the actim Pancreatitis dipstick with serum lipase a positive predictive value of 94% was obtained.Acute pancreatitis can be excluded with a higher probability with the actim Pancreatitis strip than with serum lipase determination, and therefore appears to be more suitable for screening of acute pancreatitis. With its high specificity with a cut-off > 3x the upper reference limit, serum lipase is suitable as a confirmatory test for pancreatitis when a positive dipstick result is obtained.[Value of the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[Validity of serum amylase and lipase in the differential diagnosis between acute/acutized chronic pancreatitis and other causes of acute abdominal pain].Raised serum amylase and lipase levels are observed in several abdominal diseases.Assessing the validity of serum amylase and lipase for the differential diagnosis between acute pancreatitis/acutized chronic pancreatitis, biliary tract disease, perforated gastroduodenal ulcer and acute appendicitis. PATIENTS E METHODS: Prospective study including 134 individuals: 38 with acute pancreatitis/acutized chronic pancreatitis, 35 with biliary tract disease, 17 with perforated gastroduodenal ulcer and 44 with acute appendicitis, mean age (standard deviation) of 42.4 +/- 17.7, 46.7 +/- 18.3, 47.8 +/- 12 and 33.7 +/- 17.8 years, respectively. Serum amylase and lipase were determined at admission to the emergency department.For the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis/acutized chronic pancreatitis, when the cutt-off levels of serum amylase were set at the upper normal range level or up to 5-fold as high, the sensitivity decreased from 92% to 74%, the specificity increased from 85% to 99%, the positive predictive value increased from 71% to 97%, and the negative predictive value decreased from 96% to 91%. For serum lipase levels similar figures were obtained for sensitivity and negative predictive value, but the specificity and positive predictive value were lower. When the combination of raised serum amylase or lipase were analyzed, a minor increase was observed in sensitivity and negative predictive value.For the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis/acutized chronic pancreatitis: 1) the best cut-off level for both tests was 2-times the upper normal range; 2) the sensitivities of serum amylase and lipase were similar; 3) the specificity and positive predictive value of serum amylase were slightly higher than observed for serum lipase; 4) the sensitivity but not the specificity increased when at least one between amylase or lipase was raised.[Differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and myocardial infarct].Serum amylase measured four hours after endoscopic sphincterotomy is a reliable predictor of postprocedure pancreatitis.Acute pancreatitis is a common complication after endoscopic sphincterotomy (ES) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). The aim of this study was to detect the time when the peak of serum amylase was predictive for pancreatitis or severe hyperamylasemia, to plan a prolonged follow-up in the hospital and for outpatients.In a prospective series of 409 consecutive patients undergoing ES, serum amylase activity was measured immediately before the procedure and 2, 4, 8, and 24 h thereafter; the data obtained at 2, 4, and 8 h were compared with those at 24 h and with the outcome. Sensitivity for long-lasting severe hyperamylasemia (more than five times the upper normal limit) and pancreatitis were also defined for all sampling times.At 24 h after ES, amylase was still more than five times the upper normal limit in 26 patients, 19 of whom had mild/moderate acute pancreatitis. There was a significant difference (p < 0.01 at all sampling times) between the 26 patients with 24-h severe hyperamylasemia and those with lower levels. The sensitivity of amylase measurement in detecting pancreatitis or long-lasting severe hyperamylasemia was highest at 8 h. However, the 4-h assessment appears to be a reliable predictor in practice, as more than two-thirds of cases of pancreatitis (all but one with computed tomography-confirmed pancreatitis) occurred among patients whose 4-h amylasemia was higher than five times the upper normal limit.Serum amylase assessment 4 h after ES minimizes the likelihood of underestimating the risk of postprocedure pancreatitis. It is therefore a reliable, cost-effective follow-up, particularly in outpatients.[Experiences with the determination in the serum for the diagnosis of acute and chronic pancreatic diseases].Towards evidence based emergency medicine: best BETs from the Manchester Royal Infirmary. Urinary trypsinogen to rule out acute pancreatitis in patients with abdominal pain.Evaluation of prognostic factors in patients with acute pancreatitis.The severity of acute pancreatitis is variable and does not always correlate with structural and functional changes in the pancreas. More precise predictors of severity are necessary to enable intensive therapy to be targeted at patients with severe attacks, and to judge efficacy of treatment, to help in the early detection of complications, and to facilitate comparison of patients from different centers.On admission, clinical criteria, biochemical and hematological parameters and multiple prognostic scores (Ranson, Imrie and APACHE-II scores) were collected from patients with acute pancreatitis.Two hundred and twenty-seven patients were seen during the study period. The overall mortality rate was 11.4%. A significantly higher mortality was found in patients with severe pancreatitis (25.8%) than in those with mild disease (1.5%, p=0.00001). Mortality was related to the presence of fever at admission (16.5% vs. 5.0%, p=0.006), and not to age, sex, etiological associations, or concomitant medical or surgical diseases. Of the biochemical and hematological parameters tested, ten factors (plasma glucose, BUN, serum creatinine, serum calcium, serum lactate dehydrogenase, serum albumin, red cell count, white cell count, hematocrit, and lymphocytes count) were found to be statistically significant, and four factors (serum potassium, alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, and hemoglobin) were marginally significant. In high-risk patients (Ranson and Imrie scores > or = 3, APACHE-II score > or = 10) mortality rates were higher (22.5%, 23.0%, and 22.5%, respectively) than in low-risk patients (2.4%, 2.3%, and 0.8%, respectively, p=0.00001). APACHE-II scores may be especially useful for monitoring the progress of patients with pancreatic necrosis and secondary pancreatic necrosis.Acute pancreatitis still represents a condition of variable severity. The adoption of multiparametric criteria proposed together with morphological evaluation consents the formulation of a discreetly reliable prognosis on the evolution of the disease a few days from onset, even though this still appears insufficient to plan a varied and timely therapeutic program.Comparative study of serum pancreatic isoamylase, lipase, and trypsin-like immunoreactivity in pancreatic disease.Serum total amylase, pancreatic and salivary isoamylase, lipase and trypsin-like immunoreactivity (TLI) were measured in 16 patients with acute pancreatitis, 37 patients with chronic pancreatitis, 11 patients with pancreatic cancer, and 53 control subjects in order to evaluate the relative value of these tests in the diagnosis of pancreatic disease. In acute pancreatitis patients studied within 2 days from the onset of pain all pancreatic enzymes were abnormally high. In chronic pancreatitis patients serum pancreatic isoamylase and TLI were abnormally low in 8 out of 10 patients with severely impaired pancreatic exocrine function, while lipase was abnormally low in 6 patients. During acute exacerbations of the disease elevated levels of pancreatic isoamylase and lipase, but not of TLI, were found in about one third of cases. In patients with pancreatic cancer the pattern of changes in serum pancreatic enzymes was variable since levels within, below and above the normal range were found. The results demonstrate that in acute pancreatitis all serum pancreatic enzymes had the same diagnostic sensitivity, however serum lipase determination is the most convenient because of its simplicity and low cost. In chronic pancreatitis serum pancreatic isoamylase and TLI may be useful in detecting severe pancreatic insufficiency. In pancreatic cancer serum pancreatic enzymes lack diagnostic specificity.[Pancreatitis in infants with a clinical diagnosis of septicemia].Considering the possibility that during septicemic processes, pancreatitis could develop, 10 infants were studied when the clinical diagnosis of septicemia was established. With this purpose, the clinical manifestations present in the patients were recorded and the activities of serum amilase and lipase were determined at 24 hour intervals during the first three days and these studies were repeated on the 5th and 7th days. The results showed an abnormally high serum lipase activity, especially in 6 of the 10 infants. The amilase was found within normal limits with a tendency to drop in certain cases. This information suggest the presence of acute pancreatitis in some of the subjects studied.Lipase/amylase ratio in pancreatitis: an etiologic index?Determination of amylase activity in serum by using a wheat germ inhibitor with the Du Pont aca.A rapid procedure for determining salivary- and pancreatic-type amylase (EC 3.2.1.1) in serum by incorporating a wheat germ inhibitor (from Triticum aestivum) was developed for the Du Pont aca IV analyzer. Under optimal assay conditions, activities of salivary and pancreatic amylase were inhibited by 93% and 19%, respectively. The 95% central reference interval for the percentage of inhibition of serum amylase was 38-84%. Patients with acute pancreatitis showed less than 26% inhibition of amylase after addition of the wheat germ extract, reflecting the prevalence of pancreatic-type amylase in this disorder.Urine trypsinogen-2 as marker of acute pancreatitis.We examined the clinical utility of urine trypsinogen-2 as a marker of acute pancreatitis (AP). Fifty-nine patients with AP, 42 with acute abdominal diseases of extrapancreatic origin, and 63 without evidence of acute abdominal disease were studied. Urine trypsinogen-2 was determined by a time-resolved immunofluorometric assay. As reference methods we used serum trypsinogen-2, urine amylase, and serum amylase. The diagnostic accuracy of the markers was evaluated by receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) analysis. At admission, urine trypsinogen-2 differentiated patients with AP from controls with high accuracy. The area under the ROC curve (AUC) was 0.978, which was equal to that of serum trypsinogen-2 (0.998) and serum amylase (0.969) and significantly larger than that of urine amylase. For differentiation between severe and mild AP, urine trypsinogen-2 (0.730) was equal to serum trypsinogen-2 (0.721), and clearly better than amylase in serum and urine. These results suggest that determination of urine trypsinogen-2 is a useful test to detect AP and to evaluate disease severity.Plasma lipase properties as related to pancreatic condition.We examined the sensitivity to colipase of two types of lipase (EC 3.1.1.3) activity in plasma. Results were very similar for plasma lipase corresponding to that found in cases of acute pancreatitis and for swine pancreas lipase, whereas we found some differences between "pancreatitis lipase" and lipase from healthy subjects. Gel-filtration experiments suggest that the two forms of lipase in plasma have different relative molecular masses; moreover, their avidity for antibodies against human pancreatic lipase differs. Guided by these studies, we propose optimal conditions for nephelometry of "pancreatitis" lipase.[Validity and limits of the relation between amylase and creatinine clearance in the diagnosis of acute postoperative pancreatitis].Diagnosis of acute pancreatitis: a proposed sequence of biochemical investigations.In 60 controls and 108 patients admitted with acute abdominal pain, Rapignost urinary amylase correctly identified (++) 18 of the 23 patients with acute pancreatitis (AP), with 8 results being equivocal (+), and 1 false negative. This is a suitable screening test for AP, but an equivocal result requires further investigation. In 14 patients with AP the serum amylase was over 1000 U/l with no false-positive results, whereas when 316 U/l was used as the diagnostic threshold, 22 cases were identified (but with 2 false positives). Serum lipase was 100% sensitive in the diagnosis of AP, but there were three false-positive results.[Amylase/creatinine clearance in the differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].In the Department of Gastroenterology of "El Centro Mdico La Raza, I.M.S.S.", three groups of 20 patients were studied: group I with acute pancreatitis; group II with acute abdomen without pancreatic pathology, in both groups the diagnosis was demonstrated surgically or in necropsy; group III was formed by 20 normal voluntary persons, and served as control. A 4 per cent amilase/creatinine clearence index was considered as a high normal value. The diagnosis accuracy in group I was 90 per cent. In group II there was five false positive results, in 80 per cent of the cases the results of the amilase/creatinine clearence index was found within normal limits. The difference between group I and group III was significant (P less than 0.002). The difference between group I and group II was also significant (P less than 0.05). There was no significant difference between group II and group III. The amilase/creatinine clearence index has the advantage that it can be obtained with only one blood and urine samples taken simultaneously. We concluded that amilase/creatine clearence index is useful for the differential diagnosis in acute pancreatitis and that is probably due to an alteration in the tubular renal reabsorption.Measurement of urinary trypsinogen-2 as a screening test for acute pancreatitis.Incidence of elevated serum amylase levels and pancreatitis after upper abdominal surgery.[Acute pancreatitis. Etiology, diagnosis, prognosis].Evaluation of a rapid urine amylase test using post-ERCP hyperamylasemia as a model.The initial diagnosis of acute pancreatitis is often based on clinical criteria together with elevations of serum amylase and lipase. A reliable bedside urine test could facilitate the early diagnosis of pancreatitis. We evaluated a rapid urine amylase test (Rapignost) by using post-ERCP hyperamylasemia as a human model of acute development of hyperamylasemia suggestive of pancreatitis.Seventy-five patients undergoing ERCP were prospectively evaluated. Patients with renal insufficiency, hyperlipidemia, or hyperglycemia were excluded. Before ERCP, patients had serum amylase and lipase measured, and urine amylase tested with the Rapignost test strip. At 4 and 16-24 h post-ERCP, a serum and urine (test strip) amylase were measured again; the adequacy of urine collection was verified by measuring a 2-h creatinine clearance. Patients were clinically assessed for the development of clinical pancreatitis. The concordance of the strip result with post-ERCP hyperamylasemia was assessed.The sensitivity of the test strip for the detection of hyperamylasemia was greatest at 16-24 h post-ERCP (78%). Specificity was uniformally high (100% specificity at 16-24 h post-procedure). The test strip was positive in all cases of clinical pancreatitis. Of three cases of clinically evident ERCP-induced pancreatitis, only one was urine test strip positive by 4 h post-procedure.Using post-ERCP hyperamylasemia as a model, the Rapignost rapid urine amylase test strip was only marginally sensitive but highly specific for hyperamylasemia. The urine test strip was positive in all cases of clinical pancreatitis and may be a useful bedside test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Comparison of serum amylase pancreatic isoamylase and lipase in patients with hyperamylasemia.We compared results of measurements of total serum amylase, pancreatic isoamylase, and lipase measurements in patients with hyperamylasemia. Serial measurements of these three enzyme levels in patients recovering from acute pancreatitis indicated that pancreatic isoamylase and lipase were elevated above normal to a greater extent and remained elevated much longer than did the total amylase. This finding indicates an appreciable sensitivity advantage of the pancreatic isoamylase and lipase over total amylase measurement during the recovery phase of pancreatitis. Comparison of pancreatic isoamylase and lipase levels in selected sera indicated a good correlation (r = 0.84) between these two measurements in patients who did not have macroamylasemia. Lipase was normal in sera with amylase elevations due solely to salivary isoamylase. Thus, in nonmacroamylsemic sera, pancreatic isoamylase and lipase appear to be roughly interchangeable markers of the level of pancreatic enzymes in the blood. An advantage of the lipase assay is that this enzyme is normal in hyperamylasemia caused by macroamylasemia, whereas the inhibitor assay indicates that the pancreatic isoamylase is elevated. Development of automated assays for either pancreatic isoamylase or lipase should lead to the routine use of one of these assays in place of the present reliance on total amylase measurements in the diagnosis of pancreatitis.Lipase turbidimetric assay and acute pancreatitis.The simplified turbidimetric assay for lipase activity was used for the differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. Serum lipase levels were found to be increased in a group of 17 patients in whom acute pancreatitis was clinically suspected and confirmed by a high ACCR and decreased uptake of the radionuclide in the pancreas scan. The lipase levels were within normal limits in a control group of 14 patients suffering from diseases other than acute pancreatitis. The turbidimetric test was helpful for rapid quantitative determination of serum lipase and thus for the early and accurate diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Studies on serum amylase in normal man and in acute pancreatitis.Amylase isoenzymes in serum, urine, saliva, jejunal juice, and pancreatic tissue were separated by isoelectric focusing. Isoamylase patterns obtained indicated that the majority of amylase activity in normal serum is of salivary gland origin. Pancreatic amylase is characteristically predominant in acute pancreatitis. The increased renal clearance of amylase in acute pancreatitis may be partly due to the increased proportion of the smaller molecular weight pancreatic amylase. However, a demonstrated increase in the renal clearance of salivary amylase in acute pancreatitis suggests a renal cause also. Autopsy pancreas samples devoid of TAME (p-tosyl arginine methyl ester) esterase activity (e.g. trypsin and plasma enzymes such as thrombin and plasmin) had isoenzyme patterns different to those samples with free proteolytic activity. Incubation of TAME esterase free pancreas with trypsin caused conversion of the former isoamylase pattern to one with the predominant isoenzymes focusing coincident with the predominant peak in serum from acute pancreatitis, jejunal aspirate, and TAME esterase positive autopsy pancreas. Such conversion suggests that pancreatic amylase is synthesized in a form different from that found in the intestinal lumen and serum.Serum pancreas-specific protein in acute pancreatitis. Its clinical utility in comparison with serum amylase.To compare the clinical utility of serum pancreas-specific protein and serum amylase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, the study was conducted in 134 normal subjects and 70 patients (36 with acute pancreatitis and 34 with other acute abdominal diseases as control group). The serum level of pancreas-specific protein in 134 healthy adults was 29.6 +/- 1.6 micrograms/l, with 95% within 7.3-67.2 micrograms/l. The upper reference limit was set at 70 micrograms/l. Serum levels of pancreas-specific protein and amylase within 12 h of arrival were significantly higher in patients with acute pancreatitis than in the control group (647.3 +/- 79.3 versus 33.8 +/- 4.8 micrograms/l (p < 0.0001) and 2536 +/- 344 versus 175 +/- 35 IU/l (p < 0.0001)). No significant difference in the levels of pancreas-specific protein was noted between biliary and alcoholic pancreatitis or between severe and mild attacks. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of diagnosing acute pancreatitis were 100%, 94.1%, and 97.1% with serum pancreas-specific protein > 70 micrograms/l and 97.2%, 91.2%, and 94.3% with serum amylase > 360 IU/l. The result demonstrated that pancreas-specific protein may be a good serum marker in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.The lipase to amylase ratio in acute pancreatitis.The ratio of serum lipase to serum amylase has been proposed to distinguish acute episodes of alcoholic from nonalcoholic pancreatitis. We evaluated the efficacy of this test in a community hospital setting.Charts of all patients discharged with a diagnosis of acute pancreatitis over 19 months were retrospectively reviewed. Patients were excluded if their creatinine was greater than 3.0 mg/dl, if the amylase and lipase were not measured within 72 h of the onset of symptoms, or if the cause of pancreatitis was not known by the time of discharge.Of the 56 patients, 31 had alcoholic pancreatitis. The lipase to amylase ratio did not differ significantly between patients with alcoholic and nonalcoholic pancreatitis. Median amylase and lipase were significantly higher in nonalcoholic pancreatitis; however, the wide ranges of both meant that neither amylase nor lipase accurately determined the cause of pancreatitis.The lipase to amylase ratio does not appear to be sufficiently sensitive or specific to distinguish alcoholic from nonalcoholic acute pancreatitis.Proceedings: Specificity of the renal amylase: creatinine clearance ratio in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and in detecting the incidence of pancreatitis after ERCP.Serum tests for pancreatitis in patients with abdominal pain.Though the serum total amylase test has been used for the diagnosis of pancreatitis for over 50 years, both its clinical sensitivity and specificity are far from perfect. We first present the results of serial serum total amylase, pancreatic isoamylase, lipase, and immunoreactive trypsin tests in nine patients during the week after their admission to the hospital with a diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, and then compare the serum total amylase, lipase, and immunoreactive trypsin levels in the initial serum submitted for amylase analysis from 100 patients because of the clinical suspicion of acute pancreatitis. In the former group of patients, the serum total amylase test was the least sensitive of the tests for pancreatitis after the first hospital day. In the latter group of patients, the largest discordance was found in patients with elevated serum total amylase levels, but normal lipase and immunoreactive trypsin levels. In 90% of these discordant cases, the elevation of serum total amylase was due to salivary amylase, yielding a maximum clinical specificity of only 71% for serum total amylase. Based on these data, we conclude that alternate tests deserve careful consideration as replacements for the serum total amylase test.Is serum amylase an obsolete test in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis?Point-of-care urine trypsinogen testing for the diagnosis of pancreatitis.To assess a point-of-care (POC) urine trypsinogen (UT) test for the diagnosis of pancreatitis in the emergency department (ED).This was a prospective cohort study of a convenience sample of patients presenting to the ED with abdominal pain or symptoms suggestive of pancreatitis. A 3-minute POC UT test (Actim Pancreatitis; Medix Biochemica, Kauniainen, Finland) was compared with plasma lipase and amylase measurements, imaging results when performed, and final discharge diagnoses. The criterion standard was a final discharge diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Of 191 patients included in this study, 17 patients were diagnosed with either acute or acute-on-chronic pancreatitis. The sensitivity and specificity of UT for acute pancreatitis were, respectively, 100% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 77% to 100%) and 96% (95% CI = 92% to 98%). Seven of the 17 patients with pancreatitis (41%) had diagnostic findings on CT and positive UT tests but had nondiagnostic plasma lipase and amylase levels.A POC UT screening test for pancreatitis in the ED compared favorably with plasma lipase and amylase levels. Future studies should be performed to explore whether this test in the ED setting has better clinical utility than plasma lipase or amylase.Urinary trypsinogen activation peptide as a marker of severe acute pancreatitis.Trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP) may be an early marker of severe pancreatitis. Previous studies have included all patients with organ failure in the group with severe pancreatitis, although patients with transient organ failure may have a good prognosis. The aim of this study was to determine the value of urinary TAP estimation for prediction of severity of acute pancreatitis, and to validate use of several markers of prediction of severity against a new, stringent definition of severity.Patients with acute pancreatitis were recruited within 24 h of onset of symptoms. Urine and blood samples were collected for 24 h, and Acute Physiology And Chronic Health Evaluation (APACHE) II (24 h), Ranson (48 h) and Glasgow (48 h) scores were calculated. Severe acute pancreatitis was defined by the presence of a local complication or the presence of organ failure for more than 48 h.Urinary TAP levels were significantly greater in patients with severe pancreatitis than in those with mild disease during the first 36 h of admission. The highest of three estimations of TAP in the first 24 h was as effective as APACHE II at 24 h in predicting severity. At 24 h after admission, urinary TAP was better than C-reactive protein (CRP) in predicting severity. The combination of TAP and CRP at 24 h allowed identification of high- and low-risk groups. The new definition of severity excluded 24 of 190 patients with transient organ failure; none of these patients died.Use of TAP improved early prediction of the severity of acute pancreatitis. Organ failure that resolves within 48 h does not signify a severe attack of acute pancreatitis.A comparative study of the urinary trypsinogen-2, trypsinogen activation peptide, and the computed tomography severity index as early predictors of the severity of acute pancreatitis.The aim of the study was to establish the value of urinary trypsinogen-2 in predicting the severity of acute pancreatitis (AP) and to compare it with the accuracy of the urinary trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP) and the computed tomography severity index (CTSI).The study population consisted of 187 consecutive patients with AP, of whom 38 had severe disease. The predictive values of urinary trypsinogen-2, TAP and CTSI were assessed within 24 h of the onset of symptoms.The mean values of predictive markers in the mild and severe pancreatitis groups were: urinary trypsinogen-2, 59/90 and 25/13 (p < 0.001); urinary TAP, 13.2 +/- 3.3nmol/l and 66.2 +/- 19.3 nmol/l (p < 0.001); and computed tomography severity index, 1.42 +/- 1.1 and 5.31 +/- 2.6 (p < 0.001). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and positive and negative likelihood ratios were calculated for the urinary trypsinogen-2 (65.7%, 66.4%, 33.3%, 88.4%, 1.9, and 0.51), for TAP (greater than 35 nmol/l: 63.2%, 65.8%, 32.0%, 87.5%, 1.9, and 0.58) and for CTSI (greater than 3: 47.4%, 95.3%, 69.2%, 87.7%, 9.0 and 0.55). To differentiate between severe and mild AP, urinary trypsinogen-2 (AUC 0.724) was slightly better than TAP (AUC 0.722), and they were both clearly better than CTSI (AUC 0.597) (p < 0.05). Urinary trypsinogen-2 had significantly lower cost (p < 0.001) than TAP and computed tomography.Urinary trypsinogen-2 was superior to CTSI and was as good as or even better than urinary TAP in the early prediction of severity in AP. This suggests that this simple and quick method deserves routine clinical application.[Diagnostic effectiveness of immunoreactive serum trypsinogen, pancreatic iso-amylase and lipase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatic injury in hyperamylasemic patients].Comparative value of serum and urinary amylase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Normal serum amylase in acute pancreatitis.Effectivity of qualitative urinary trypsinogen-2 measurement in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis: a randomized, clinical study.There is no any definite diagnostic test for acute pancreatitis. In the present study we investigated the value of the qualitative urinary trypsinogen-2 measurement in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis by an immuno-chromatographic dipstick test.A prospective, randomized, clinical trial was planned on 99 patients (53 male, 46 female; male/female : 1.11; age range: 16-83; mean age: 37.4). Patients were divided into two groups: 50 cases were referred to our emergency surgical unit due to abdominal pain and diagnosed with acute pancreatitis by abdominal computerized tomography (CT) (Group 1); 49 cases were referred to our emergency surgical unit due to abdominal pain and whose abdominal CTs did not show any sign of acute pancreatitis (Group 2). Qualitative urinary trypsinogen-2 measurement, abdominal CT and blood amylase values were obtained in all cases.In group 1, urinary trypsinogen-2 measurement was found positive in 28 cases out of 50 cases diagnosed with acute pancreatitis (56% sensitivity). In group 2, results were found positive in 3 out of 49 patients with abdominal pain, who lacked an acute pancreatitis diagnosis (90.9% specificity). Severe intra-abdominal inflammation was present in three cases of group 2 where we obtained false positive results which may stimulate the pancreatic exocrine secretion.Qualitative measurements of urinary trypsinogen-2 in patients with abdominal pain may be useful in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. It is an easy, inexpensive, rapid and noninvasive method.[Value of blood lipase determination in pancreatic diseases. Comparison with blood amylase assay].The comparative diagnostic value of plasma lipase and amylase levels was evaluated in 90 patients with various symptoms of pancreatic disease. Comparison with healthy subjects showed that the lipase assay was more sensitive than the amylase assay in patients with acute pancreatitis or post-traumatic pancreatic injury, but not in patients with chronic pancreatitis. On the other hand, acute pancreatitis can be detected earlier by measuring plasma amylase levels, owing to the rapid release of this enzyme. The relative importance of these two laboratory tests is discussed.Combined diagnostic value of biochemical markers in acute pancreatitis.Eighty-three patients suffering from upper abdominal pain were studied to evaluate the contribution of commonly used biochemical markers in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. On admission to hospital, serum amylase, lipase, total bilirubin, aspartate aminotransferase, alanine aminotransferase, alkaline phosphatase and gamma-glutamyl transferase activities were measured. By stepwise logistic discrimination, only two determinations appeared to be of clinical value: lipase and alkaline phosphatase activities. A classification rule was established including these two measurements and its diagnostic performance evaluated by a jackknifed method amounted .83%. ROC curves were used to assess sensitivity and specificity. Our study clearly shows that serum lipase measurements should be preferred to amylase measurements, and that our two-test classification rule provides an efficient aid in clinical decision-making.Diagnostic value of immunoreactive phospholipase A2 in acute pancreatitis.In a prospective clinical trial 85 patients with acute pancreatitis were analysed for serum total amylase, pancreatic amylase, pancreatic lipase, trypsin, elastase 1, and immunoreactive phospholipase A2 (IR-PLA2). The diagnostic sensitivity of serum IR-PLA2 was comparable to that of serum total amylase, pancreatic amylase, and trypsin. The specificity of IR-PLA2 is superior to that of serum total amylase determination due to the fact that the IR-PLA2 determination is based on an antibody against human pancreatic PLA2.Evaluation of pancreatic amylase immunoassay in acute pancreatitis.Urinary trypsinogen activation peptides (TAP) are not increased in mild ERCP-induced pancreatitis.Acute pancreatitis following endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) occurs in 3-18% of patients undergoing either diagnostic or therapeutic ERCP. We prospectively measured urinary trypsinogen activation peptides (TAP) by an automated anti-TAP enzyme-linked immunoassay among 107 patients 4 h after ERCP to determine whether this measurement helps in the early diagnosis of ERCP-induced pancreatitis. Pancreatitis was documented in 10 of 107 patients (9.3%). All episodes were graded as mild. Urinary TAP was not significantly increased. We conclude that measurement of urinary TAP 4 h after ERCP is not helpful in documenting mild ERCP-induced acute pancreatitis.[Diagnostic significance of diastasuria in acute pancreatitis].Comparison of elastase-1 with amylase, lipase, and trypsin-like immunoreactivity in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Serum elastase-1, amylase, lipase, and trypsin-like immunoreactivity were measured in a group of 17 consecutive patients with acute pancreatitis. When assayed within 24 h of the onset of symptoms, all enzymes were found to be elevated, thus showing similar sensitivity. Elastase-1 did not improve the diagnostic score of the other enzymes studied. Owing to their much quicker and less expensive determinations, amylase and lipase should be considered the best initial markers of pancreatic injury. However, during the course of pancreatitis, amylase and in a lesser degree lipase returned to normal in more cases than elastase or trypsin; both were still elevated in 90% of the patients 10 days after the onset of the symptoms. Thus, trypsin and/or elastase-1 should be reserved for cases of doubtful or delayed diagnosis. The specificity and the positive predictive value of these enzymes need to be evaluated.The diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in the presence of hyperlipaemia.The value of the amylase/creatinine clearance ratio in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Acute pancreatitis usually confronts the clinician with a difficult diagnostic task. For years, the primary laboratory diagnostic tests were the serum and urine amylase and the serum lipase determinations. Recent studies have introduced the concept of the amylase/creatinine clearance ratio as a means of increasing the specificity of the laboratory diagnosis. This paper reviews the laboratory evaluation of acute pancreatitis with emphasis on the rationale, derivation, and specificity of the amylase/creatinine clearance ratio.[Significance of lipase determination in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[Value of the amylase/creatinine ratio in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Diagnostic tests and prognostic indicators in acute pancreatitis.Differential determination of serum isoamylase using an amylase inhibitor and its clinical application.Diagnostic significance of a simple and rapid screening procedure for determining the relative amounts of pancreatic and salivary isoamylase using an amylase inhibitor was evaluated in 242 subjects (controls 84, acute pancreatitis nine, chronic pancreatitis 28, pancreatic cancer 14, peptic ulcer 25, liver cirrhosis 15, cholelithiasis 24, irritable colon syndrome 13, diabetes mellitus 13, mumps seven, and chronic renal failure 10). Electrophoretically separated isoamylases of saliva and pure pancreatic juice were all inhibited at similar degrees to the corresponding unfractionated amylases. Total amylase and pancreatic isoamylase were elevated in all nine patients with acute pancreatitis. Pancreatic isoamylase was decreased in 12 of 28 patients (43%) with chronic pancreatitis and increased in nine of 14 patients (64%) with pancreatic cancer. The mean pancreatic isoamylase activity in the patients with acute pancreatitis was significantly higher (p less than 0.01), while that of chronic pancreatitis was significantly lower (p less than 0.05) when compared with controls. The inhibition method offers simple, rapid, and specific analysis of serum isoamylase for the differential diagnosis of hyperamylasemia in cases of emergency.Serum lipase assay. A test of choice in acute pancreatitis.We evaluated the clinical accuracy of an automated turbidimetric assay for serum lipase determination in order to screen for acute pancreatic damage. Seventy patients with pancreatic and thirty with nonpancreatic digestive diseases were studied. Fifty-two healthy subjects were also studied as controls. Serum lipase concentrations were abnormally high in all patients with acute pancreatitis and in 3 (10%) in the group of 30 patients with nonpancreatic acute abdomen. In the 35 patients with chronic pancreatitis studied during clinical remission, serum lipase levels were abnormally high in 8 (23%), and abnormally low in 3 (9%). In the 9 patients with pancreatic cancer, 4 (44%) had abnormally elevated serum lipase values and 1 (11%) abnormally low. The results indicate that serum lipase determination is useful in the emergency diagnosis of acute pancreatic damage because of its high sensitivity and specificity. In patients with chronic pancreatitis and in patients with pancreatic carcinoma serum lipase determination is of limited value.Use of the urinary trypsinogen-2 dip stick test in early diagnosis of pancreatitis after endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.This study aimed to prove that the urinary trypsinogen-2 dip stick test can be used for early diagnosis of pancreatitis after endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).For this prospective, blinded, pilot study, urine samples were collected before ERCP, 1 h after ERCP, and 4 h after ERCP. The urine dipstick test was used to detect trypsinogen-2 on the basis of immunochromatography. The dipstick results were compared with those of current methods used to diagnose post-ERCP pancreatitis. Once the patient disposition was finalized, pancreatic enzymes, clinical findings, and final diagnosis were obtained from the chart and compared with the urine trypsinogen-2 test findings. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were calculated.The urine trypsinogen dip stick test was performed for 30 patients (15 men and 15 women). Post-ERCP pancreatitis was diagnosed in 5 of 29 patients by clinician assessment, serum pancreatic enzyme levels, or both. The amylase and lipase levels for post-ERCP patients with and without pancreatitis were 650 +/- 145 vs 134 +/- 26 (p = 0.023) and 1,658 +/- 594 vs 84 +/- 17 (p = 0.057), respectively. This statement proves that patients who developed post ERCP pancreatitis had significant elevation of amylase and lipase compared to patients who did not have pancreatitis. For the dip stick test, 6 of 28 patients had positive results in 1 h and 6 of 29 patients had positive results in 4 h. The sensitivity of the 1-h test was 1.0, and the specificity was 0.91. The positive predictive value (PPV) was 0.66, and the negative predictive value (NPV) was 1.0. The sensitivity of the 4-h test was 1.0, and the specificity was 0.96. The PPV was 0.8, and NPV value was 1.0.The urinary trypsinogen-2 dip stick test is useful for early diagnosis of post-ERCP pancreatitis and allows the testing physicians to begin management early in its course.[Some of criteria in the evaluation of severity and prognosis with different forms of acute pancreatitis].The aim of the research is to improve diagnosis and assessment of severity and prognosis with different forms of acute pancreatitis. In 79 patients were studied levels of leukocytes, lymphocytes, leucocyte intoxication index (LII), the content of lactate dehydrogenase (LDG), creatinephosphokinase (CPK), amylase, aspartate aminotransferase (AST, alanine aminotransferase (ALT).The level of leukocytes reflects the severity of the disease, but had no prognostic value. The level of lymphocytes, LII. LDG and lipase reflect the severity, of the disease and have prognostic value. The level of amylase, AST, ALT, CPK not always reflect the severity of the disease, but had prognostic value.The most readily available to assess the severity and prognosis in acute pancreatitis are the level of blood lymphocytes and LII. Indicators LDG. CPK, amylase, lipase, AST and ALT also reflect the course and prognosis of the disease.[Importance of the delay in the serum determination of amylase, lipase and isoamylase P3 in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Predicting the severity of acute pancreatitis by rapid measurement of trypsinogen-2 in urine.Early identification of patients at risk of developing a severe attack of acute pancreatitis (AP) is of great importance because rapid therapeutic interventions improve outcome. At a cutoff of 50 microg/L, trypsinogen-2 measured by a rapid urinary dipstick is a sensitive and specific diagnostic test in AP. The trypsinogen-2 concentration correlates with the severity of the disease, and a test with a higher cutoff might therefore be useful for prediction of disease severity.We increased the detection limit of the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip (Actim Pancreatitis) from 50 microg/L to 2000 microg/L and evaluated the prognostic value of this test. The results were compared with those obtained with serum C-reactive protein and the acute physiology and chronic health evaluation II (APACHE II) score. The study population consisted of 150 consecutive patients with AP (42 with severe disease).The sensitivity of the rapid urinary test strip (detection limit, 2000 microg/L) for prediction of severe AP, both on admission and at 24 h, was 62%; specificities were 87% and 85%, respectively, positive predictive values were 65% and 62%, and negative predictive values were 85% and 85%. C-Reactive protein had a sensitivity of only 38% on admission, but at 24 h, it was 83%; specificities were 90% and 70%, respectively, whereas positive predictive values were 59% and 52%, and NPVs were 79% and 91%, respectively. On admission the positive-likelihood ratio for the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip was 4.8, and at 24 h it was 4.2; for C-reactive protein, the values were 3.7 and 2.7, respectively.The urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick is a simple and rapid method for prediction of severe acute pancreatitis.Time period from onset of pain to hospital admission and patients' awareness in acute pancreatitis.This study aimed to explore the period between onset of pain and hospital-admission (pain-to-admission time) in patients with acute pancreatitis (AP), to investigate the prognostic value and associated factors of this time, and to ascertain the knowledge about the pancreas in these patients.An analysis of a prospective multicenter study was done, which included 188 patients with AP.Median pain-to-admission time was 27 hours (interquartile range, 6.0-72.0). Median pain-to-admission time was significantly shorter in intensive care unit (ICU) patients (10 hours) compared to non-ICU patients (36 hours) (P = 0.045). Short pain-to-admission time was associated with high pain level. Median pain level (0, no pain; 10, maximal pain) was 8.0 (interquartile range, 7.0-10.0). Older age correlated with lower pain level (r = -0.26; P = 0.002). Multiple logistic regression analysis including the admission values for serum lipase and C-reactive protein and the corresponding interactions to the pain-to-admission time showed substantial discriminative ability regarding ICU admission (concordance index, 0.706; P = 0.006). 86% (112/130) knew that they have a pancreas, 72% (81/112) of these patients knew that AP exists, and 56% (45/81) recognized that AP is potentially fatal.Knowledge about AP in hospitalized AP patients is poor. Serum lipase and C-reactive protein in dependency of the pain-to-admission time might be a suitable predictor for severity of AP.[Diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[Significance of the determination of multiple forms of urinary amylases for the diagnosis of exocrine pancreas diseases].The multiple amylases of the urine were examined in healthy persons and in patients with acute and chronic pancreatitis as well as with parotitis using the polyacryl amide gel disk electrophoresis. A separation into about 7 amylase-containing fractions was achieved which could be coordinated to the pancreatic juice and to saliva. In acute pancreatitis the pancreas amylases increased, in chronic pancreatitis, on the other hand, they decreased. In parotitis the salivary amylases increased. For diagnostic purposes the formation of quotients from certain fractions was useful. The examination of the multiple amylases of the urine according to the method mentioned leads to an improved clinico-chemical diagnostics of diseases of the exocrine pancreas and gives the possibility of their course control.Clinical evaluation of a new rapid assay for serum lipase determination.We evaluated a new continuous colorimetric method for serum lipase determination based on the use of a 1,2-diglyceride as substrate and a specific 2-monoglyceride lipase. This test was compared with a turbidimetric assay and also with serum alpha-amylase and pancreatic isoamylase determinations. We studied 32 patients with acute pancreatitis, 27 with chronic pancreatitis in acute painful relapse, 19 with pancreatic cancer, 44 with other digestive diseases, 53 with end-stage renal disease, and 102 healthy controls. The results of the new test were closely correlated with those of the turbidimetric method (r = 0.96). Sensitivity of the new method was elevated (100%): it was the same as that of the turbidimetric method, but slightly higher than that of alpha-amylase and pancreatic isoamylase determinations (93.7 and 96.9%, respectively). Specificity was 95.5%, i.e. higher than that observed using the other tests (86.4, 84.1 and 88.6% for lipase turbidimetric assay, amylase, and pancreatic isoamylase determinations, respectively). The results demonstrate that this new lipase assay is a sensitive, specific test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.[Value of the simultaneous determination of alpha-amylase and pancreatic lipase for the diagnosis of attacks of acute pancreatitis].[1-hour urinary amylase excretion in acute pancreatitis].Diagnostic assays in acute pancreatitis. A study of sensitivity and specificity.The sensitivity and specificity of five assays used to diagnose acute pancreatitis were studied: two amylase assays; one lipase; one trypsinogen; and one pancreatic isoamylase. Thirty-nine patients with acute pancreatitis were compared to 127 controls with abdominal pain. Using the upper limit of normal both amylase assays appeared sensitive but somewhat nonspecific (specificities of 88.9% and 86%, respectively). The trypsinogen and pancreatic isoamylase assays were also relatively nonspecific (specificity of 82.8% and 85.1%). Most nonspecific elevations occurred between a one- and twofold elevation of each assay. Lipase, however, maintained excellent specificity (99%) at its upper limit of normal. If the level of best cutoff is used instead (the level that best enhances sensitivity and specificity), the specificities of both amylase assays, as well as the trypsinogen and pancreatic isoamylase assays, exceed 95%. At the best cutoff level, trypsinogen maintains a qualitative advantage in sensitivity over lipase or pancreatic isoamylase (97.4% as compared to 86.5% and 84.6%).A comparison of serum trypsinogen-2 and trypsin-2-alpha1-antitrypsin complex with lipase and amylase in the diagnosis and assessment of severity in the early phase of acute pancreatitis.The aim of the study was to compare the recently introduced laboratory markers trypsinogen-2 and trypsin-2-alpha1 antitrypsin complex (trypsin-2-AAT) in serum with lipase and amylase in the diagnostic and prognostic evaluation of patients with acute pancreatitis (AP).The analytes were measured on admission in 64 consecutive patients with AP and in 30 controls with acute abdominal disease of extrapancreatic origin. Twenty-one patients had severe and 43 mild AP. As reference methods we used serum amylase and C-reactive protein.In subjects with AP, elevated trypsinogen-2 values (> or = 90 microg/L) were observed in 63 patients (98%), trypsin-2-AAT values (> or = 12 microg/L) in 64 patients (100%), lipase values (> or = 200 U/L) in 64 patients (100%), and amylase values (> or = 300 IU/L) in 62 patients (97%). The diagnostic accuracy of the markers was evaluated by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis. On admission, trypsinogen-2, trypsin-2-AAT, lipase, and amylase differentiated patients with AP from controls with high accuracy and ROC analyses showed similar areas under the ROC curves (AUC) for trypsinogen-2 (AUC 0.960), trypsin-2-AAT (0.948), lipase (AUC 0.947), and amylase (AUC 0.930). For differentiation between severe and mild AP, trypsin-2-AAT (AUC 0.805) was slightly better than trypsinogen-2 (AUC 0.792), and they were both clearly better than lipase (AUC 0.583), C-reactive protein (AUC 0.519), or amylase (AUC 0.632) (p < 0.05).All the markers studied showed high accuracy for differentiating between AP and extrapancreatic diseases. However, trypsinogen-2 and trypsin-2-AAT displayed the best accuracy for predicting a severe AP already at admission, which makes these markers superior for clinical purposes.Amylase isoenzyme clearances in normal subjects and in patients with acute pancreatitis.Renal clearances of amylase isoenzymes, expressed as percentages of creatinine clearances, were determined in 20 normal subjects and in 8 patients with acute pancreatitis. The isoenzyme assay employed thin layer isoelectric focusing, starch iodine staining, and densitometry. Normal clearance of pancreatic-like amylase (mean +/- SE: 3.00 +/- 0.40%) was greater than the clearance of salivary-like amylase (0.51 +/- 0.06%) in ea ch individual (P less than 0.001). However, the amount of pancreatic amylase in the serum was not the major determinant of amylase clearance. Normal clearance of pancreatic-like amylase was significantly (P less than 0.001) less than the clearance of total serum amylase in acute pancreatitis (6.49 +/- 1.07%). In pancreatitis the clearance of pancreatic-like amylase (7.29 +/- 1.19%) and the clearance of salivary-like amylase (4.55 +/- 1.02%) were both elevated compared to normal (P less than 0.001). These findings indicate that the increased clearance of amylase in pancreatitis results from a change in renal function rather than a change in serum amylase. Renal changes not reflected by increased serum creatinine or more than mild proteinuria may be manifestations of the systemic toxicity of acute pancreatitis.Serum amylase levels and acute pancreatitis.A comparison of currently used serum lipase and amylase procedures in the serial detection of enzyme elevations in acute pancreatitis.Twenty-eight patients having acute pancreatitis were followed during convalescence with serum amylase and lipase determinations. Starch and p-nitrophenyl-oligosaccharide substrates were used for amylase. Dimercaptotributyrate and triolein were employed for lipase. The extreme sensitivity of the lipase procedure using the tributyrate detected a persistent elevation of lipase when other parameters of measurement had returned to normal.Trypsin-alpha 1-protease inhibitor complexes in serum and clinical course of acute pancreatitis.The levels of amylase, trypsinogen, and trypsin-alpha 1-protease inhibitor complexes, both in serum and in peritoneal fluid, were correlated to the severity and clinical course in 27 attacks of acute pancreatitis. Serum levels of trypsin-alpha 1-protease inhibitor complexes on admission correlated well with the severity and clinical course of the disease, whereas serum levels of amylase and trypsinogen did not. This may be of clinical importance in differentiating severe acute pancreatitis from milder and self-limiting forms of the disease.Normal amylase levels in the presentation of acute pancreatitis.Recent literature suggests that serum amylase levels are not an appropriate screen for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis because specificity and sensitivity are poor. Evidence from several studies supports the use of lipase determinations to diagnose acute pancreatitis, and recent improvements in this assay have made it more readily available to the emergency physician. This retrospective review compares the use of serum amylase to lipase levels in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in 52 patients who presented to the emergency department, with the hospital discharge diagnosis serving as the gold standard to which the assays were compared. Serum lipase was found to be more sensitive than serum amylase (95% vs 79%); serum amylase levels decreased to normal significantly faster than lipase levels.[Diagnostic value of the determination of serum amylase and serum lipase in suspected acute onset of acute or chronic pancreatitis].In a prospective study the value of serum amylase and serum lipase determination has been analyzed in 19 patients with an acute episode of acute or chronic pancreatitis and in 19 patients with acute abdomen not due to pancreatitis. The concentration of urinary amylase and the urinary output of amylase in the spot urine as well as after a two-hour collection period have also been examined. The normal values were determined in 21 healthy volunteers and the reproducibility of the various parameters was analyzed after 1 hour and 25 hours in these volunteers. For diagnosis of an acute episode of chronic pancreatitis serum amylase was found to have good sensitivity, but a specificity inferior to that of serum lipase. By contrast, the specificity of serum lipase is excellent. Unlike determination of serum enzymes, measurement of urinary enzymes in all variations does not offer any further advantage. Except for the combination of serum amylase and serum lipase, none of the other tested combinations provides further diagnostic information. The examination of spot urine samples is not inferior to the 2-hour urine specimen. For the time being the combination of serum amylase and serum lipase determination is again recommended for diagnostic routine in patients with an acute episode of pancreatitis.Serum lipase determination in acute pancreatitis. Clinical appraisal of a new method.Radioimmunoassay of human pancreatic amylase with monoclonal antibody.A monoclonal antibody (E-21) was obtained that specifically binds to human pancreatic amylase and shows negligible cross-reaction with human salivary amylase. Using this antibody a radioimmunoassay was developed for pancreatic amylase in human serum. The assay was shown to be sensitive (detectable up to 7 mg/L), reproducible, and specific for pancreatic amylase. In normal subjects, the mean concentration of serum pancreatic amylase determined by this method was 36.3 mg/L with a 95% confidence range of 16.5 to 79.2 mg/L. A good correlation was observed between the concentrations of immunoreactive pancreatic amylase (IR-PA) and enzymatic activities in 20 serum samples (r = 0.97). The concentration of serum IR-PA was below the detectable limit in pancreatectomised patients, and was greatly increased in patients with acute pancreatitis; the latter was accompanied by parallel changes in total enzymic activity. In patients with mumps, the serum IR-PA level was within the normal range whereas the total enzymic activity was elevated.The amylase clearance/creatinine clearance ratios in acute pancreatitis.Diagnostic and prognostic utility of phospholipase A activity in patients with acute pancreatitis: comparison with amylase and lipase.We compared the diagnostic and prognostic utility of phospholipase A (PLA; EC 3.1.1.4) for acute pancreatitis with that of amylase and lipase by analysis of sera from 151 consecutive patients presenting with abdominal pain in whom assays of serum amylase and (or) lipase had been ordered. We determined the diagnostic accuracy for both the initial and the peak enzyme activities. Maximal diagnostic accuracy obtained for the initial activities of amylase, lipase, and PLA was 0.83, 0.83, and 0.76 at cutoff values of 650, 650, and 41 U/L, respectively. Use of peak enzyme activities showed maximal diagnostic accuracy of 0.85, 0.86, and 0.73 at cutoff values of 650, 1050, and 42 U/L, respectively. Receiver-operator characteristic curve analysis revealed the diagnostic performance of amylase and lipase to be similar, whereas that of PLA was almost random and not incremental. As with amylase and lipase, PLA activities in sera showed no relation to patients' survival; three patients who died after an attack of acute pancreatitis failed to demonstrate the dramatic increases in PLA activity previously described. We conclude that assessing the severity of acute pancreatitis by using enzyme activities still remains problematical. Measurements of amylase or lipase activities provide similar diagnostic discrimination when appropriate cutoff values are used and remain the methods of choice for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Plasma pancreatic lipase activity: from analytical specificity to clinical efficiency for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Using five procedures (turbidimetry with the Boehringer Mannheim kit and with a home made reagent, reflectometry with the Eastman Kodak kit, colorimetry with the Sigma kit, and UV spectrophotometry with the Wako kit), lipase activity was assayed in the same group of 60 healthy adults and in 30 patients suffering from acute pancreatitis (n = 197 samples) as well as in a purified and stabilized preparation of human pancreatic lipase. Results indicated considerable inter-assay discrepancies for the mean values of the patients' results: catalytic activity concentrations differed by a factor of up to 16 according to the measurement procedures. For each method, mean patients' results were also expressed as multiples of the upper limit of normal values. This method of presentation did not significantly improve the intra-assay agreement, with maximal relative differences as high as 13-fold. When each method was calibrated with the same material (human pancreatic lipase), the inter-assay agreement was considerably improved. The causes of inter-assay disagreement are discussed in detail, and the necessity for a validated lipase calibrator is stressed, in order to improve the efficiency of the information transmitted by clinical laboratories to clinicians. A strategy is proposed, which includes development of a reference method and reference material, and a study of inter-assay commutability of secondary calibrators for a set of methods.[Significance of immunoreactive lipase in the diagnosis of pancreatic diseases].The diagnostic value of a new enzyme immunoassay for lipase (IRL) was evaluated in controls (n = 65), in acute pancreatitis (n = 11) and in extrapancreatic hyperamylasemia (n = 15) by comparing IRL with serum amylase (TA), pancreatic isoamylase (PA) and lipase (turbidimetrically: TL). IRL and immunoreactive trypsin (IRT) of 60 patients with alcoholic chronic calcified pancreatitis were also studied and correlated with duration of disease and degree of pancreatic insufficiency (based on fecal chymotrypsin test: FCT). IRL was constantly elevated in patients with acute pancreatitis. In extrapancreatic hyperamylasemia IRL was mainly normal, in contrast to PA, which was elevated in 7 patients with macroamylasemia. In 56.7% of all patients with chronic pancreatitis, IRL was pathologically low; in association with advanced insufficiency (FCT less than 20 micrograms/g) this figure was 74%, and after duration of disease of greater than or equal to 15 years 77%. For IRT comparable results were found in 79% and 77% respectively. This new lipase test thus seems to be useful for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, the differential diagnosis of extrapancreatic hyperamylasemia and the detection and monitoring of severe chronic pancreatitis.Persistence of increased amylase and lipase concentrations in acute pancreatitis.A prospective study of serum pancreatic elastase-1 in the diagnosis and assessment of acute pancreatitis.Serum amylase gives a poor estimate of both the true incidence and the severity of acute pancreatitis (AP).We evaluated serum pancreatic elastase-1 (PE-1) prospectively in 567 patients in whom AP was suspected. In established AP, severity was assessed using the Glasgow Criteria, and C-reactive protein, amylase, and serum PE-1 were evaluated over 5 days.The sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic efficiency of serum PE-1 were 0.66, 0.85, and 0.84, respectively. The diagnostic accuracy of serum PE-1 was 0.80, and that of amylase 0.97. Serum PE-1 did not correlate with disease severity or the development of complications, but it fell more slowly than the serum amylase in the week after admission.The serum PE-1 level correlated closely with the serum amylase but conferred no benefit as a diagnostic test, nor did it provide further prognostic information.Sensitivity of the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio in acute pancreatitis.An elevated amylase-creatinine clearance ratio has been established as being highly specific for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. In the present study, the sensitivity of this test was compared to that of the serum amylase and the one-hour urinary amylase test in 29 patients with acute pancreatitis. Abnormal elevations of the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio were found less frequently than abnormal elevations of the serum and one-hour urinary amylases. Moreover, abnormal elevations of the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio showed less deviation from normal and values returned to normal sooner than those of the serum and one-hour urinary amylases. When compared to the serum amylase and the one-hour urinary amylase tests, the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio is a relatively insensitive test in patients with acute pancreatitis.[Diagnosis and treatment of acute pancreatitis].In diagnosis of acute pancreatitis of special importance is determination of the activity of transamidinase, phospholipase A, lipase, concentration of copper, calcium and triglycerides in blood serum as well as laparoscopy with biopsy and local thermometry of the pancreas. The dosage of 5-fluoruracil in the complex treatment of patients should be differentiated corresponding to the form of the disease: 3 mg/kg in the endomatous form, 5 mg/kg in the destructive form. The general lethality was 1.4%. In conservative treatment there were no lethal outcomes.[Semiquantitative lipase determination--a useful screening test for pancreatitis?].In 233 sera, taken from 112 patients and 20 healthy blood-donors, we have compared RapiTex-Lipase, a semi quantitative immunochemical latex test for the determination of the lipase, with the conventional quantitative method of determination in order to establish its diagnostical value as a screening test for acute pancreatitis. It appeared that, with a positive result of the test increased values of lipase were found in 98% of the cases, but that a negative result of the test did not exclude an increased lipase. The sensitivity of the test as to the quantitative determination of the lipase depended directly on the activity of the lipase and turned out to be acceptable at 88% only with values 4 X higher than the upper limit of the normal range. With values 5 X higher and more, it reached 100%. Even if the test, due to its very high level of discrimination, did not show a reaction in every case of unspecific extrapancreatic hyperlipasemia, its organ-specificity for the pancreas was reduced and came to 80 to 96% in patients with renal insufficiency, diseases of the liver, abuse of alcohol and in various non-pancreatic intra- or extra-abdominal affections. In 16/18 patients with acute pancreatitis the test used for screening turned out positive (sensitivity 89%), two patients with values between 2 and 4 X the upper limit of the norm had a negative test.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)[The diagnosis of postoperative acute pancreatitis].Trypsin-like immunoreactivity in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Elevated serum and urine amylase and serum lipase values are not always diagnostic of an acute pancreatitis, on the account of the extrapancreatic production of these enzymes. A diagnostic improvement can be made by using the CAm/CCr ratio, but this index too is abnormal in some non pancreatic diseases. Since trypsin measurement seems to be more specific in the evaluation of pancreatic condition, serum trypsin-like immunoreactivity has been measured in 28 patients with acute pancreatitis, 95 patients with a wide spectrum of gastroenterological diseases and in 30 patients with severe chronic renal failure. 85 normal subjects were used as controls. Abnormally high serum trypsin-like immunoreactivity (TLI) values were detected in 100% of patients with acute pancreatitis, without any overlap with normal controls. TLI values above the upper normal limit were also found in 70% of patients with severe renal damage, while none of the patients with liver disease, biliary disease, peptic ulcer an inflammatory bowel disease had elevated TLI levels. In 29 patients with hyperamylasemia due to extra-pancreatic diseases serum trypsin-like immunoreactivity was always within the normal range. It is concluded that the determination of serum TLI is a sensitive and reliable tool in the diagnosis of an acute pancreatic inflammation, providing that a severe renal failure is excluded.Hyperamylasaemia and acute pancreatitis in paracetamol poisoning.Hyperamylasaemia and even acute pancreatitis have been reported in patients with paracetamol poisoning.To describe the incidence, clinical characteristics, and prognostic implications of hyperamylasaemia in paracetamol poisoning.Six hundred and two patients transferred to a specialized unit with severe paracetamol poisoning and 212 unselected patients admitted from the local region.Retrospective study based on hospital charts. The optimum threshold of serum amylase to discriminate non-survivors was identified.An elevated serum amylase (>100 U/L) occurred in 28 of the unselected patients (13%), in 218 of the transferred patients (36%), and in 118 of 148 patients (80%) with fulminant hepatic failure. Only 33 cases of paracetamol-associated acute pancreatitis were diagnosed. A threshold serum amylase of 150 U/L to discriminate non-survivors had sensitivity 76%, specificity 85%, positive predictive value 33%, and negative predictive value 97%. In a logistic regression analysis, a serum amylase > 150 U/L was associated with an excess mortality (odds ratio 5.0, 2.6-9.7).Hyperamylasaemia is frequent in patients with paracetamol poisoning, whereas clinical acute pancreatitis occurs rarely. The incidence of hyperamylasaemia increases with the degree of hepatic dysfunction. A serum amylase exceeding 1.5 times the upper normal limit indicates a poor prognosis.Immunochemical qualitative latex agglutination test for pancreatic lipase in serum evaluated for use in diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.In 417 patients (213 men, 204 women) consecutively hospitalized with acute abdominal pain we evaluated the clinical usefulness of a latex-agglutination test at admission to screen for concentrations of pancreatic lipase (EC 3.1.1.3) in serum greater than 300 micrograms/L. The diagnoses of acute pancreatitis (in 25 patients, 6%) and other diseases were made without knowledge of the results of the latex test or of quantification of pancreatic lipase in the serum by enzyme immunoassay. In the latex assay, when agglutination was taken as a positive test for acute pancreatitis, we found a diagnostic efficiency of 0.986 (95% confidence limits: 0.971-0.997) for acute pancreatitis. The predictive value of a positive latex test result with respect to acute pancreatitis was 0.807 (0.625-0.926); the predictive value of a negative test was 1.000 (0.991-1.000). Six patients had false-positive test results. No false-negative test results were found by enzyme immunoassay. We conclude that the latex agglutination test is useful as an emergency test for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in patients with acute abdominal pain; negative results virtually exclude acute pancreatitis.Assessment of trypsinogen-2 levels as an early diagnostic for post-endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography pancreatitis.The objective of the present study was to assess the use of serum trypsinogen-2 (TRY-2) measurements in early diagnosis of pancreatitis after endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).In this prospective study, investigation 1 involved collection of blood serum both before and at 2, 4, and 18 hours after ERCP, whereas investigation 2 involved collection before and 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, and 18 hours after ERCP. Total amylase, pancreatic amylase, and TRY-2 levels were measured from serum samples, and values from patients with pancreatitis after ERCP were compared to those from healthy control patients after ERCP.In investigation 1, 8 of the 68 cases examined were diagnosed as post-ERCP pancreatitis. In the healthy group, total- and pancreatic-amylase levels peaked 4 hours after ERCP, and TRY-2 levels peaked at 2 hours after ERCP. In contrast, cases of post-ERCP pancreatitis demonstrated prolonged periods of high total-amylase, pancreatic-amylase, and TRY-2 levels. In investigation 2, none of the 23 cases was diagnosed as post-ERCP pancreatitis: Pancreatic amylase levels peaked 4 to 6 hours after ERCP and TRY-2 levels peaked 1 hour after ERCP.These results suggest that TRY-2 is a more sensitive marker than amylase, and it can be useful in early diagnosis of post-ERCP pancreatitis.[Acute pancreatitis, hyperamylasemia and carbohydrate intolerance].Detection of postoperative pancreatitis after pancreatic surgery by urine trypsinogen strip test.The urine trypsinogen strip test has been used successfully in the diagnosis of pancreatitis of various aetiologies, but has not been studied in postoperative pancreatitis. The aim of this study was to evaluate this test for the diagnosis of postoperative pancreatitis after pancreatic resection.Fifty patients undergoing pancreatic resection were included. The urine trypsinogen strip test was done daily during the first postoperative week, blood was analysed before and 4, 6 and 10 days after surgery, and amylase activity in the drainage fluid was measured on days 4 and 6. Patients underwent computed tomography (CT) before operation and on days 2 and 6 afterwards.Thirteen patients (26 per cent) developed CT-detected pancreatitis after operation. In 12 of these patients pancreatitis was detected on the second postoperative day. The urine trypsinogen test was positive in all 13 patients with postoperative pancreatitis, and was already positive on the first day after surgery in 12. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the trypsinogen strip test in detection of postoperative pancreatitis were 100, 92, 81 and 100 per cent respectively. In receiver-operator characteristic analysis the area under the curve (AUC) was higher for the urine trypsinogen strip test (AUC 0.959) than for a serum amylase level more than two (AUC 0.731) or three times (AUC 0.654) above the upper normal range in the diagnosis of postoperative pancreatitis. Patients whose recovery was complicated by pancreatic fistula, detected by drain output measurements on day 6, more often had a positive urine trypsinogen test than patients without a fistula (11 of 12 versus five of 38; P < 0.001).This study suggests that the urine trypsinogen strip test might be a valuable method for diagnosis of pancreatitis after pancreatic surgery.The amylase creatinine clearance ratio in acute pancreatitis.One hundred and twenty-two patients have been studied in order to evaluate the usefulness of the amylase creatinine clearance ratio (ACCR) as a simple diagnostic test for acute pancreatitis. Sixteen out of 17 patients with acute pancreatitis had significant elevations in ACCR; in only 10 of these 17 cases was the serum amylase greater than 1200iu/l. The mean ACCR was within the normal range in control patients, in patients with chronic gastro-intestinal disease and in patients with acute abdominal conditions excluding pancreatitis; however, the mean serum amylase was significantly greater in patients with acute abdominal conditions than in the control group (P less than 0-05). The ACCR remained significantly elevated in patients with acute pancreatitis for longer than either serum or urine amylase values. The findings of the study suggest that the amylase creatinine clearance ratio is a simple yet reliable diagnostic test which could be used when screening patients suspected of having acute pancreatitis.[Usefulness of determining amylase isoenzymes in the blood and urine in acute pancreatitis].[Determination of urinary amylase using a test strip. Contribution to the emergency diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[Study of postoperative amylasemia. Its diagnostic value in postoperative acute pancreatitis (PAP)].A study of the postoperative amylasemia levels on 375 different intervents is presented. Three different behaviours have been observed: 1) in 44 cases there has been a rapid increase of the amylasemia gone on for less than 4 days without any clinical sign of pancreatitis; 2) in 6 cases the increase, sometimes less marked than the previous cases, developed and continued for longer time, showing oscillations with a slow return to the normality. At the same time there was a slow recovery in the general conditions; the cause of that has been interpreted as a pancreatic affection; 3) in 8 cases the amylasemia increase developed for many days with large and long oscillation and clinical signs of APP. The opinion of Authors is that the APP is characterised by amylasemia increases presenting large oscillations life times exceeding 4 days, and that they are joined with clinical signs of pancreatitis (pain, sickness, hypotension, ec.). The study of the amylasemia plotting is considered to be a rather good method to emphasize a pancreatic disease.Time-course and clinical value of the urine trypsinogen-2 dipstick test in acute pancreatitis.Urine trypsinogen-2 has been suggested as a marker of damage due to acute pancreatitis. Our aim was to assess the time-course and the clinical value of this test in acute pancreatitis.A urine trypsinogen-2 dipstick test was performed on 30 patients with acute pancreatitis upon admission to the emergency room, as well as on 30 patients with non-pancreatic acute abdominal pain, and in 30 healthy subjects.In 53.3% of the patients with acute pancreatitis the dipstick test showed abnormal urine trypsinogen-2 whereas this test gave negative results in all patients with non-pancreatic acute abdomen and in all healthy subjects. Patients with severe acute pancreatitis had a frequency of abnormal results of urine trypsinogen-2 (8/9, 88.9%; 95% CI, 51.8-99.7%) significantly higher (P = 0.031) than those with the mild disease (8/21, 38.1%; 95% CI, 18.1 -61.6%), while no significant differences were found in the urine trypsinogen-2 results between patients with biliary acute pancreatitis and those with non-biliary acute pancreatitis. Regarding the time-course of urine trypsinogen-2, there were no significant differences during the three days of the study.The specificity of urine trypsinogen-2 in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis is good however its sensitivity is low.Lipase and pancreatic amylase activities in diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in patients with hyperamylasemia.Measurement of total serum amylase (AMY) is the most widely used biochemical test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, but it is commonly considered a nonspecific marker. To improve the biochemical diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, lipase (LIP) and pancreatic amylase (PAMY) have been tested in recent years. The present study was designed to evaluate whether serum LIP and pancreatic PAMY tests could replace total amylase test to improve diagnostic efficiency in the evaluation of acute pancreatitis in patients with hyperamylasemia.LIP and PAMY values were determined in serum samples from 92 patients with hyperamylasemia. Reference values for each enzyme were derived from serum samples of 147 healthy subjects. The activities of LIP and PAMY in patients with various diseases were shown directly by the boxplot graph. The diagnostic accuracy of LIP and PAMY was defined as the area under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve. Their sensitivity and specificity in detecting acute pancreatitis at varying cutoff points were shown by the curve, and the best cutoff value for each enzyme was shown by the modified ROC curve. The diagnostic values of LIP, PAMY and LIP+AMY with each upper limit of reference range (ULR) were compared with the corresponding best cutoff values.The references values of LIP and PAMY were 12.2-47.6 U/L and 28-95 U/L, respectively. These values in patients with acute pancreatitis were higher than those patients with other diseases. The areas under the ROC curve (AUC) of LIP and PAMY were 0.799 and 0.792, respectively. With the best diagnostic cutoff point of maximum (sensitivity + specificity)-100%, we obtained values of 97.9 U/L (LIP(97.9)=2.06 X ULR) for LIP and 209 U/L (PAMY(209)=2.20 X ULR) for PAMY. The best cutoff values for LIP, PAMY and LIP+AMY demonstrated the specificity, positive predictive value, and diagnostic efficiency higher than the corresponding ULRs.Serum LIP and PAMY are specific for the pancreas and might replace total amylase for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in hyperamylasemia patients. LIP(97.9) is more efficient than PAMY(209) in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. A combined test of both enzymes is not superior to single test of either enzyme in diagnostic accuracy.[Value of the various pancreatic enzymes in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Relationship between post-ERCP pancreatitis and the change of serum amylase level after the procedure.To clarify the relationship between the change of serum amylase level and post-ERCP pancreatitis.Between January 1999 and December 2002, 1291 ERCP-related procedures were performed. Serum amylase concentrations were measured before the procedure and 3, 6, and 24 h afterward. The frequency and severity of post-ERCP pancreatitis and the relationship between these phenomena and the change in amylase level were estimated.Post-ERCP pancreatitis occurred in 47 patients (3.6%). Pancreatitis occurred in 1% of patients with normal amylase levels 3 h after ERCP, and in 1%, 5%, 20%, 31% and 39% of patients with amylase levels elevated 1-2 times, 2-3 times, 3-5 times, 5-10 times and over 10 times the upper normal limit at 3 h after ERCP, respectively (level < 2 times vs >or= 2 times, P < 0.001). Of the 143 patients with levels higher than the normal limit at 3 h after ERCP followed by elevation at 6 h, pancreatitis occurred in 26%. In contrast, pancreatitis occurred in 9% of 45 patients with a level higher than two times the normal limit at 3 h after ERCP followed by a decrease at 6 h (26% vs 9%, P < 0.05).Post-ERCP pancreatitis is frequently associated with an increase in serum amylase level greater than twice the normal limit at 3 h after ERCP with an elevation at 6 h. A decrease in amylase level at 6 h after ERCP suggests the unlikelihood of development of post-ERCP pancreatitis.[A rapid and simple method for serum amylase determination in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[A study of lipase, amylase and isoamylase in acute pancreatitis].Determination of pancreatic lipase by immunoactivation technology. A rapid test system with high sensitivity and specificity.This paper describes the test characteristics and clinical relevance of a newly developed homogeneous enzyme immunoassay IMAC lipase test for the determination of serum pancreatic lipase. The method of determination is based on an immunoactivation technology and utilizes antibody fragments against human pancreatic lipase covalently bound to the marker enzyme horseradish peroxidase. The serum samples of 408 persons were investigated with this new assay. The within-run and day-to-day precision, the linearity, and the recovery of this immunoassay correspond to a very high degree to the requirements made of a modern immunological test. Comparison with an ELISA method resulted in a correlation coefficient of 0.971, whereby the IMAC lipase assay tended to register lower serum values. The serum range for the IMAC lipase test is 0-47 micrograms/L, based on a normal collective of 187 healthy controls. A sensitivity of 95.8% for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis at a cutoff level of twice the upper normal range and a specificity of 99.3% at an efficiency of 99.8% can be given. The advantage of the IMAC lipase test method is its ability to be adapted to work on automatic laboratory analyzers.The value of serum amylase and elastase measurements in the prediction of post-ERCP acute pancreatitis.Acute pancreatitis is the most serious complication of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) but is not very common. A test that could predict the occurrence of pancreatitis would help to decide whether to discharge a patient after ERCP or not. The aim of this prospective study was to compare the value of serum amylase and elastase in the prediction of post-ERCP pancreatitis and its severity.Ninety-seven patients underwent ERCP. Serum samples were taken before, two and six hours after ERCP for amylase and elastase measurement. Fifty-four patients (group A) were treated with continuous intravenous infusion of octreotide, beginning 6 hours before ERCP and terminating 24 hours after. Forty-three patients (group B) received no preventive treatment.In group A, 9 patients (16.6%) developed pancreatitis, 8 of them (14.8%) mild and 1 (1.8%) severe. Two patients in group B developed mild pancreatitis (p = 0.1). In all patients the predictive accuracy in the second hour for amylase >3N, >5N and elastase >N was 79%, 87% and 86% respectively. The likelihood ratio of positivity (LRP) was 3.6, 6.5 and 6.1. In the sixth hour the respective values were 76%, 86%, 85% and 4, 7.3 and 6.4. In group A, the respective values in the second hour were 85%, 91%, 94% and 5, 25.2, infinity, and in the sixth hour 85%, 94%, 98% and 5.7, 11.5, infinity.Serum amylase (with cutoff value >5N) and elastase (>N), 6 hours after ERCP, were the most accurate tests for the prediction of post-ERCP pancreatitis, especially in patients receiving octreotide. The measurement of serum elastase could supplement that of serum amylase in the prediction of more cases of post-ERCP pancreatitis.Hyperamylasemia and pancreatitis following biliary tract surgery: a prospective study.[Correlation of the clearance of amylase and creatinine in acute pancreatitis and other pathologies].The study of a group of 151 patients confirms the diagnostic value of elevated ACCR in pancreatitis, it was positive in 89.4% of them, of the group, 30 were normal, 19 exhibited acute pancreatitis and 102 had various other pathologies. Serious pancreatitis has shown coincide with a long-lasting rise of ACCR, and its rise in the course of the disease was a sign of a new outburst of progressive necrosis. Total unreliability when abnormal creatinine clearance is present was ascertained. The possible mechanism of increase in ACCR has been considered also in connection with the study of the results obtained on a group of patients exhibiting renal insufficiency, gastrointestinal bleeding, acute colecystitis, vesicular lithiasis and obstructive jaundice.Urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick in acute pancreatitis.In acute pancreatitis (AP), rapid diagnosis and early treatment are of importance for clinical outcome. Urinary trypsinogen-2 has been suggested as a promising diagnostic marker; however, studies using the urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test (UTDT) have provided varying results.The study was set to evaluate the use of the UTDT (Actim Pancreatitis; Medix Biochemica, Kauniainen, Finland, Medinor, Roskilde, Denmark) in apparent first attack of AP in daily clinics. Acute pancreatitis was defined as more than a 3-fold increase in plasma amylase levels. We included 75 patients admitted with AP. Thirty-four patients with acute abdominal pain of causes other than AP served as a control group.In 58 of 75 patients, the UTDT result was positive, giving a sensitivity of 77% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 66%-86%). In severe cases, the sensitivity improved to 87% (95% CI: 69%-96%). In 33 of 34 controls, the test result was negative, giving a specificity of 97% (95% CI: 84%-99.9%).The UTDT had a low sensitivity but high specificity. These results do not support the UTDT to replace standard plasma amylase for the diagnosis of apparent first attack of AP. However, the test demonstrated an adequate sensitivity to be used for rapid early screening of AP in daily clinics.[Value of amylase-creatinine clearance index in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Radioimmunoassay for human pancreatic lipase in acute pancreatitis.We examined the utility of serum pancreatic lipase by radioimmunoassay as a diagnostic test for acute pancreatitis and its correlation with serum total amylase, pancreatic isoamylase, and lipase activity. Data were analyzed on 11 patients with documented acute pancreatitis, three groups of patients (N = 104) with nongastrointestinal, gastrointestinal, and renal diseases, and 30 healthy controls. Patients with acute pancreatitis had significantly (P less than 0.01) higher mean serum lipase by radioimmunoassay than all other groups. Using a serum lipase of 112 ng/ml as a cutoff point in all patients, the test was 91% sensitive and 96% specific for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. The correlation coefficients of serum lipase by radioimmunoassay with respect to total amylase, pancreatic isoamylase, and lipase activity were 0.86, 0.98, and 0.79, respectively.Elevated serum amylase activity in the absence of clinical pancreatic or salivary gland disease: possible role of acute hypoxemia.Elevated serum amylase activity, in the absence of clinically apparent pancreatic or salivary gland disease, has been observed in many seemingly unrelated conditions. In a search for common etiological factors to account for hyperamylasemia in these conditions, a retrospective analysis was performed. Eighty-four episodes of hyperamylasemia (greater than 300 I.U./l. Phadebas method) occurring in 75 patients over a one-year period ending in June, 1975 were assigned to one of two groups. Group 1 consisted of 56 (67%) episodes of hyperamylasemia with clinical pancreatitis. Group 2 consisted of 28 (33%) episodes of hyperamylasemia in the absence of clinical pancreatitis. Hypoxemia (pO2 less than 75 mm. Hg.) was found in 9/15 patients in Group 2 who had arterial blood gases measured. To assess the possible relationship between acute hypoxemia and amylase activity, a prospective study was initiated. Patients with known causes of pancreatitis or renal failure were eliminated. Hyperamylasemia was found in 3/8 hypoxemic patients. This raises the possibility that acute hypoxemia alone or in combination with other factors may raise serum amylase activity, possibly through ischemic injury to the pancreas or salivary glands or other amylase containing tissues.Amylase inhibitor from wheat: its action and clinical application.The electrophoretic and column chromatographic characteristics of an amylase inhibitor of wheat origin were investigated. Further, the clinical usefulness of this inhibitor for determining the ratio of pancreatic to salivary isoamylase activity in serum was evaluated. Amylase inhibitor inhibits the action of salivary alpha-amylase by making an amylase-inhibitor complex, which is easily separated into its individual component during electrophoresis with full recovery of amylase activity. Using the specific inhibitory effect of this inhibitor on salivary alpha-amylase activity, the ratio of pancreatic to salivary isoamylase activity (P/S) in serum was determined. There was a good correlation in P/S ratio in serum between the results obtained with the inhibitor method and those with electrophoretic method. The P/S ratio in sera from patients with acute pancreatitis was over 8.0, whereas that in sera from patients with salivary-type hyperamylasemia such as mumps, pulmonary diseases and following surgery was less than 0.1. However, hyperamylasemia due to macroamylase or renal failure could not be identified by the inhibitor method.Alcoholic pancreatitis and parotitis: utility of lipase and urinary amylase clearance determinations.Acute alcoholic pancreatitis is a clinical diagnosis made in patients who have acute upper abdominal pain, emesis, and hyperamylasemia soon after ingesting alcohol. We sought to determine whether the clinical diagnosis of pancreatitis was supported by elevated serum levels of pancreatic isoamylase, currently the most specific test for pancreatitis. Serum lipase levels and urinary amylase/creatinine clearance ratios were examined for comparison with pancreatic isoamylase concentrations. Potential sources for salivary isoamylasemia were explored with technetium scans of the parotid glands. Of 19 patients with a clinical diagnosis of alcoholic pancreatitis, 16 had elevated levels of pancreatic isoamylase, and 17 had salivary hyperamylasemia. The diagnostic specificity of the serum lipase level or the urinary amylase/creatinine clearance ratio was excellent compared to that of the pancreatic isoamylase level. Three patients had elevated levels of salivary isoamylase only. Scans of the parotid glands in the study group revealed significantly higher uptake values than scans in nonalcoholic control subjects, suggesting one possible source of elevated levels of salivary isoamylase.Combined serum amylase and lipase determinations for diagnosis of suspected acute pancreatitis.Serum amylase and lipase measurements are often used to diagnose acute pancreatitis. This study addresses the question of whether it is advantageous to order serum amylase and lipase tests simultaneously. We evaluated performance of the two tests separately and in combination through a retrospective study of patients for whom both amylase and lipase determinations were ordered. Initial analysis of test performance was conducted with a uniformly applied criterion based on determination of optimal sensitivity-specificity pairs. Individual tests and combinations of tests, including the "AND" and "OR" rules and discriminant functions, were examined. Only the discriminant approach demonstrated better performance than the lipase test alone. This finding was subsequently confirmed by logistic regression analysis. We conclude that ordering both tests simultaneously can be advantageous in diagnosing acute pancreatitis when a bivariate approach is used; however, this must be weighed against the difficulties associated with clinical implementation of such approaches.Serum amylase test in differential diagnosis of freely perforated ulcer and acute pancreatitis; a reevaluation.Serum phospholipase A2, amylase, lipase, and urinary amylase activities in relation to the severity of acute pancreatitis.To compare serum phospholipase A2 activity with measurements of conventional enzymes as an indicator of the severity of acute pancreatitis.Prospective study.University hospital, Finland.80 Consecutive patients with acute pancreatitis.Serum and urine samples were taken daily for a week after admission.Serum phospholipase A2, amylase, lipase, and urinary amylase activities.On admission, the serum amylase and lipase activities increased in parallel in all patients. However, the mean serum phospholipase A2 activity was three times higher in the patients with acute fulminant pancreatitis than in those with milder disease. The phospholipase A2 activity remained high during the course of the severe disease, whereas the other enzyme activities decreased appreciably during the first week. In contrast to the other enzyme activities that of serum phospholipase A2 correlated well with the severity of the acute pancreatitis. Heating at 60 degrees C for 45 minutes to inactivate the non-pancreatic thermolabile phospholipase A2 reduced the total serum phospholipase A2 activity more than the enzyme activity in the homogenates of pancreatic tissue, which suggests that extrapancreatic phospholipase A2 is present in serum. The receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves confirmed the high sensitivity and specificity of serum phospholipase A2 activity with a mean (SEM) area under the curve up to 0.870 (0.062) compared with the other enzyme activities of which the highest area under the curve was 0.52 (0.089).In contrast to amylase and lipase activities, measurement of serum phospholipase A2 activity is important in the assessment of the severity of acute pancreatitis so that optimal treatment may be given.Serum amylase and lipase in the evaluation of acute abdominal pain.The purpose of this study was to determine 1) the incidence and magnitude of elevation in admission serum amylase and lipase levels in extrapancreatic etiologies of acute abdominal pain, and 2) the test most closely associated with the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. Serum amylase and lipase levels were obtained in 306 patients admitted for evaluation of acute abdominal pain. Patients were categorized by anatomic location of identified pathology. Logistic regression analysis was used to compare the enzyme levels between patient groups and to determine the correlation between elevation in serum amylase and lipase. Twenty-seven (13%) of 208 patients with an extrapancreatic etiology of acute abdominal pain demonstrated an elevated admission serum amylase level with a maximum value of 385 units (U)/L (normal range 30-110 U/L). Twenty-six (12.5%) of these 208 patients had an elevated admission serum lipase value with a maximum of 3685 U/L (normal range 5-208 U/L). Of 48 patients with abdominal pain resulting from acute pancreatitis, admission serum amylase ranged from 30 to 7680 U/L and lipase ranged from 5 to 90,654 U/L. Both serum amylase and lipase elevations were positively associated with a correct diagnosis of acute pancreatitis (P < 0.001) with diagnostic efficiencies of 91 and 94 per cent, respectively. A close correlation between elevation of admission serum amylase and lipase was observed (r = 0.87) in both extrapancreatic and pancreatic disease processes. Serum amylase and lipase levels may be elevated in nonpancreatic disease processes of the abdomen. Significant elevations (greater than three times upper limit of normal) in either enzyme are uncommon in these disorders. The strong correlation between elevations in the two serum enzymes in both pancreatic and extrapancreatic etiologies of abdominal pain makes them redundant measures. Serum lipase is a better test than serum amylase either to exclude or to support a diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Rapid measurement of urinary trypsinogen-2 as a screening test for acute pancreatitis.Acute pancreatitis can be difficult to diagnose. We developed a rapid dipstick screening test for pancreatitis, based on the immunochromatographic measurement of urinary trypsinogen-2.We prospectively compared the urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test with a quantitative urinary trypsinogen-2 assay, a urinary dipstick test for amylase, and serum and urinary amylase assays in 500 consecutive patients with acute abdominal pain at two emergency departments. Acute pancreatitis was diagnosed according to standardized criteria.The urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test was positive in 50 of the 53 patients with acute pancreatitis (sensitivity, 94 percent), including all 7 with severe pancreatitis. Two patients with urinary trypsinogen-2 concentrations below the sensitivity threshold of the test (50 ng per milliliter) and one with a very high concentration had false negative results. The test was also positive in 21 of the 447 patients without pancreatitis (specificity, 95 percent), including 7 with abdominal cancers, 3 with cholangitis, and 2 with chronic pancreatitis. The sensitivity and specificity of the dipstick test were similar to those of the quantitative urinary trypsinogen-2 assay and higher than those of the urinary amylase dipstick test. The serum amylase assay had a sensitivity of 85 percent (with a cutoff value of 300 U per liter for the upper reference limit) and a specificity of 91 percent. The sensitivity and specificity of the urinary amylase assay (cutoff value, 2000 U per liter) were 83 and 88 percent, respectively.In patients with acute abdominal pain seen in the emergency department, a negative dipstick test for urinary trypsinogen-2 rules out acute pancreatitis with a high degree of probability. A positive test usually identifies patients in need of further evaluation.Lipase and pancreatic amylase activities in tissues and in patients with hyperamylasemia.Lipase, pancreatic amylase, and total amylase activities were measured in nondiseased and diseased human pancreatic tissues and in six different locations of the human digestive system. In addition, it was determined whether serum lipase and pancreatic amylase tests could replace the total amylase test to improved diagnostic efficiency in the evaluation of acute pancreatitis in hyperamylasemia patients. Nondiseased pancreatic tissue contained 4.5 times more lipase activity than total amylase activity. Diseased pancreatic tissue contained less activity for both lipase and total amylase compared to normal tissue. The total amylase activity of the pancreas was comprised solely of pancreatic amylase. Tissue obtained from six different anatomic locations in the digestive system contained 35 to 45 times less lipase and total amylase activity compared to the pancreas. Total amylase activity of the digestive system tissues were comprised of 25% pancreatic and 75% salivary isoamylases. Lipase, pancreatic amylase, and total amylase levels also were determined in serial serum samples from 17 consecutive hyperamylasemia patients admitted with possible acute pancreatitis. The serum lipase level remained higher than normal longer than either the total amylase and pancreatic amylase levels. In patients with hyperamylasemia of pancreatic origin, a poor correlation was observed at admission between serum pancreatic amylase and serum lipase. Not all patients with elevated lipase had an elevated pancreatic amylase level and vice versa. However, in every patient pancreatic disease would have been detected by the elevation of either lipase or pancreatic amylase levels. Diagnostic efficiency for pancreatic disease using serum pancreatic amylase, lipase, and total amylase tests was 94.1%, 76.5%, and 64.7%, respectively. These data suggest that lipase and pancreatic amylase tests are specific for the pancreas and might be considered replacements for total amylase as the stat or routine laboratory test for the diagnosis of pancreatic tissue injury.Electrophoretic fractionation of pancreatic lipase.Human pancreatic isolipases were separated by electrophoresis on cellulose acetate membrane. Band visualization by fluorescence detection of NADH produced by beta-oxidation cyclic reaction of fatty acid liberated from 1,2-dilinoleoylglycerol by lipase was achieved by making a two-plate "sandwich" of an electrophoresis plate and a substrate-bearing plate. Two true lipase forms, named L1 and L2 to reflect their electrophoretic migration, were resolved with this method and quantified by densitometry. The procedure was not only simple and rapid but also precise (between-run CV less than 13.5%) and sensitive (detected lipase fractions of less than 2 U/L). L1 (mean 57% of total lipase, SD 19.3%) and L2 (mean 43%, SD 19.3%) lipase forms were found in all normal persons studied. In a preliminary clinical study of 27 emergency room patients, evaluation of the lipase electrophoretic pattern in serum did not separate patients with acute pancreatitis from those with other acute abdominal disorders.Urinary trypsinogen-2 for diagnosing acute pancreatitis: a meta-analysis.Currently, serum amylase and lipase are the most popular laboratory markers for early diagnosis of acute pancreatitis with reasonable sensitivity and specificity. Urinary trypsinogen-2 (UT-2) has been increasingly used but its clinical value for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and post-endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) pancreatitis has not yet been systematically assessed.A comprehensive search was carried out using PubMed (MEDLINE), Embase, and Web of Science for clinical trials, which studied the usefulness of UT-2 as a diagnostic marker for acute pancreatitis. Sensitivity, specificity and the diagnostic odds ratios (DORs) with 95% confidence interval (CI) were calculated for each study and were compared with serum amylase and lipase. Summary receiver-operating curves were conducted and the area under the curve (AUC) was evaluated.A total of 18 studies were included. The pooled sensitivity and specificity of UT-2 for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis were 80% and 92%, respectively (AUC=0.96, DOR=65.63, 95% CI: 31.65-139.09). The diagnostic value of UT-2 was comparable to serum amylase but was weaker than serum lipase. The pooled sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of post-ERCP pancreatitis were 86% and 94%, respectively (AUC=0.92, DOR=77.68, 95% CI: 24.99-241.48).UT-2 as a rapid test could be potentially used for the diagnosis of post-ERCP pancreatitis and to an extent, acute pancreatitis. Further studies are warranted to confirm these results.Rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Early diagnosis of acute pancreatitis remains a challenge. A rapid dipstick screening test for acute pancreatitis has been developed. This prospective study was designed to evaluate the diagnostic value and time course of the rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip in acute pancreatitis, with comparisons with serum amylase and serum lipase.A total of 165 patients with acute abdominal pain (67 with acute pancreatitis and 98 with other acute abdominal diseases) attending our emergency unit were included. All patients were tested with the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip, and serum amylase and serum lipase concentrations were determined simultaneously. To measure the time course of the urinary trypsinogen-2 test, 32 patients with acute pancreatitis were tested with a urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip on days 1, 2, 3, and 4 after admission.Using a cutoff level of 50 microg/L for urinary trypsinogen-2, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip for recognition of acute pancreatitis were 89.6%, 85.7%, and 87.3%, respectively. The diagnostic accuracy rates of serum amylase and serum lipase were 88.5% and 93.3%, using cutoff values of 3 times the upper normal limits for serum amylase and serum lipase, respectively. All but one of the 17 patients with severe acute pancreatitis was detected by the test strip (sensitivity, 94.1%). The time-course study of the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip revealed that the sensitivity on days 1, 2, 3, and 4 was 90.6%, 81.2%, 59.4%, and 50%, respectively. There was no significant difference in the sensitivity between urinary trypsinogen-2 and serum lipase; however, the sensitivity values of serum lipase were significantly higher than those of serum amylase from days 1 to 4.The rapid urinary trypsinogen-2 test is a reliable and simple method for the early diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. A positive test identifies patients in need of further diagnostic measures. The urinary trypsinogen-2 test can be performed in health care units where laboratory testing facilities are not immediately available.Diagnosis of acute pancreatitis using the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio and radionuclide hepatobiliary and pancreas imaging.[Differential diagnosis of acute biliary tract diseases and acute pancreatitis by means of laboratory tests].Evaluation of a new urinary amylase test strip in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.We have developed a novel rapid test strip for detecting pancreatic amylase in urine and prospectively evaluated its accuracy in screening for acute pancreatitis (AP). The test strip is based on the immunochromatography principle and uses two monoclonal antibodies specific for pancreatic amylase. Urine samples were collected from 500 consecutive patients with acute abdominal disease (52 with AP) and prospectively tested with the strip. The accuracy of the test strip was compared with that of two quantitative urine amylase determinations and a urinary dipstick test for amylase (Rapignost). Sensitivity of the test was 69% and specificity was 97% in differentiating patients with AP from those with acute abdominal extrapancreatic disease at admission. The negative predictive value was 0.986. The test showed moderate agreement both with an assay measuring total amylase activity and with another measuring pancreatic amylase immunoreactivity. At similar high specificity (97%), quantitative determination of total amylase activity (cut-off 3960 U/L) and pancreatic amylase (cut-off 2180 micrograms/L) showed lower sensitivity (54% and 41%) than the test strip (69%). The test is specific and rapid to perform, and it rules out AP with high probability. It could therefore be useful in an emergency setting without laboratory facilities in the differential diagnosis of acute abdominal pain.No parallel between the biochemical course of acute pancreatitis and morphologic findings.The clinical, biochemical (serum enzymes), and morphologic course of acute pancreatitis was studied in 83 consecutive patients from time of admission until 3 months after discharge. At discharge, all 75 surviving patients had no more symptoms of acute pancreatitis, even though amylase (in 11%) and lipase (in 25%) were still elevated, computed tomography (CT) findings still abnormal (in 81%), and necrosis amounting up to 50% of the gland still present (in 24%). There was no significant correlation between serum enzymes and CT findings at discharge. Three months later, with the exception of one patient with an acute relapse of the disease, all followed-up patients were free of symptoms and had normal serum amylase, whereas lipase was still elevated in 10%, and CT findings abnormal in 23%. Subsiding symptoms provided a more accurate picture of the patients' recovery than the biochemical markers, and even more so that the morphologic findings.The interrelationship of blood and urine diastase during transient acute pancreatitis.Enzyme immunoassay for serum pancreatic lipase in the diagnosis of pancreatic diseases.To evaluate the diagnostic utility of serum immunoreactive lipase (IRL), serum lipase was determined using an enzyme immunoassay and a turbidimetric method along with total serum amylase in 41 healthy controls, 76 patients with pancreatic disease and 60 with nonpancreatic disease. Serum IRL was elevated in 12 of 13 patients with acute pancreatitis, 12 of 44 with chronic pancreatitis and in 12 of 19 with pancreatic cancer. The IRL was low in 9 of the 44 patients with chronic pancreatitis, which coincided with advanced exocrine pancreatic insufficiency. Overall sensitivities in pancreatic diseases were 59% for serum IRL, 38% for turbidimetric lipase and 51% for amylase, specificities in healthy controls and nonpancreatic diseases were 80% for serum IRL, 86% for turbidimetric lipase and 88% for serum amylase. Serum IRL determination is useful for diagnosis in pancreatic diseases when compared with the conventional determination of serum lipase.[Laboratory diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. Amylase analysis is still the leading one, but a "urinary strip" is on its way to be marketed].Amylase: creatinine clearance ratio and urinary excretion of lysozyme in acute pancreatitis and acute duodenal perforation.The amylase:creatinine clearance ratio in patients suffering from acute pancreatitis or acute duodenal perforation was higher than normal in both groups of patients. These findings cast doubt on the value of this parameter as a specific index of acute pancreatitis. The mechanism or mechanisms underlying the increased amylase excretion have not been determined. However, the markedly elevated urinary excretion of lysozyme observed in some patients suggests, by analogy, that diminished tubular reabsorption of amylase may contribute towards the elevated amylase:creatinine ratio.[Value of pancreatic enzymes in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[THE VALUE OF SERUM ENZYME DETERMINATIONS IN ACUTE PANCREATIC DISEASES. AN EXPERIMENTAL STUDY].[The relationship between amylase and creatinine clearance is useful in the evaluation of acute pancreatitis, but it is not specific].Human pancreas-specific protein/procarboxypeptidase B: a useful serum marker of acute pancreatitis.The aim of this study was to evaluate the serum behavior of human pancreas-specific protein/procarboxypeptidase B (hPASP/PCPB) in the early phases of acute pancreatitis, and to calculate its sensitivity and specificity in comparison with those of serum amylase and lipase in the diagnosis of this illness. Twenty-six acute pancreatitis patients were studied; the pancreatitis was of biliary origin in 11, due to alcohol abuse in 8, and due to other causes in 7. Sixteen patients had mild pancreatitis and 10 the severe form of the disease. Thirty-one patients with nonpancreatic acute digestive diseases were also studied. Serum concentrations of hPASP/PCPB, amylase and lipase were determined in all subjects on admission to the study as well as daily for the following 5 days in acute pancreatitis patients. All patients with acute pancreatitis had abnormally high serum hPASP/PCPB, amylase and lipase concentrations on the first day of admission. On the sixth day of the disease, 76% of acute pancreatitis patients had abnormally high serum concentrations of hPASP/PCPB, whereas only 48% (p < 0.05) had elevated serum amylase and lipase. No differences in serum levels of hPASP/PCPB, amylase or lipase were found between patients with alcoholic pancreatitis and those with other etiological forms of the disease, or between those with mild and severe forms of pancreatitis. The specificity of the three serum pancreatic protein assays, calculated on the 31 patients with nonpancreatic acute digestive diseases, was 90% for both hPASP/PCPB and lipase, 75% for amylase.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Early diagnosis and prediction of severity in acute pancreatitis using the urine trypsinogen-2 dipstick test: a prospective study.To evaluate the use of the trypsinogen-2 dipstick (Actim Pancreatitis) test for early diagnosis and prediction of severity in acute pancreatitis (AP).Ninety-two patients with AP were included in this study. The control group was 25 patients who had acute abdominal pain from non-pancreatic causes. Urine trypsinogen-2 dipstick test (UTDT) and conventional diagnostic tests were performed in all patients. Patients were divided by the Atlanta classification into two groups as having mild or severe pancreatitis.UTDT was positive in 87 (94.6%) of the AP patients and in two (8%) controls (P < 0.05). Positive UTDT was found in 61 (92.4%) of 66 (71.7%) patients with mild pancreatitis and in all (100%) of the 26 (28.3%) with severe pancreatitis (P > 0.05). UTDT positivity lasted longer in severe pancreatitis compared with that in mild pancreatitis (6.2 +/- 2.5 d vs 2.0 +/- 1.43 d, P < 0.05). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value (NPV), positive likelihood ratio (PLR) and negative likelihood ratio (NLR) of UTDT were 91%, 72%, 96.6%, 70.4%, 3.4 and 0.1, respectively.UTDT is a simple, rapid and reliable method for use on admission. It has high specificity and low NLR for early diagnosis and prediction of severity in AP. However, its relatively low NPV does not allow trypsinogen-2 dipstick test to be a stand-alone tool for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis; the use of other conventional diagnostic tools remains a requirement.[Diagnostic value of lipase and isoamylase determination. Monitoring studies in patients with proven and suspected pancreatitis].Changes of lipase (turbidimetric evaluation), total amylase and isoamylases (inhibition test) were determined in 93 patients with proven or suspect pancreatitis. In 35 patients with established acute pancreatitis 143 sera were investigated in the course of disease. Lipase and pancreatic amylase were increased in these samples significantly more often (thus longer in the course of disease) than total amylase. Eight patients with chronic pancreatitis and exocrine insufficiency showed very low lipase and pancreatic amylase activities whereas total amylase was normal. Observations in the course of two groups of patients with suspect (but not established) pancreatitis showed superior organ specificity of lipase and pancreatic amylase when compared to total amylase. However, no relevant difference of the diagnostic validity of both enzymes could be demonstrated.[Laboratory diagnostics of acute pancreatitis].A clinical evaluation of elevated serum and urine amylase.[A study of the specificity of amylases. Measurement of pancreatic isoamylases (author's transl)].Serum lipase, pancreatic isoamylases and serum inhibitory activity on proteases were measured in 29 patients, 17 of whom had pancreatic disorders. The new test used to measure pancreatic isoamylases is rapid and useful, as it is relatively specific of pancreatic lesions. In acute abdominal syndromes, it undoubtedly enhances the value of biochemical investigations by confirming or excluding pancreatic lesions or involvement.Evaluation of amylase and lipase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.The diagnosis of acute pancreatitis relies heavily on a raised amylase.In the present study patients were prospectively categorized, without knowledge of pancreatic enzyme levels, into acute pancreatitis (AP; n = 51), disease controls (n = 35), indeterminate as to pancreatitis (n = 189) or exclusions (non-pancreatitis diseases where amylase may be elevated; n = 53).Enzyme levels were analysed by receiver operator characteristics (ROC) curves, with specificity > 80%. Day 1 serum lipase gave the greatest diagnostic accuracy (area under ROC curve = 0.128; P = 0.041 vs serum amylase). At the calculated diagnostic threshold of 208 U/L, lipase gave a sensitivity of 67% and a specificity of 97%. Other diagnostic thresholds (day 1) were: serum total amylase, 176 U/L (ROC 0.104, sensitivity 45%, specificity 97%), urinary total amylase, 550 U/L (ROC 0.108, sensitivity 62%, specificity 97%) and serum pancreatic isoamylase, 41 U/L (ROC 0.107, sensitivity 63%, specificity 85%). At delayed diagnosis (3 days) no enzyme was superior to lipase. The combination of lipase and amylase did not increase diagnostic accuracy.Serum lipase is recommended for diagnosis of AP, both early and late in the disease. Although highly specific when elevated, all pancreatic enzymes have low sensitivity for diagnosis.Diagnostic accuracy evaluation using ROC curve analysis.The diagnostic accuracy of a biochemical quantity is inversely related to the overlapping zone between the values of the population suffering from a disease and the population which does not. The ROC curves are an indirect measure of the overlapping zone between both populations. Specimens (plasma and urine) taken from 928 patients with symptoms of acute abdominal pain were used and the catalytic concentration of alpha-amylase, pancreatic alpha-amylase and triacylglycerol lipase (determined by two methods) were measured. Definitive diagnosis was obtained by following the directives of expert groups on the evaluation of diagnostic tests. Diagnostic accuracy was characterized by calculating the diagnostic sensitivity and specificity, by representing the ROC curves and by quantifying the areas under the ROC curves. The catalytic concentration of pancreatic alpha-amylase in plasma was the quantity with a greater area under the ROC curve (A = 0.9740) and then the one which had greatest diagnostic accuracy. If we considered the upper limit of the reference interval to be the cut-off value, the catalytic concentration of pancreatic alpha-amylase in plasma had a diagnostic sensitivity and specificity values of 0.96 and 0.88 respectively for the acute pancreatitis.[AMYLASE BEHAVIOR IN ACUTE PANCREATITIS].The immunochemical determinations of serum lipase in acute pancreatitis: further results.The amylase to creatinine clearance ratio. It is a suitable test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis?Serum lipase levels in nonpancreatic abdominal pain versus acute pancreatitis.1) To determine whether serum lipase is elevated in patients with nonpancreatic abdominal pain, and 2) to compare the levels of serum lipase and serum amylase found in patients with nonpancreatic abdominal pain with those found in acute pancreatitis in order to differentiate between the two groups.Serum lipase and amylase levels were estimated in 95 patients with nonpancreatic abdominal pain (group A). These levels were then compared with those found in 75 patients with acute pancreatitis (group P).Serum amylase in group A ranged from 11 to 416 U/L [mean 58 +/- 46 (SD)]. Three patients (3.3%) had raised amylase levels. The maximum elevation noted in this group was 416 U/L. Serum amylase in group P ranged from 124 to 13,000 U/L (mean 1620 +/- 1976). Twenty of the 75 patients (27%) in group P had levels that overlapped those found in group A. The serum lipase in group A ranged from 3 to 680 U/L (mean 111 +/- 101). Ten of the 93 patients (11%) had elevated lipase levels. The maximum elevation noted was roughly 3 times normal (680 U/L). Serum lipase in group P ranged from 711 to 31,153 (mean 6705 +/- 7022). None of the patients in group P had levels that overlapped those found in group A. The sensitivity of a serum lipase level > 3 normal in detecting acute pancreatitis was 100% and the specificity was 99%. The corresponding figures for serum amylase were 72% and 99%, respectively.A serum lipase level > 3 normal has a better diagnostic accuracy than serum amylase in differentiating nonpancreatic abdominal pain from acute pancreatitis.Lipase/amylase ratio. A new index that distinguishes acute episodes of alcoholic from nonalcoholic acute pancreatitis.Because of observations that patients with acute episodes of alcoholic pancreatitis had high serum lipase levels whereas patients with gall stone pancreatitis had high serum amylase levels, a prospective study was undertaken to determine whether the ratio of serum lipase to serum amylase, a newly computed ratio, would discriminate between acute episodes of alcoholic and nonalcoholic pancreatitis. In phase one, 30 consecutive patients with acute pancreatitis were entered into the study and divided into groups A and B. Patients with renal failure were excluded from the study. Group A consisted of 20 patients in whom the etiology of pancreatitis was alcohol. Group B consisted of 10 patients whose pancreatitis was nonalcoholic in etiology (predominantly gallstones). Serum lipase values in group A ranged 492 to 25,706 U/L (median, 3433 U/L) and in group B from 711 to 31,153 U/L (median, 1260 U/L). These differences were not significant statistically. Serum amylase values in group A ranged from 104 to 2985 U/L (median, 331 U/L) and in group B from 423 to 13,000 (median, 1187 U/L). Although these figures were statistically different (P less than 0.005), there was a considerable degree of overlap in the values between the two groups. The lipase/amylase ratio calculated from the blood sample obtained at presentation appeared to be a promising discriminatory index. The lipase/amylase ratio was calculated by using the amylase and lipase levels expressed as multiples of the upper limit of normal in each case. The lipase/amylase ratios in the alcoholic group ranged from 2.2 to 14.8, whereas the lipase/amylase ratio in nonalcoholic pancreatitis ranged from 0.31 to 1.93. These differences were statistically significant (P less than 0.005). A lipase/amylase ratio of greater than 2 was indicative of an alcoholic etiology, and a ratio of less than 2 suggested that the pancreatitis was nonalcoholic in nature. In phase two, this lipase/amylase ratio of 2 was applied prospectively to an unselected population of 21 consecutive patients with acute pancreatitis. Thirteen patients had a lipase/amylase ratio of greater than 2; in 11 of them, the etiology of the pancreatitis was alcohol. Eight patients had a lipase/amylase ratio of less than 2; of them, only 1 patient had an alcoholic etiology for the pancreatitis. These differences were statistically significant (P less than 0.05).(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 400 WORDS)[Bedside diagnosis of pancreatitis using the urinary amylase test tape. Preliminary results].A test strip for rapid detection of alpha-amylase in urine was evaluated in 12 patients with an acute episode of acute or chronic pancreatitis and in 16 patients with hyperamylasemia of varying origin. The test strip was positive in 11 of 12 patients with acute pancreatitis and in 8 of 13 patients with hyperamylasemia. In 3 patients with macroamylasemia the test strip was negative. The specificity was 98% in 100 ambulatory patients without evidence of pancreatic disease.[HUMORAL DIAGNOSIS OF ACUTE PANCREATITIS].A comparison of lipase and amylase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in patients with abdominal pain.The clinical value of amylase and lipase measurement for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis was evaluated in 253 patients presenting with acute abdominal pain. Acute pancreatitis was detected in 32 patients by computed tomography or ultrasound. In the serum samples collected on days 0-1 after the onset of symptoms, lipase was elevated in 100% and amylase in 95%. A 95% sensitivity/specificity was reached at a lipase cutoff near twofold above normal. The receiver-operating characteristics (ROC) showed similar curves for both enzymes, lipase being slightly superior to amylase. The ROC curves from days 2-3 demonstrated a much lower sensitivity/specificity of both enzymes. Lipase, however, was notably superior to amylase: at a sensitivity of 85% the specificity of lipase (amylase) was 82% (68%). In samples from days 4-5 the accuracy of the enzyme assays was even worse; at a sensitivity of 60% the specificity did not increase above 70%. The diagnostic value of simultaneous measurement of amylase and lipase was tested at different cutoffs in two groups: the OR group, in which one of the two parameters had to be elevated, and the AND group, in which both parameters had to be above normal. Combination of both parameters mainly improved the specificity of the assay (from 91 to 98% on days 2-3 and from 93 to 97% on day 4-5) but only when, in the OR group, twofold elevated amylase was combined with lipase. We conclude that the simultaneous determination of serum lipase and amylase marginally improved the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in patients with acute abdominal pain, however, the sensitivity of the assay with samples collected 4-5 days after onset of the disease remained low.[Diagnostic value of a diagnostic strip for determining urinary amylase].The semiquantitative determination of amylase in urine with a stick-method has produced controversial results as to its diagnostical significance. In our study we compared the result of the Rapignost-test with the simultaneously measures activity of enzymes (total amylase, pancreatic isoamylase in serum and urine and lipase) in 323 samples of serum and urine taken from 32 patients affected with acute pancreatitis. On the 1st day of hospitalization Rapignost was positive in only 17 out of 32 cases. Both sensitivity and specificity of the test depended of the values referred to. Near range limits and in cases with slight or average increase of the enzymes, the correspondence of Rapignost results were unsatisfactory. We found a good correspondence in cases with normal low and excessively high values of the enzymes. On the whole, Rapignost showed the best correspondence with the pancreas isoamylase in urine. The result of Rapignost was also positive in 5 out of 15 cases with extrapancreatic increased urinary amylase, which confirms its lack of organ specificity. From case to case, the -, and + + test results of Rapignost did not lead to any conclusions as to the absolute values of the enzymes in serum and urine. Our results show that Rapignost does not offer enough safety either to confirm or to exclude an acute pancreatitis, and especially it should not be used as a screening test in emergency diagnostics. The determination of the enzyme, in particular in serum, can not be eluded.Diagnostic value of measuring pancreatic lipase and the P3 isoform of the pancreatic amylase isoenzyme in serum of hospitalized hyperamylasemic patients.We assayed amylase (AMY) isoenzymes by cellulose acetate electrophoresis and determined pancreatic lipase (LPS) activity by a turbidimetric colipase-supplemented method in 54 hospitalized hyperamylasemic patients (32 men and 22 women; mean age 61.5, SD 16, years). In AMY isoenzyme analysis, use of a value for P3 isoform greater than 14 U/L as a positive test for acute pancreatitis gave a diagnostic efficiency of 92.6%, a predictive value of a positive test result of 90.5%, and a predictive value of a negative test of 100%. Four of 12 patients with other, nonpancreatic abdominal diseases had false-positive test results. LPS activity (cutoff limit, 700 U/L) was as effective as P3 isoform in distinguishing patients with acute pancreatitis (sensitivity, 100%) from those without acute pancreatitis (specificity, 81.3%). Thus, P3 isoform and LPS appear to be interchangeable markers of pathological release of pancreatic enzymes into the bloodstream during acute pancreatitis. This finding decreases the need for the expensive radiological procedures currently required to confirm this diagnosis. In particular, negative results virtually exclude acute pancreatitis.Amylase, lipase, pancreatic isoamylase, and phospholipase A in diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.To determine the utility of serum amylase (AMY), lipase (Lp), pancreatic isoamylase (isoA), phospholipase A (PLA), and urine AMY in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, samples of serum and urine were obtained on admission and every day thereafter for 5 days from 384 patients with acute abdominal pain. Diagnostic accuracy, determined as the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve, was > 0.975 for serum AMY, Lp, isoA, and urine AMY. For each of these enzymes, a threshold value (twice to sixfold the upper limit of the reference values) offering diagnostic efficiency > 95% could be determined. In contrast, accuracy and efficiency of serum PLA were low. The profiles of these enzymes in acute pancreatitis decreased in a parallel fashion over 5 days except for PLA. We conclude that diagnostic utilities are similar for serum AMY, Lp, isoA, and urine AMY for acute pancreatitis, provided that an appropriate threshold is established.A simple screening test for acute pancreatitis.A urinary test strip for amylase (Rapignost-Amylase) was compared with plasma amylase assay in samples of urine and plasma collected on the day of admission to hospital from 23 patients with acute pancreatitis and 38 patients with other causes of acute abdominal pain. Plasma amylase was greater than 1200 IU/l in 24 patients (23 with pancreatitis and 1 with a perforated duodenal ulcer) and all were Rapignost-Amylase positive. Twenty-nine of the remaining patients were Rapignost-Amylase negative, but there were eight "false positives' with plasma amylase levels of 86-474 IU/l. The Rapignost-Amylase test is of potential value to screen for clinically occult acute pancreatitis.[SIMPLE LABORATORY STUDIES IN THE DIAGNOSIS OF ACUTE PANCREATITIS].A useful diagnostic and prognostic tool for acute appendicitis and acute pancreatitis.Comparative evaluation of the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis based on serum and urine enzyme assays.We compared the diagnostic sensitivities of serum amylase, lipase (assayed enzymatically and immunologically), trypsinogen and elastase-1, the 2-h-timed urine amylase excretion and the ratio of amylase and creatinine clearances in the recognition of acute pancreatitis. Serial serum and urine findings from 39 patients with acute pancreatitis, and from 42 patients with non-pancreatic causes of abdominal pain (controls), as well as findings from 24 healthy subjects (normals) were studied. Decision thresholds were established for each parameter using either the control or the normal population, and the resulting diagnostic sensitivities determined. On hospital admission, all serum assays were equally sensitive, but on subsequent days lipase, trypsinogen and elastase-1 assays all significantly surpassed the sensitivity of the serum amylase assay. On the second and subsequent hospitalization days, determination of timed urine amylase excretion offered no advantage over the serum amylase, and the ratio of amylase and creatinine clearances lacked discrimination altogether.Role of serum pancreatic enzyme assays in diagnosis of pancreatic disease.The serum behavior of amylase, pancreatic isoamylase, lipase, trypsinogen, and elastase 1 was studied in 145 patients with pancreatic disease and in 66 patients with abdominal pain of nonpancreatic origin, for the purpose of evaluating the relative diagnostic utility of their assays. In 34 patients with acute pancreatitis, serum lipase, trypsinogen, and elastase 1 were elevated in all 34, pancreatic isoamylase in 33 (97%) and amylase in 30 (88%). Ten of these acute pancreatitis patients were followed sequentially for seven days: the variations in their serum enzyme levels were parallel, although the lipase, trypsinogen, and particularly the elastase 1 elevations persisted longer than did those of amylase and pancreatic isoamylase. Among the patients with chronic pancreatitis, either in painful relapse (N = 19) or with pancreatic cysts (N = 15), the respective percentages of enzymes elevations were: 79 and 80% for elastase 1, 68 and 67% for trypsinogen, 63 and 73% for pancreatic isoamylase, 58 and 60% for lipase, 53 and 60% for amylase. In the 52 chronic pancreatitis patients studied during clinical remission, serum enzyme behavior varied greatly, and a majority of the assays (60%) were normal; even in the case of severe pancreatic exocrine insufficiency, normal as well as abnormally high and low enzyme values were seen. Highly variable enzyme behavior was also seen in the 40 patients with pancreatic cancer, and elastase I was the most frequently (35%) elevated enzyme in this group as well. Among the patients with abdominal pain of nonpancreatic origin, abnormally high enzyme levels were present in percentages ranging from 6% for lipase to 21% for trypsinogen.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Cancer, pancreatitis, and the detection of the isoenzymes of DNAase, RNAase and amylase.Substrate films of starch, RNA, and DNA were used to identify the isoenzymes of amylase, RNAase, and DNAase found in human ductal pancreatic juice subjected to isoelectric focusing. The pancreatic secretions from 15 patients were shown to contain as many as four isoenzymes of RNAase; the two major forms had isoelectric points of 7.87 and 7.52, and the two minor forms, of 7.25 and 6.90. Six DNAase bands were detected; the major bands had pI values of 4.86 and 4.79, and sometimes appeared as one band. The minor bands had pI values of 5.08, 5.00, 4.68, and 4.58. Purified bovine DNAase I, analyzed similarly, showed four bands (5.29, 5.19, 5.04 and 4.96). Nine isoenzymes of alpha-amylase were observed in the secretions from 15 patients. The major alpha-amylase isoenzyme had a pI value of 6.84 in 14 patients and of 7.04 in 1 patient. Secondary bands were seen with pI values of 6.23, 6.53 and 6.69. Additional isoenzymes were found with pI values of 7.16, 6.39, 6.00 and 5.78. The amylase isoenzyme with a pI value of 6.39 was found in 7 of the 8 patients with a normal pancreas or carcinoma of the pancreas, and in only 1 of 7 patients with acute or chronic pancreatitis.Serum amylase, isoamylase, and lipase in the acute abdomen. Their diagnostic value for acute pancreatitis.We evaluated the diagnostic value of serum amylase, isoamylase, and lipase for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis from sera of patients with acute abdominal pain. Comparison was first made in condition A between 32 patients with image-proven pancreatitis and 414 patients with nonpancreatic acute abdomen (the control group), then in condition B, between 62 pancreatitis patients with or without image proof and the control group. We found (a) that patients with image-proven pancreatitis suffer a more severe clinical course than those without; (b) that the sensitivity, positive predictive value, and accuracy in condition B are higher than in condition A at any cutoff level; (c) that none of the enzyme assays is specific at the upper reference limit, but their diagnostic yields are much improved by raising cutoff levels to about three or four times the upper limit; and (d) that at these selected cutoff levels, amylase had a diagnostic value similar to p-isoamylase or lipase in both conditions (sensitivity 84% and 92% for amylase in conditions A and B, respectively; specificity 98% and 98%; positive predictive value 75% and 90%; negative predictive value 99% and 99%; accuracy 91% and 97%). In conclusion, at an appropriately selected cutoff level, amylase can be effectively used as the first-line test and isoamylase or lipase as adjunct tests for acute abdominal conditions.Significant hyperamylasaemia in conditions other than acute pancreatitis.[Amylase clearance compared to creating clearance in diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].A simple quantitative index of the P3 amylase isoenzyme in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Following a report (Legaz, M.E. and Kenny, M.A. (1976) Clin. Chem. 22, 57--62) that the amylase isoenzyme, P3, is elevated in acute pancreatitis but not in other conditions a new "P3 Index" is proposed. This reflects the ratio of the P3 isoenzyme to the major salivary isoenzyme, S1. The P3 Index eliminates the problems of peak overlap which prevent accurate detection or direct quantitation of P3. In acute pancreatitis a large increase in 3 produces a serum P3 Index of below 80%. Normal serum exhibits a P3 Index of above 80%. Most causes of hyperamylasaemia observed without acute pancreatitis also exhibited a P3 Index of above 80%. The P3 Index seems to be a useful aid to the diagnosis or exclusion of acute pancreatitis in patients exhibiting equivocal hyperamylasaemia.[Diagnostic and prognostic significance of diastase in acute pancreatitis].Point-of-care urine trypsinogen-2 test for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.To assess a point-of-care urine trypsinogen-2 (UT) test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.This was a prospective study of patients presenting to the emergency department with abdominal pain suggestive of acute pancreatitis. A 3-minute point-of-care UT test (Actim Pancreatitis; Medix Biochemica, Kauniainen, Finland) was compared with final diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, which was based on suggestive clinical features, serum lipase and/or amylase levels and imaging.Of 124 patients included in this study, 69 patients had final diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. The sensitivity and specificity of UT were, respectively, 73.9% (95% CI 61.9% to 83.8%) and 94.6% (95% CI 84.9% to 98.9%).The point-of-care UT test for acute pancreatitis had good sensitivity and specificity, and can be used reliably at the bedside to make a positive diagnosis.[Acute pancreatitis and biochemical markers. Isoamylase].Amylase activity in blood and urine, lipase activity in blood, and amylase/creatinine clearance ratio have been prospectively compared in order to test these parameters against estimation of pancreatic isoamylase. Pancreatic isoamylase had been evaluated by inhibition methodology and not by electrophoresis. One hundred patients admitted for strictly sus-umbilical abdominal pain in emergency unit have been studied. Results show that we do not have in blood specific biochemical marker for acute pancreatitis. Lipase and P isoamylase activity evaluation have about the same specificity. In emergency situation the choice of routine investigation will be rather based on methodological simplicity and lower cost.Evaluation of Pankrin, a new serum test for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Evaluation of a new serum test for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.One hundred and sixty-three patients presenting with acute abdominal pain were included into the study. Acute pancreatitis was diagnosed by CT or ultrasound. Serum samples were taken 0-1 days, 2-3 days, and 4-5 days after onset of symptoms and C-reactive protein, lipase, elastase, and amylase were determined. As a further parameter, Pankrin, a newly available kit for the measurement of a mixture of elastase and other pancreatic secretory proteins was used. As control, serum from 558 apparently healthy blood donors was analysed. The receiver operator characteristics (ROC) and the areas under the curves (AUC) were calculated for each individual test.In Western blot analysis the antibodies of the Pankrin assay detected the majority of protein bands in human pancreatic juice. In blood donors, the median value of Pankrin was 88 U/ml (range 14-316 U/ml). In 16 from 163 patients with acute abdominal pain, acute pancreatitis was diagnosed and the median Pankrin level in samples collected on days 0-1 was 345 U/ml (range 220-518 U/ml, p<0.0001). In those patients with abdominal pain but without pancreatitis, the median was 116 U/ml (range 17-396 U/ml). The ROC-curves for amylase, lipase, elastase, and Pankrin from samples collected after 0-1 days were similar (area under the curves (AUC) >0.98). After 2-3 days, the AUC of all markers decreased (AUC 0.80-0.89) and after 4-5 days the AUC of Pankrin (0.85) was higher than all other parameters.In those patients with abdominal pain, who present several days after onset of pain, the new serum test for pancreatitis, Pankrin, could be of help to improve the diagnosis of pancreatitis.Should serum pancreatic lipase replace serum amylase as a biomarker of acute pancreatitis?Serum pancreatic lipase may improve the diagnosis of pancreatitis compared to serum amylase. Both enzymes have been measured simultaneously at our hospital allowing for a comparison of their diagnostic accuracy.Seventeen thousand five hundred and thirty-one measurements of either serum amylase and or serum pancreatic lipase were made on 10 931 patients treated at a metropolitan teaching hospital between January 2001 and May 2003. Of these, 8937 were initially treated in the Emergency Department. These results were collected in a database, which was linked by the patients' medical record number to the radiology and medical records. Patients with either an elevated lipase value or a discharge diagnosis of acute pancreatitis had their radiological diagnosis reviewed along with their biochemistry and histology record. The diagnosis of acute pancreatitis was made if there was radiological evidence of peripancreatic inflammation.One thousand eight hundred and twenty-five patients had either elevated serum amylase and or serum pancreatic lipase. The medical records coded for pancreatitis in a further 55 whose enzymes were not elevated. Three hundred and twenty of these had radiological evidence of acute pancreatitis. Receiver operator characteristic analysis of the initial sample from patients received in the Emergency Department showed improved diagnostic accuracy for serum pancreatic lipase (area under the curve (AUC) 0.948) compared with serum amylase (AUC, 0.906, P < 0.05). A clinically useful cut-off point would be at the diagnostic threshold; 208 U/L (normal <190 U/L) for serum pancreatic lipase and 114 U/L (normal 27-100 U/L) for serum amylase where the sensitivity was 90.3 cf., 76.8% and the specificity was 93 cf., 92.6%. 18.8% of the acute pancreatitis patients did not have elevated serum amylase while only 2.9% did not have elevated serum pancreatic lipase on the first emergency department measurement.It is concluded that serum pancreatic lipase is a more accurate biomarker of acute pancreatitis than serum amylase.Serum pancreatic enzyme assays in acute abdomen: a comparative prospective study.Serum amylase, pancreatic isoamylase, lipase, trypsinogen and elastase-1 were measured in 100 consecutive patients who were emergency admissions to a surgical department, and in 27 selected patients with proven acute pancreatitis who served as controls. The final diagnoses in the 100 patients of the study group were: acute pancreatitis in eight patients, other digestive diseases in 87, and urogenital tract diseases in five. In the control group, pancreas-specific enzymes were abnormally high in all patients and amylase in 26 out of 27. In the study group, all enzymes were markedly high in all eight patients with acute pancreatitis. In the remaining 92 patients, serum amylase was abnormally high in seven, and at least one pancreatic enzyme was elevated in 16. These elevations were generally mild. The diagnostic efficiency, i.e., the percentage of patients correctly classified, was 96% for pancreatic isoamylase and lipase, 93% for amylase, 91% for elastase-1, and 84% for trypsinogen. We conclude that serum lipase turbidimetric assay is the most suitable test for emergency diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, because it is highly sensitive and specific and simply and quickly performed.Evaluation of lipase levels in patients with nephropathia epidemica--no evidence for acute pancreatitis.The most common causative agent for hemorrhagic fever with renal syndrome in Germany is Puumala virus (PUUV) and a high percentage of patients with PUUV infection have gastrointestinal (GI) symptoms. The aim of the present study was to determine the prevalence of increased lipase levels and acute pancreatitis during nephropathia epidemica (NE) in 166 patients from Germany.Clinical and laboratory data during the acute phase of the disease were obtained from medical reports and files from 456 patients during acute hantavirus infection. Patients in whom serum lipase levels were determined during acute course of the disease were included in the study.Lipase levels at the time of diagnosis were determined in 166 of the 456 NE patients (36%). Of the 166 patients, 25 (15%) had elevated lipase levels at the time of admission to hospital or first contact with general practitioner/nephrologist. In total 7 patients had a threefold increased serum lipase above the normal range. Abdominal pain was not more often present in the group of patients with elevated serum lipase compared to the lipase-negative group (9/25 vs 58/141). Abdominal ultrasound and CT scans revealed no signs of pancreatitis in any of the patients. Patients with elevated serum lipase had higher serum creatinine peak levels (p = 0.03) during the course of the disease.Elevated lipase levels were common in our patient cohort and might reflect a more severe form of NE. NE does not lead to acute pancreatitis.The value of clinical laboratory studies in acute pancreatitis.Validity of the urinary trypsinogen-2 test in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.A simple urinary trypsinogen-2 test was evaluated for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.This prospective multicenter study enrolled consecutive patients with acute abdominal pain who presented to the emergency department or who were hospitalized at 1 of 21 medical institutions in Japan. Patients were tested with urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test and a quantitative trypsinogen-2 assay, and these values were compared with serum amylase and lipase findings.A total of 412 patients were enrolled. The trypsinogen-2 dipstick test was positive in 107 of 156 patients with acute pancreatitis (sensitivity, 68.6%) and in 33 of 256 patients with nonpancreatic abdominal pain (specificity, 87.1%). The sensitivity for the diagnosis of pancreatitis caused by alcohol and gallstones by the dipstick test was 72.2% and 81.8%, respectively, which was much higher than those associated with amylase testing. There are several degrees of positivity within the urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test. Modification of the cutoff point such that positive (+) and most positive (++) results were interpreted as a positive result, the specificity and positive likelihood ratio increased to 92.2% and 7.63, respectively.This simple, rapid, easy, and noninvasive urinary trypsinogen-2 test can diagnose or rule out most cases of acute pancreatitis.Serum elastase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis: a prospective study.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the usefulness of the elastase 1 (E1) enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. This is the first Australian evaluation of the E1 ELISA.Three groups of patients were prospectively assessed: control patients, patients with acute pancreatitis, and patients with acute non-pancreatitic abdominal pain. Serum was collected on all patients on admission and the sensitivity, specificity and diagnostic accuracy of serum elastase, amylase and lipase was determined.Twenty-nine patients with 30 episodes of pancreatitis, 38 patients with acute non-pancreatitic abdominal pain and 121 control patients were studied. For all patient episodes E1 ELISA at a cut-off of 3.5 ng/mL had a sensitivity of 80%, specificity of 96% and an efficiency of 94% in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis. For episodes more than 48 h after onset of symptoms, sensitivity was 100%, specificity was 96% and diagnostic efficiency was 96%. This performance was equivalent to amylase but inferior to lipase.Of the biochemical markers for pancreatitis currently available, lipase is the most useful. The relatively inferior sensitivity and problematic reference range for the ELISA E1, together with its limitations in measuring total elastase, currently prevent its widespread use.Acute pancreatitis. Normal serum amylase does not exclude severe acute pancreatitis.[Role of certain enzymatic systems in different forms of acute pancreatitis].[RESEARCH ON THE BEHAVIOR OF AMYLASE IN ACUTE PANCREATITIS].Post-ERCP pancreatitis and hyperamylasemia: patient-related and operative risk factors.Previous studies on the development of post-endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (post-ERCP) hyperamylasemia and pancreatitis have focused on different risk factors, either procedure- or patient-related, and also prognostic factors, such as amylase levels together with the occurrence of pancreatic-type pain, which might be implicated. The aim of this study is to identify possible predictive risk factors and also prognostic factors in order to better organize the treatment strategy.During a 5-year period, 556 ERCP procedures were performed by the same operator. Of these, 43 procedures were excluded from the study. Data recorded from the procedures included both patient characteristics and procedure details. Patients were evaluated for pancreatic-type pain at 4 and 24 h after the procedure, and serum amylase levels were determined at 2 and 24 h after the procedure. Pancreatitis was diagnosed on the basis of both clinical and laboratory examination, while patients with hyperamylasemia were in a normal clinical condition but had high serum amylase levels.Post-ERCP pancreatitis occurred after 17 procedures (3.3%) and hyperamylasemia after 85 procedures (16.5%). Patients who developed pancreatitis all had pancreatic-type pain together with amylase levels higher than 4-5 times the upper normal limit at 24 h after ERCP. There was a significant association between serum amylase levels and post-procedure pancreatic-type pain both at 4 h and 24 h after ERCP (P = 0.006). Age less than 50 years, history of relapsing pancreatitis, pancreatic duct opacification, and difficulty in obtaining bile duct cannulation all proved to be significant predictive risk factors for the development of either hyperamylasemia or pancreatitis. In contrast, additional procedures and sphincterotomy seemed to reduce the likelihood of both complications.Serum amylase levels higher than 4 - 5 times the normal upper limit together with the existence of pancreatic-type pain, at 24 h after ERCP, strongly suggest the occurrence of pancreatitis. When any of the predictive risk factors coexist during a procedure it would be better either to abandon the procedure and try again later or, if the situation is urgent, to have earlier recourse to an alternative, such as precut or needle-knife papillotomy.Urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip in detecting ERCP-induced pancreatitis.We have evaluated a new urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip, based on the principle of immunochromatography, in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis induced by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).One hundred six consecutive patients undergoing ERCP (with opacification of the pancreatic duct) at the Helsinki University Central Hospital were included in the study. Patients were tested with a urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip six hours after ERCP. Quantitative trypsinogen-2 as well as serum and urine amylase values were measured before the procedure and six hours after it.In patients developing pancreatitis after ERCP, the median urinary trypsinogen-2 concentration six hours after the endoscopic procedure was 1780 micrograms/l (range 29-10,700 micrograms/l), and in patients without pancreatitis the median concentration was 3.6 micrograms/l (range 0.1-3390 micrograms/l; P < 0.0001). The sensitivity and specificity figures for the urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip results in diagnosing post-ERCP pancreatitis were comparable (81% and 97%, respectively) to those for serum amylase (91% and 96%) and urine amylase measurements (81% and 95%). The test strip showed a good correlation (kappa = 0.75) with the quantitative trypsinogen-2 assay.The increase in urinary trypsinogen-2 concentration after ERCP reflects pancreatic injury, and can be detected by the test strip. Patients should be tested before the ERCP procedure as well, since elevated baseline values occur. The test is reliable and easy to perform even on an outpatient basis. However, its clinical usefulness requires evaluation in further trials.[Significance of serum lipase measurement for the diagnosis of acute and chronic pancreatic disease].Early prediction of severity in acute pancreatitis by urinary trypsinogen activation peptide: a multicentre study.There is a pressing clinical requirement for an early simple test of severity in acute pancreatitis. We investigated the use of an assay of trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP).We undertook a multicentre study in 246 patients (172 with acute pancreatitis [35 with severe disease], 74 controls). We assessed the predictive value of urinary TAP concentrations measured by a validated competitive immunoassay. We compared the results with those for plasma C-reactive protein and three clinicobiochemical scoring systems. TAP and C-reactive protein concentrations were analysed at set times after symptom onset and compared with the clinicobiochemical systems scores at key times during hospital stay.At 24 h after symptom onset, the median urinary TAP concentration was 37 nmol/L (IQR 17-110) for severe and 15 nmol/L (5-35) for mild disease (p<0.001). The respective values for plasma C-reactive protein were 24 mg/L (3-34) and 25 mg/L (6-75; p=0.208). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive, and negative predictive values of the test to show severe acute pancreatitis compared with mild acute pancreatitis at 24 h were: for TAP (>35 nmol/L), 58%, 73%, 39%, and 86%, respectively, and for C-reactive protein (>150 mg/L), 0%, 90%, 0%, and 75%. 48 h after admission the values for the clinicobiochemical scoring systems were: APACHE II (> or =8), 56%, 64%, 30%, and 85%; Ranson score (> or =3), 89%, 64%, 38%, and 96%; and Glasgow score (> or =3), 77%, 75%, 44%, and 93%. At 48 h, the values for C-reactive protein were 86%, 61%, 37%, and 94% and for TAP were 83%, 72%, 44%, and 94%. Combined testing of C-reactive protein and TAP was not superior to TAP alone for accuracy.Urinary TAP provided accurate severity prediction 24 h after onset of symptoms. This single marker of severity in acute pancreatitis deserves routine clinical application.[Value of blood lipase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].[Enzyme activity of blood and urine in acute pancreatites].[Diagnostic value of various laboratory parameters in acute pancreatitis].In 427 samples of serum and urine, collected during their stay at hospital from 40 patients affected with acute pancreatitis, the sensitivity and the specifity of total amylase and lipase in serum, total amylase and pancreas isoamylase in urine, as well as the amylase-/creatinine clearance were determined. The pancreas isoamylase in serum was used as reference value. It appeared that the sensitivity of the lipase was next to that of the pancreas isoamylase in serum, even in limit ranges. Usually the lipase stayed pathological the longest and could therefore be used to identify in the best way even an easing-off pancreatitis. The diagnostic accuracy of the total amylase in serum and urine, of the pancreatic isoamylase in urine and of the amylase-/creatinine clearance was found to be obviously less reliable. The specifity of all examined tests was reduced in patients with renal insufficiency, liver disease, alcohol abuse and in patients with abdominal pains of non pancreatic origin. Concluding form our results and with regard to the expenditure of laboratory technique and to the time required by the methods of determination, we found that of all the examined parameters, the lipase was the most convenient for both emergency and routine diagnose of an acute pancreatitis.Strategic use of individual and combined enzyme indicators for acute pancreatitis analyzed by receiver-operator characteristics.The optimal strategy for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis with enzyme assay results as indicators was evaluated in 67 emergency cases in whom this condition was suspected. We measured urine amylase expressed as activity concentration (U/L), timed excretion (U/h), and amylase/creatinine clearance ratio, and also serum amylase, elastase, lipase, and trypsinogen, at admission and repeatedly during hospitalization. The receiver-operator characteristic function was used to evaluate the diagnostic discrimination of each variable among initial findings and among the highest individual findings established retrospectively. We applied the same treatment to multiple univariate discrimination, using the six possible pairs and the four possible triplets of serum indicators. The results suggest that such urine assays should be abandoned, that all individual serum assays combine about 0.9 sensitivity with 0.9 specificity, that pairing of two assays does not clearly enhance discrimination, and that triplets of tests may degrade discrimination. The trade-off between sensitivity and specificity is a function not only of the chosen decision threshold but also of the sampling strategy (initial vs highest values) and of the interpretation rule (Boolean "and" vs "or" strategy).[Usefulness of amylase isoenzyme determination for the diagnosis of pancreatic diseases].Serum amylase shows the greatest increase among the various pancreatic enzymes that increase at the onset of acute pancreatitis. However, the diagnostic value of the total serum amylase activity has been questioned due to its lack of specificity. To differentiate hyperamylasemia due to pancreatic disease from that due to other causes, the activity of pancreatic amylase should be determined by using a monoclonal antibody that specifically binds to pancreatic or salivary amylase, or by electrophoresis. The most useful and accurate method for distinguishing pancreatic from salivary-type hyperamylasemia is isoamylase analysis by electrophoresis. In patients with acute pancreatitis, increase of Amylase-1 and -2 is accompanied by the appearance of Amylase-4, a minor component of the pancreatic-type isoamylases, and by disappearance of the salivary-type isoenzymes, thereby leaving a pattern of the pancreatic isoenzymes alone. This pancreatitis pattern persists for about 10 days after the onset of illness. Therefore, if such a pattern is found in a patient with clinical findings suggesting acute pancreatitis despite a normal serum amylase level, the patient can be diagnosed as having acute pancreatitis or a recent attack of the disease. However, the existence of an inherited trait of the pancreatitis pattern in some healthy individuals must be borne in mind. Patients with recurrent chronic pancreatitis also show pancreatic-type hyperamylasemia, whereas the pancreatic amylase activity decreases when pancreatic exocrine insufficiency progresses. Hyperamylasemia due to elevated salivary amylase activity is also common in patients with diabetic ketosis or malignancies such as lung cancer (adenocarcinoma). Hyperamylasemia is also found following various types of operation. In most cases, it is salivary-type hyperamylasemia.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Diagnostic value of routine isoamylase assay of hyperamylasemic serum.The purpose of this study was to determine if routine isoamylase assay would provide valuable diagnostic information in patients with hyperamylasemia. Isoamylase distribution was determined in sera of 37 consecutive hyperamylasemic patients. The attending physicians (without knowledge of the isoamylase level) had considered acute pancreatitis to be "probable" in 19, "possible" in 4, and "unlikely" in 14 of these 37 patients. Three of the patients considered probably to have pancreatitis and 3 thought possibly to have pancreatitis had normal serum pancreatic isoamylase levels. Knowledge of the normal pancreatic isoamylase level in these 6 patients probably would have changed the clinical diagnosis to some condition other than pancreatitis. Of the 14 hyperamylasemic patients thought "unlikely" to have pancreatitis, 7 had an elevation of just pancreatic isoamylase and 3 additional patients had elevation of both pancreatic and salivary isoamylases. It seems likely that knowledge of these elevated pancreatic isoamylase levels would have changed the clinical diagnosis to "probable" pancreatitis for many of these patients. We conclude that routine isoamylase assay provides diagnostic information that might change the clinical diagnosis in 20%--40% of hyperamylasemic patients.The diagnosis of acute pancreatitis: enhanced sensitivity from an ELISA assay of lipase.An enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for human pancreatic lipase was compared, for diagnostic sensitivity, to a chromogenic assay of total plasma amylase in 37 patients with acute pancreatitis. Data from patients were related to a control group of 38 patients with gastrointestinal disease but without pancreatic diseases. During the first 24 hours of admission, lipase was elevated 131 standard deviations (SD) above the mean of the control range compared to 25 SD for amylase (p less than 0.001). When amylase fell to within the control range (less than 531 iu/l) lipase was still elevated at a mean of 11 SD above the control mean. In patients followed for longer, lipase usually remained above normal for at least ten days, whereas amylase lay within 1 SD of the mean of the control samples in most plasma samples after 4 days. These data show that lipase is considerably more sensitive than total amylase for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.The Rapignost-Amylase test in acute pancreatitis.Serum lipase: a better test to diagnose acute alcoholic pancreatitis.To determine whether serum lipase is a better test than serum amylase to diagnose acute alcoholic pancreatitis.Two hundred two asymptomatic chronic alcoholics (Group A) and 29 patients with image-proven pancreatitis (Group P).Serum lipase was measured using the Kodak Ektachem clinical chemistry slide. Serum amylase was estimated using the Kodak Ektachem clinical chemistry slide or the Beckman Astra amylase chemistry module.The level of serum amylase in Group A ranged from 17 to 347 U/L (mean 71, SD +/- 36 U/L) and in Group P from 180 to 2,985 U/L (mean 722, SD +/- 663 U/L). Thirteen of 29 patients (45%) with image-proven pancreatitis had levels that overlapped those found in asymptomatic alcoholics. The serum lipase levels in Group A ranged from 34 to 600 U/L (mean 186, SD +/- 111 U/L), while in Group P, the corresponding figures were 1,011 to 25,706 U/L (mean 5,822, SD +/- 5,664 U/L). None of the 29 patients with image-proven pancreatitis had levels that overlapped those found in asymptomatic alcoholics.Serum lipase is a better test that serum amylase to diagnose acute alcoholic pancreatitis.Biochemical evaluation of patients with acute pancreatitis.In this study we determined the clinical accuracy of alpha2-macroglobulin, alpha-amylase, C-reactive protein, lipase, non-esterified fatty acids, pancreatic alpha-amylase and phospholipase A in the diagnosis and prognosis of acute pancreatitis in a group of patients with acute abdominal pain using receiver operator characteristic curve analysis. We investigated 59 patients with acute pancreatitis and 72 patients with extrapancreatic diseases of gastrointestinal origin. On the basis of initial enzyme activities, at cut-offs of 245 U/l for amylase, 656 U/l for lipase, and 182 U/l for pancreatic alpha-amylase, the diagnostic efficiencies were 0.993, 0.980, and 0.975, respectively. Receiver operator characteristic curve analysis showed the same diagnostic accuracies. We evaluated the accuracy of serum alpha2-macroglobulin, C-reactive protein, non-esterified fatty acids and phospholipase A for differentiation between acute necrotizing pancreatitis and acute oedematous pancreatitis. C-reactive protein had the highest prognostic accuracy of the parameters studied (the area under curve = 0.9082) and at a cut-off value of 126 mg/l, sensitivity and specificity were 0.759 and 0.912, respectively. The role of the clinical laboratory in the investigation of patients with acute pancreatitis continues to evolve and biochemical parameters are a good diagnostic and prognostic option.Evaluation and comparison of cathodic trypsin-like immunoreactivity, pancreatic lipase and pancreatic isoamylase in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in 849 consecutive patients with acute abdominal pain.In 849 patients (417 men, 432 women) consecutively hospitalized with acute abdominal pain we compared the value of serum cathodic trypsin-like immunoreactivity, pancreatic lipase (EC 3.2.1.3) and pancreatic isoamylase (EC 3.2.1.1) as diagnostic tests for acute pancreatitis. The diagnoses of acute pancreatitis (in 49 patients, 5.8%) and other diseases were made without knowledge of these enzyme values. When evaluated by means of receiver operating characteristic curves no differences were found in diagnostic performance of the three enzymes. Use of combinations of different enzymes had no advantage over single enzyme determination using discrimination analysis for evaluation. The highest efficiency was for all three enzymes 0.991 (95% confidence limits: 0.983-0.995) and for all three enzymes the discrimination value giving this efficiency was several times the upper limit of reference range: 1 779 micrograms/l for cathodic trypsin-like immunoreactivity, 831 U/l for pancreatic isoamylase and 316 micrograms/l for pancreatic lipase. None of the enzymes had any prognostic value at admission in predicting a mild or severe attack of acute pancreatitis. In conclusion, no single enzyme or combination of enzymes had any diagnostic advantage for acute pancreatitis in patients with acute abdominal pain. Thus selection of one of the three enzymes as diagnostic test of acute pancreatitis is to be based on considerations such as economy, methodological simplicity, possibility of automated assay and the time-consumption at the assay.[Experiences with our rapid lipase method for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Efficiency in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis increased by improved electrophoresis of amylase isoenzyme P3 on cellulose acetate.Serum from patients who have suffered acute pancreatitis contains P3, an isoenzyme of pancreatic-derived amylase (EC 3.2.1.1). Heretofore, complete resolution of P3 from the major salivary isoenzyme in serum, S1, has not been possible, thus compromising the diagnostic potential of P3 for pancreatitis. I describe an electrophoretic method for the essentially complete resolution of P3 from S1 by including CaCl2, 1 mmol/L, in the Tris barbiturate electrophoresis buffer (25 mmol/L, pH 8.8). I evaluated the clinical utility of the method for 129 consecutive patients suspected of having pancreatitis, by using receiver operating characteristic curve analysis for results for total amylase, P2, and P3 activity. For a true-positive rate of 90% with a prevalence of pancreatitis of 7.8%, the diagnostic efficiency was increased from 82% (total amylase) to 91% (P2) to 98% (P3). Thus, including P3 activity in the diagnostic criteria will eliminate most false-positive results for pancreatitis based on total amylase activity alone, and should decrease the need for expensive radiologic procedures currently required to confirm the presence of pancreatitis. I conclude that P3 can be of significant value in the differential diagnosis of pancreatitis from other syndromes with hyperamylasemia.The value of immunoreactive lipase in acute pancreatitis.We have evaluated a new agglutination test for serum immunoreactive lipase in 24 patients with abdominal pain and hyperamylasaemia. On admission all 20 patients with acute pancreatitis had a positive lipase test, 3 of the 4 patients who did not have pancreatitis had a negative lipase test. The sensitivity of the lipase test on day 1 is 100%, the specificity 96% and predictive value of a positive test is 95.2% compared to 83% for amylase. A negative test excludes pancreatitis. In addition, the test stays positive longer than hyperamylasaemia.[Informativeness of the methods of early clinical laboratory diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].In 92 patients with acute pancreatitis, the informative value of the available methods for laboratory investigations (general blood analysis, biochemical blood analysis with measurement of the level of total protein, bilirubin, glucose, ALAT, ASAT, amylase activity, amylase activity in the urine) was analysed. The authors consider that the indices studied are rather informative for independent reliable diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and differentiation of its forms.Increase in amylase clearance in relation to creatinin clearance during acute pancreatitis.Renal amylase clearance in relation to creatinin clearance (Cam/Ccr) was determined for 20 patients suffering from acute pancreatitis (AP). For each of them, the diagnosis rested upon operative or laparoscopic observation of characteristic anatomical or histological lesions. The average clearance relationship in these patients reached 16 +/- SEM 3.8%. These results were significantly higher than those obtained from 132 patients who had been hospitalized for other medical or surgical diseases, as well as from 51 test patients (p less than 0.001). The authors stressed the diagnostic importance of this test, in particular in the presence of a normal amylasemia level.[Diagnosis and treatment of acute pancreatitis].[Clinical value of determination of some enzymes and isoenzymes in acute pancreatitis].Amylase-creatinine clearance ratio in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.[On the laboratory diagnosis of the functional state of pancreas].The role of urine trypsinogen-2 test in the differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in the Emergency Department.The aim of the study was to investigate the role and importance of the urine trypsinogen-2 dipstick test in the differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis in the Emergency Department and to compare results with those of conventional tests.The study was performed prospectively in the patients admitting to the Emergency Department due to upper abdominal pain. Thirty-two of the 87 patients included in the study had acute pancreatitis diagnosis. Serum amylase, lipase, C-reactive protein (CRP) and urine trypsinogen-2 using Actim pancreatitis dipstick were studied in all patients. The statistical analysis was performed using SPSS 11.5 package program.Urine trypsinogen-2 was found positive in 21 (65.6%) of 32 patients. The sensitivity of the test for pancreatitis was identified as 64%, specificity as 85%, positive predictive value as 72%, and negative predictive value as 81%. These values were statistically significant compared to the control group (p<0.01).Although it has lower sensitivity and specificity compared to amylase and lipase, we suggest that urine trypsinogen-2 test may be an important diagnostic tool in excluding the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis, since it provides results within 5 minutes in the Emergency Department, is cheaper, has a higher negative predictive value, and is easy to use.[Biochemical studies in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Clinical value of rapid urine trypsinogen-2 test strip, urinary trypsinogen activation peptide, and serum and urinary activation peptide of carboxypeptidase B in acute pancreatitis.To assess the usefulness of urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip, urinary trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP), and serum and urine concentrations of the activation peptide of carboxypeptidase B (CAPAP) in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Patients with acute abdominal pain and hospitalized within 24 h after the onset of symptoms were prospectively studied. Urinary trypsinogen-2 was considered positive when a clear blue line was observed (detection limit 50 microg/L). Urinary TAP was measured using a quantitative solid-phase ELISA, and serum and urinary CAPAP by a radioimmunoassay method.Acute abdominal pain was due to acute pancreatitis in 50 patients and turned out to be extrapancreatic in origin in 22 patients. Patients with acute pancreatitis showed significantly higher median levels of serum and urinary CAPAP levels, as well as amylase and lipase than extrapancreatic controls. Median TAP levels were similar in both groups. The urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip was positive in 68% of patients with acute pancreatitis and 13.6% in extrapancreatic controls (P<0.01). Urinary CAPAP was the most reliable test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis (sensitivity 66.7%, specificity 95.5%, positive and negative predictive values 96.6% and 56.7%, respectively), with a 14.6 positive likelihood ratio for a cut-off value of 2.32 nmol/L.In patients with acute abdominal pain, hospitalized within 24 h of symptom onset, CAPAP in serum and urine was a reliable diagnostic marker of acute pancreatitis. Urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip showed a clinical value similar to amylase and lipase. Urinary TAP was not a useful screening test for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.[Usefulness of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].The clinical usefulness of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test is still in controversy. We evaluated the usefulness of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test in patients with acute pancreatitis.Urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test was prospectively performed in 50 patients with acute pancreatitis, 50 patients with non-pancreatic abdominal pain, and 50 healthy controls.On admission, urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test was positive in 36 of 50 patients with acute pancreatitis (sensitivity, 72%) and in 4 of 50 patients with non-pancreatic abdominal pain (specificity, 92%). On the other hand, it was all negative in controls. The sensitivity and specificity of serum lipase were 78% and 94%, respectively. At 24 hours after admission, the positive rate of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test rose from 72% to 94% (p=0.02). The results of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test was positive in 14 of 15 patients with severe pancreatitis and 22 of 35 patients with mild pancreatitis according to the criteria by Atlanta International Symposium, 1992.Urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test is comparable to serum lipase in diagnosing acute pancreatitis. Delayed measurement and severe pancreatitis are more likely to yield positive results with urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test. Thus, we suggest that the cut-off value of urinary trypsinogen-2 dipstick test should be lowered to increase its sensitivity.Serum markers in the early assessment of severity of acute pancreatitis: which is the most useful?Amylase thermolability: its application in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and pancreatic pseudocysts.[Value of biochemical and imaging procedures for the diagnosis and prognosis of acute pancreatitis--results of a prospective clinical study].For a period of 14 days we carried out measurements for alpha-1-protease inhibitor, alpha-2-macroglobulin, complement C 3, complement C 4, and C-reactive protein in two different groups of patients with acute pancreatitis. Group I consisted of 13 patients with edematous-interstitial pancreatitis and group II of 22 patients with necrotizing pancreatitis. Diagnosis of acute pancreatitis was established by clinical signs and symptoms, by specific pancreatic enzymes determined in the serum, by imaging procedures, and by laparotomy in 24 cases. The overall detection rate for pancreatic necrosis was 90% for the contrast enhanced CT and 33% for ultrasonography respectively. There were significant differences as to all measured serum parameters between the two morphologically defined pancreatitis groups. The necrosis detection rate was 95% for CRP and 85% for alpha-2-macroglobulin. The combined determination of CRP and alpha-2-macroglobulin is recommended in patients with acute pancreatitis to stage the severity of the disease and to probably replace the CT investigation.What is the best biochemical test to diagnose acute pancreatitis? A prospective clinical study.To determine which biochemical test is best to distinguish acute pancreatitis from other pancreatic and nonpancreatic diseases associated with hyperamylasemia.We conducted a prospective clinical study of 836 consecutive patients who had a total serum amylase test requested by a physician during a 7-month period.Radioimmunoassay and enzymatic activity methods were used to measure pancreas-specific proteins of varied size, charge, and stability. In addition, scoring systems were used for the diagnosis of pancreatitis, and statistical analyses were done to determine sensitivity and specificity.We found minor differences in sensitivity and specificity for diagnosis of acute pancreatitis among pancreatic isoamylase, phospholipase A2, colipase, lipase, and carboxylester lipase. Of these tests, the combination of isoamylase and phospholipase A2 had a small but statistically significant increased sensitivity (90%; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 74 to 98%) and specificity (93%; 95% CI = 91 to 95%) over isoamylase (90% and 92%, respectively; 95% CI = 90 to 94%) and phospholipase A2 (90% and 75%, respectively; 95% CI = 72 to 78%) alone for the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis.Pancreas-specific proteins are satisfactory for diagnosing acute pancreatitis if the test is validated by the laboratory. Clinically, the slight advantage of using both isoamylase and phospholipase A2 does not outweigh the expense of performing two assays; we recommend using isoamylase to diagnose acute pancreatitis.[Ratio of amylase clearance and creatinine clearance in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].In 21 healthy volunteers the ratio of amylase clearance and creatinine clearance (Cam/Ccr) was determined in urine collected at admission, after a 1-hour collection period and after a 2-hour collection period. The normal values were 1.8 +/- 1.6%, 1.9 +/- 2% and 2.0 +/- 1.7% respectively. They were comparable with those published by others. The reproducibility of the method was acceptable (r = 0.62). When compared with serum amylase determinations, Cam/Ccr showed neither better sensitivity in 19 patients suffering an acute episode of proven pancreatitis, nor better specificity in 19 patients with acute abdomen but no evidence of pancreatitis.Pancreatic amylase in serum for differential diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and acute abdominal diseases.[Clinical value of the analysis of amylase isoenzymes in the blood and urine of patients wih cholelithiasis without acute pancreatitis].Screening for acute pancreatitis: a rapid assay for plasma lipase.A simple agglutination test for plasma immunoreactive lipase has been evaluated in 101 patients. A positive agglutination reaction was observed if, and only if, plasma lipase exceeded 300 micrograms/l. The test was positive in all 23 patients with acute pancreatitis who were tested on the day of admission to hospital, in one patient with a pancreatitic pseudocyst and in one patient with hyperamylasaemia and hyperlipasaemia due to a perforated duodenal ulcer. The simplicity and reliability of this test make it suitable as an urgent diagnostic investigation for acute pancreatitis.Diagnosing acute pancreatitis in children: what is the diagnostic yield and concordance for serum pancreatic enzymes and imaging within 96 h of presentation?There are limitations and challenges with the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis (AP) in children. We evaluated the diagnostic yield and concordance for serum pancreatic enzymes and imaging in children with AP.A retrospective review of laboratory and radiographic results within 96 h of AP presentation (January 2000-July 2011) was performed at two paediatric hospitals. Observed agreement and kappa statistics () were determined between outcomes of bloods (lipase and/or amylase) and imaging (ultrasound (US) and/or computed tomography (CT)).A total of 103/131 (79%) AP cases had both bloods and imaging performed (within 96 h). Overall, lipase, amylase, US and CT were consistent with an AP diagnosis in 93% (93/100), 54% (43/80), 27% (21/77) and 67% (28/42) of cases respectively. The diagnostic yield for combinations of blood(s) and imaging(s) tests was higher than any single test and blood tests alone. The observed agreement between bloods 'lipase or amylase' and imaging 'US or CT,' was 40%. The  was -0.083 suggesting no agreement. In 55% of cases, enzymes were positive whilst imaging was negative and the converse was evident in 5% of cases. There was no agreement between the various diagnostic tests, except between amylase and US, which had fair agreement.Elevations in serum lipase contributed to the diagnosis more often than other tests. Combinations of blood(s) and imaging(s) tests have an increased diagnostic yield. Serum enzyme elevation and imaging changes poorly correlated. At least 5% of cases of AP may be missed if imaging is not performed.Assays of serum lipase: analytical and clinical considerations.We evaluated three commercially available methods for determining lipase (EC 3.1.1.3) in serum--the Du Pont aca, Boehringer Mannheim Diagnostics (BMD), and Kodak Ektachem (EK) procedures--for their analytical properties and diagnostic efficiencies. Titrimetry was used as the comparative method. The BMD and EK methods showed better agreement with the titrimetric method, owing to the presence of the necessary cofactor, colipase, in their reagents. Colipase also increased the analytical sensitivity of the BMD and EK procedures as compared with the aca method. Determinations of serum lipase, by all methods, had a clinical sensitivity in excess of 80% for acute pancreatitis; the specificity of the lipase test was about 60%, or twice that of serum amylase. Serum lipase determinations with the current, simpler technology are superior to total amylase in the diagnosis of patients with acute pancreatitis. When a colipase-supplemented method is used, a serum lipase value greater than 10-fold the upper reference limit appears to be pathognomonic for acute pancreatitis or inflammation of organs close to the pancreas.[Prognostic role trypsinogen-activating peptide in an acute pancreatitis].The level of trypsinogenactivating peptide (TAP) in the blood serum of patients with an acute pancreatitis was investigated. In patients with severe necrotic pancreatitis the TAP content was the highest one.[Serum lipase assay for clinical use. Critical study (author's transl)].An accurate, quick, and reproducible method to assay serum lipase activity allowed a parallel study of lipase and amylase in 147 patients. Lipase appeared very specific of pancreatic distress. In acute pancreatitis its increase was constant, frank, quick and lasting. It brought a diagnostic argument superior to the dosages of amylase activities in serum and/or urine. But its value as an evolutive and pronostic test was as much limited. Its interest as a negative argument for differential diagnosis was not superior either. In chronic pancreatic diseases, it gave evidence of massive spread or complications.Time-resolved immunofluorometric assay of trypsin-2 complexed with alpha 1-antitrypsin in serum.We developed a sensitive time-resolved immunofluorometric assay (IFMA) for trypsin-2 complexed with alpha 1-antitrypsin (AAT). We used a trypsin-2-specific monoclonal antibody on the solid phase and a europium-labeled polyclonal antibody to AAT as tracer. The detection limit is 0.05 microgram/L and the range of linearity extends to 100 micrograms/L. We compared the clinical utility of the trypsin-2-AAT assay with that of free trypsinogen-2 and amylase in serum by studying 120 healthy subjects, 29 patients with acute pancreatitis, 11 with extrahepatic biliary obstruction, and 34 with acute abdominal disorders of extrapancreatic origin. In patients with acute pancreatitis the median concentration of trypsin-2-AAT in serum was 59-fold that in healthy controls, 42-fold that in patients with biliary obstruction, and 33-fold that in patients with acute abdominal disorders of extrapancreatic origin. These differences are greater than those for trypsinogen-2 (19-, 20-, and 28-fold, respectively) and amylase (5.4-, 6.5-, and 5.4-fold, respectively). Compared with the assays of free trypsinogen-2 and amylase, our assay of trypsin-2-AAT improved the clinical specificity for acute pancreatitis by eliminating false-positive results in our control groups. Increased concentrations of trypsin-2-AAT and trypsinogen-2 were also observed in patients with chronic renal failure undergoing dialysis.[Laboratory diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Urinary trypsinogen-2 test strip for acute pancreatitis.A simple, rapid test is specific and sensitive enough to distinguish, in patients with clinically suspected acute pancreatitis, those whose abdominal pain is indeed of pancreatic origin has proved elusive.In two consecutive series of surgical patients in a teaching hospital, whose acute abdominal pain turned out to be due to acute pancreatitis (n-57) or extrapancreatic in origin (n=40), we studied urinary trypsinogen-2 in two ways. A test strip, incorporating monoclonal antibodies to two epitopes on trypsinogen-2, recorded a blue line when concentrations exceeded 50 microgram/L; we also measured trypsinogen-2 concentrations in the laboratory.In the patients with acute pancreatitis the test strip was positive in 52 and negative in five, whereas in the 40 extrapancreatic controls there were four false positives. In a further set of 57 orthopaedic controls, one urine was strip-test positive. Concentrations of urinary trypsinogen-2 and the test-strip results were in good agreement and in only three of the 154 patients were the two approaches discrepant, at the 50 microgram/L cut-off.These findings, in patients whose acute abdominal pain was known to be pancreatic in origin or not, are encouraging but need to be confirmed in a consecutive series of patients in whom the diagnosis of pancreatitis is in doubt.The screening value of the amylase-creatinine clearance ratio in acute pancreatitis.The screening value of the amylase creatinine clearance ratio in acute pancreatitis is studied. A series of 28 patients with pancreatic disease is compared with 80 controls and 82 patients with other intra-abdominal disease. The greatest specificity of the amylase creatinine clearance ratio value is reached at the 3.5 level. The amylase creatinine clearance ratio value proves to be of interest, not only in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis but also in differentiating mild and heavy forms of pancreatitis.Interpretation of serum amylase levels in the critically ill patient.To understand better the incidence and meaning of hyperamylasemia in the intensive care setting, cellulose acetate membrane electrophoresis was used to measure the isoenzymes of serum amylase in 192 patients with a variety of critical illnesses. Seventy of these patients had elevated serum amylase levels, but none had clinical or biochemical evidence of acute pancreatitis or renal failure. Of the 70 patients who had hyperamylasemia, in only 18 (26%) was it due solely to an elevation of the pancreatic isoamylase fraction. The remaining 52 patients were hyperamylasemic due to elevations in the nonpancreatic isoamylase fraction or elevations in both pancreatic and nonpancreatic isoamylase fractions. These data indicate that hyperamylasemia in the absence of clinical pancreatic disease is common in the ICU and is frequently caused by nonpancreatic production of serum amylase. Caution is, therefore, advised in interpreting elevated serum amylase levels in critically ill patients.Rapid measurement of urinary trypsinogen-2 as a screening test for acute pancreatitis.Serum trypsinogen activation peptide in the assessment of the diagnosis and severity of acute pancreatic damage: a pilot study using a new determination technique.To evaluate the clinical value of a new direct and competitive immunoassay for trypsinogen activation peptide (TAP) determination in acute pancreatitis (AP).The subjects were 34 patients with AP (22 mild, 12 severe), 12 patients with nonpancreatic acute abdominal pain (AA), 11 healthy subjects (HS), and 16 consecutive patients who underwent therapeutic ERCP (ERCP). Serum TAP, amylase, and lipase levels were determined in AP, AA, and HS at their initial observation; the AP patients were also studied for 6 consecutive days after admission. In the ERCP patients, serum TAP, amylase, and lipase levels, as well as urine TAP and amylase levels, were determined before and 6 hours after endoscopy.Serum TAP levels on admission were 0.35 +/- 1.60 OD (mean +/- SD) in AP patients and 0.005 +/- 0.001 OD in AA patients, while HS patients had no detectable serum TAP levels. ERCP patients had no detectable serum TAP levels before and 6 hours after the ERCP, whereas urine TAP concentrations were 1.72 +/- 3.43 OD and 0.75 +/- 1.49 OD before and 6 hours after the execution of the endoscopy, respectively (P = 0.249). The sensitivities and specificities of serum TAP, amylase, and lipase levels in discriminating between AP and AA were 23.5% and 91.7%, 94.1% and 100%, and 97.1% and 100%, respectively, while those used in the assessment of the severity of AP were 29.9% and 73.5%, 38.8% and 81.2%, and 28.4% and 83.6%, respectively.TAP is of limited value in assessing the diagnosis and the severity of acute pancreatic damage.[Outcome of clinical application for medical test: "Actim pancreatitis test for acute pancreatitis diagnostics and control test"].The hourly rate of urinary amylase excretion, serum amylase, and serum lipase. II. Patients with gastrointestinal and pancreatic disorders.Gastrointestinal disease other than hepatobiliary and pancreatic disorders was associated with hourly rates of urinary amylase excretion above the limits of normal for control subjects (88 IU/hour compared with 69 IU/hour). In hepatobiliary disease, excretion rates of more than 88 but usually less than 190 IU/hour were sometimes found. Whilst rates of urinary amylase excretion were not helpful in the diagnosis of chronic pancreatitis or carcinoma of the pancreas, levels above 190 IU/hour were found in acute pancreatitis at a time when the serum levels were also diagnostic. After the acute episode the rate of urinary amylase excretion was moderately elevated for up to six days but did not reach diagnostic levels. Persistent elevation of serum amylase and lipase levels and hourly rates of urinary amylase excretion for more than six days suggested that a pseudocyst had developed. In acute pancreatitis the level of serum lipase was more frequently raised and persisted so for longer than either the serum or urinary amylase. Although the hourly rate of urinary amylase excretion is of little value alone, when performed in conjunction with evaluating the serum amylase and lipase it may provide useful additional evidence of pancreatic disease and it could be useful in the diagnosis of relapsing chronic pancreatitis.[Diagnostic and prognostic significance of urinary amylase in acute biliary pancreatitis].The diagnostic significance of amylasuria in the early period of an acute biliary pancreatitis (ABP) course was estimated in 70 patients. High sensitivity of the test during 3 days of the disease course was ascertained as well as a lack of specificity of the criterion concerning differential diagnosis with an acute cholecystitis. The interrelationship between the enzyme activity and lethality was not revealed. It is necessary to take into account the peculiarities of the amylasuria diagnostic-prognostical significance while substantiation of diagnostic program and the treatment tactics for ABP.[Usefulness of determining urinary trypsinogen-2 in diagnosis and prognosis of patients with acute pancreatitis].To study the role of urinary trypsinogen-2 in diagnosing and early prognosis of patients with acute pancreatitis (AP) and the relationship to length of hospital stay and mortality.Forty-two patients were included in the study. In all cases, blood cell count, serum chemistry, urine amylase and urine trypsinogen-2 were measured. A cut-off of 50 microg/L was established and, when positive, a second dilution was made (2000 microg/L). Other variables included were etiology, mean length of hospital stay, transfer to an ICU and death.Out of the 42 patients, 29 (69%) were men and 13 (31%) women. Average age was 61 years. The most frequent cause was biliary, followed by alcohol. Mean hospital stay was 8.38 days. Transferred to an ICU: 4 (9.5%) patients. Two of them and a third, who had not been transferred, died (7.14%). High serum amylase was found in 33 (78.57%) patients and high lipase in 36 (85.71%). Urinary trypsinogen-2 was positive in 34 patients (80.95%). Statistical association between urinary trypsinogen-2 and age (p=0.016; r=0.893), glucose (p=0.005; r=0.901), serum amylase (p=0.029; r=0.852), lipase (p=0.022; r=0.809) and hypoxemia (p=0.001; r=0.962) was found. Regarding hospital stay, there was statistical association with age (p=0.046; r=0.784) and metabolic acidosis (p=0.016; r=0.839). With respect to mortality there was statistical association with hypocalcemia (p=0.008; r=0.899) and metabolic acidosis (p=0.032; r=0.814).Testing urinary trypsinogen-2 in patients with AP is rapid and useful. Patients over the age of 65 with hypoxia, metabolic acidosis and hypocalcemia tend to present a prolonged average hospital stay and higher mortality.Serum lipase, C-reactive protein, and interleukin-6 levels in ERCP-induced pancreatitis.C-reactive protein (CRP) and interleukin-6 (IL-6) are elevated in acute pancreatitis. Limited studies have evaluated their role in ERCP-induced pancreatitis. The aim of this study was to assess the role of serum lipase, CRP, and IL-6 in ERCP-induced pancreatitis.Eighty-five patients (62 women, 23 men; mean age 43 years; range 16-85 years) who underwent ERCP were entered in a prospective trial. ERCP-induced pancreatitis was classified as mild, moderate, or severe. Serum levels of lipase, CRP, and IL-6 were measured before ERCP and at 12 to 24 hours and 36 to 48 hours after ERCP.Mild, moderate, and severe pancreatitis occurred, respectively, in 9, 7, and 4 patients after ERCP. There were significant differences in levels of CRP and IL-6 but not lipase for patients with mild versus moderate and moderate versus severe pancreatitis. The mean CRP levels (mg/dL) at 12 to 24 hours were 0.98 +/- 0.24 in mild pancreatitis, 3.89 +/- 0.32 in moderate pancreatitis, and 12.0 +/- 1.60 in severe pancreatitis. The levels, respectively, at 36 to 48 hours were 1.60 +/- 0.31, 7.60 +/- 0.74, and 25.0 +/- 2.9. The mean IL-6 levels (pg/mL) at 12 to 24 hours were 16.6 +/- 2.06 in mild pancreatitis, 73.0 +/- 15.60 in moderate pancreatitis, and 235.5 +/- 26.31 in severe pancreatitis. The levels at 36 to 48 hours were, respectively, 18.92 +/- 3.28, 100.17 +/- 11.56, and 438.2 +/- 71.50.Serum CRP and IL-6 levels may be useful early markers for predicting the severity of ERCP-induced pancreatitis.Variations in amylase isoenzymes and lipase during acute pancreatitis, and in other disorders causing hyperamylasemia.We compare the clinical value of assay of amylase (EC 3.2.1.1) isoenzymes with that of lipase (EC 3.1.1.3) in serum from patients with proven acute pancreatitis or with hyperamylasemia from other causes. In the former group we measured amylase, lipase, and isoamylases daily. Lipase and P(pancreas)-type isoamylases reached the highest mean values on the first day of an attack of acute pancreatitis (day one). Lipase declined rapidly, and by day four its mean activity was about the same as that of amylase and lower than that of the P-type isoamylases. Great inter-individual variations were found among patients with a similar clinical course. Of the 85 samples analyzed, amylase activity for 36 declined to within reference limits, but 18 of the 36 had high lipase activity, 18 had high P-type isoamylases activity, and 31 had P3 isoenzyme, which is not detectable in normal sera. Determination of isoamylases is a more sensitive index to acute pancreatitis than lipase assay and may be particularly useful when pancreatitis is suspected despite a normal total amylase activity. In the group of patients with hyperamylasemia from other origins, three had macroamylasemia, one had mumps, one had abdominal trauma without pancreatic injury, and one had pelvic inflammatory disease. The specific pattern of macroamylase on electrophoresis permitted a precise diagnosis of macroamylasemia; normal lipase had only ruled out pancreatitis. In the three other cases, lipase and isoamylases excluded pancreatic involvement.Role of activation peptides from pancreatic proenzymes in the diagnosis and prognosis of acute pancreatitis.[Sensitivity and specificity of blood amylase, of the ratio of amylase and creatinine clearance, and of the ratio of urinary amylase and creatinine in the diagnosis of acute pancreatitis].Simultaneous determination of alpha-amylase and pancreatic lipase in acute episodes of pancreatitis.Serum complex of trypsin 2 and alpha 1 antitrypsin as diagnostic and prognostic marker of acute pancreatitis: clinical study in consecutive patients.To estimate the usefulness of serum concentrations of the complex of trypsin 2 and alpha 1 antitrypsin in diagnosing and assessing the severity of acute pancreatitis in comparison with serum C reactive protein, amylase, and trypsinogen 2 concentrations (reference markers).Markers were measured in consecutive patients admitted with acute abdominal pain that was either due to pancreatitis or to other disease unrelated to the pancreas (controls).Department of surgery of a teaching hospital in Helsinki.110 patients with acute pancreatitis and 66 with acute abdominal diseases of extrapancreatic origin. On the basis of the clinical course, acute pancreatitis was classified as mild (82 patients) or severe (28 patients).Clinical diagnosis of acute pancreatitis and severity of the disease.At admission all patients with acute pancreatitis had clearly raised concentrations of trypsin 2-alpha 1 antitrypsin complex (32 micrograms/l), whereas only three of the controls had such values. Of the markers studied, trypsin 2-alpha 1 antitrypsin complex had the largest area under the receiver operating curve, both in differentiating acute pancreatitis from extrapancreatic disease and in differentiating mild from severe disease.Of the markers studied, trypsin 2-alpha 1 antitrypsin complex was the most accurate in differentiating between acute pancreatitis and extrapancreatic disease and in predicting a severe course for acute pancreatitis.